Missouri, session 2026, HB3013.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3013 2
Section A. Sections 64.727, 65.110, 65.600, 66.705, 66.711, 67.391, 67.505, 67.547,
67.578, 67.582, 67.583, 67.584, 67.587, 67.590, 67.657, 67.667, 67.700, 67.997, 67.1006,
67.1016, 67.1158, 67.1177, 67.1187, 67.1300, 67.1303, 67.1305, 67.1360, 67.1361, 67.1366,
67.1451, 67.1551, 67.1775, 67.1922, 67.1959, 67.1974, 67.2000, 67.2030, 67.2040, 68.250,
71.800, 71.1000, 72.420, 72.422, 78.090, 78.100, 78.120, 78.280, 78.470, 78.480, 78.510,
78.520, 78.530, 78.573, 88.251, 94.577, 94.579, 94.581, 94.585, 94.705, 94.830, 94.831,
94.832, 94.836, 94.837, 94.838, 94.840, 94.875, 94.900, 94.902, 94.903, 94.950, 94.1011,
100.120, 115.121, 115.123, 137.1040, 144.757, 162.191, 162.223, 182.015, 182.105,
182.703, 182.802, 190.050, 190.335, 190.455, 204.602, 205.202, 205.205, 205.563,
205.979, 206.090, 210.860, 221.407, 233.040, 233.180, 233.330, 233.505, 233.510,
234.130, 235.210, 238.208, 238.216, 238.236, 238.410, 247.040, 247.060, 247.130,
247.170, 247.180, 247.217, 247.220, 247.350, 247.470, 247.550, 249.070, 249.150,
249.1150, 251.615, 256.445, 321.210, 321.225, 321.242, 321.244, 321.246, 321.460,
321.552, 321.610, 321.620, 321.688, 573.505, 644.032, 644.034, and 650.399, RSMo, and
section 67.457 as enacted by house bill no. 1606, one hundred first general assembly, second
regular session, and section 67.457 as enacted by house bill no. 175 merged with house bill
no. 1035 merged with senate bill no. 248, ninety-seventh general assembly, first regular
session, are repealed and one hundred twenty-nine new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 64.727, 65.110, 65.600, 66.705, 66.711, 67.391, 67.457, 67.505, 67.547,
67.578, 67.582, 67.583, 67.584, 67.587, 67.590, 67.657, 67.667, 67.700, 67.997, 67.1006,
67.1016, 67.1158, 67.1177, 67.1187, 67.1300, 67.1303, 67.1305, 67.1360, 67.1361, 67.1366,
67.1451, 67.1551, 67.1775, 67.1922, 67.1959, 67.1974, 67.2000, 67.2030, 67.2040, 68.250,
71.800, 71.1000, 72.420, 72.422, 78.090, 78.280, 78.530, 78.573, 88.251, 94.577, 94.579,
94.581, 94.585, 94.705, 94.830, 94.831, 94.832, 94.836, 94.837, 94.838, 94.840, 94.875,
94.900, 94.902, 94.903, 94.950, 94.1011, 100.120, 115.121, 115.123, 137.1040, 144.757,
162.191, 162.223, 182.015, 182.105, 182.703, 182.802, 190.050, 190.335, 190.455, 204.602,
205.202, 205.205, 205.563, 205.979, 206.090, 210.860, 221.407, 233.040, 233.180, 233.330,
233.505, 233.510, 234.130, 235.210, 238.208, 238.216, 238.236, 238.410, 247.040, 247.060,
247.130, 247.170, 247.180, 247.217, 247.220, 247.350, 247.470, 247.550, 249.070, 249.150,
249.1150, 251.615, 256.445, 321.210, 321.225, 321.242, 321.244, 321.246, 321.460,
321.552, 321.610, 321.620, 321.688, 573.505, 644.032, 644.034, and 650.399, to read as
follows:
64.727. 1. Nothing in section 64.725 shall be construed to affect the county planning
and zoning of any county that adopted county planning and zoning before April 12, 1996, or
that chooses to adopt county planning and zoning pursuant to sections 64.510 to 64.695 or
sections 64.800 to 64.905 after April 12, 1996.

HB 3013 3
2. Any county commission of a second, third or fourth classification that has adopted
county planning and zoning pursuant to sections 64.510 to 64.695 or sections 64.800 to
64.905 before April 12, 1996, may hold an election for the membership of the county
planning commission. At a regularly scheduled countywide primary election, the voters in
each township of the unincorporated area of the county shall elect one member from each
township to be a member of the county planning commission. Following this election, the
elected members shall immediately replace the commissioners previously appointed by the
county commission to the county planning commission. The terms of the elected members of
the county planning commission shall be four years or until the member's successor takes
office; except that, the terms shall be overlapping and one-half of the members first elected,
or if an uneven number one-half plus one, shall be elected for two-year terms and the
remaining members shall be elected for four-year terms. The county highway engineer shall
be an ex officio member of the county planning commission. The term of the county highway
engineer shall be only for the duration of the engineer's tenure of official position. All
members of the county planning commission shall serve as such without compensation, but
shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their
official duties. The planning commission shall elect a chair at the first meeting of the year to
serve for such year until a new chair is elected. The elected planning commission shall be
governed by the appropriate provisions of either sections 64.510 to 64.695 or sections 64.800
to 64.905 according to the provisions whereby the county adopted county planning and
zoning.
3. If a county commission does not call for an election as provided in subsection 2 of
this section, the voters of the county may submit a petition, signed by five percent of the
number of voters in the county voting at the last gubernatorial election, calling for an election
to elect members to a county planning commission. Upon receipt of such a petition, the
county commission shall make an order to provide for the election of a county planning
commission, pursuant to subsection 2 of this section, at the next countywide primary
election.
65.110. 1. There shall be chosen at the [biennial] primary election in each township
one trustee, who shall be ex officio treasurer of the township, one township clerk, and two
members of the township board.
2. Upon the assumption of office of a county assessor elected as provided by section
53.010, the township clerk shall cease to perform the duties of ex officio township assessor
and shall promptly deliver to the county assessor all books, papers, records, and property
pertaining to the office of ex officio township assessor.
3. The treasurer ex officio collector of a county with township organization shall no
longer retain such title, and shall instead assume the office of collector-treasurer, as provided

HB 3013 4
for by section 54.010, on March 1, 2007. On such date, the township collector shall cease to
perform the duties of township collector and shall promptly deliver to the collector-treasurer
all books, papers, records, and property pertaining to the office of township collector. The
township collector shall continue to perform the same duties and be subject to the same
requirements and liabilities until his or her term expires on March 1, 2007. Notwithstanding
other provisions of law to the contrary, the collector-treasurer shall obtain and hold the same
duties, powers, and obligations previously granted to, and held by, the township collector on
and after March 1, 2007.
65.600. 1. In any county in this state which may hereafter adopt township
organization, the person holding the office of the collector of the revenue in such county, at
the time in March when township organization becomes effective in such county, shall
continue to hold his or her office and exercise all the functions and receive all the fees and
emoluments thereof until the time at which his or her term of office would have expired had
such county not adopted township organization, and, except as herein otherwise provided, the
collector shall perform the same duties and be subject to the same requirements and liabilities
as in counties not under township organization.
2. The county assessor shall assess the property of the various townships in such
county and arrange the county assessor's books and lists in a manner so that it can be
determined which township is entitled to the taxes assessed against any property.
3. The county clerk of such county shall submit, for the use of such county collector,
lists of the property assessed in each township the same as the county clerk is required to
submit for the use of township collectors.
4. The collector of the revenue in such county shall pay over to the several township
trustees of such county after deducting his or her commission, all township taxes and funds of
every kind collected by the collector and belonging respectively to the several townships in
such county, as required by section 139.430 in the case of township collectors, and for the
collector's failure to do so the collector shall be subject to the same liability as provided by
section 139.430 in the case of township collectors.
5. The first township collectors in such county shall be elected at the [township]
primary election [held in March] next preceding the time at which the term of office of the
collector of the revenue in such county shall expire and their terms of office shall begin at the
expiration of the term of office of such collector of the revenue, and they shall hold their
offices until the next [township] primary election in such county. The provisions of this
section shall be effective prior to August 28, 2005.
66.705. 1. The county constitution framed by the commission shall take effect on the
day fixed therein and shall supersede any existing charter, county constitution or government,
if approved by the majority of the qualified voters of the county voting thereon. The county

HB 3013 5
constitution shall be submitted by the county constitution commission to the election
authority of the county not later than thirty days after the completion of the county
constitution or more than one year from the date of the selection of the county constitution
commission by the circuit court. The election authority of the county shall conduct the
election at the next [available] primary election authorized under state law. The election
shall be conducted under the provisions of chapter 115 and may, at the request of the county
constitution commission, be conducted by mail ballot. The commission may submit for
separate vote any parts of the county constitution, or any alternative sections or articles, and
the alternative sections or articles receiving the larger affirmative vote shall prevail if a
charter is adopted.
2. In addition to notices required under chapter 115, the election authority shall
publish the full text of the county constitution in each newspaper of general circulation in the
county at least once a week for at least three weeks, the last publication to be not more than
three nor less than two weeks immediately preceding the election.
3. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall ______ County adopt the proposed county constitution?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
proposal, then the county constitution shall be adopted. If a majority of the votes cast by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the proposal, the county constitution shall not
be adopted. No county constitution shall be submitted to the voters of the county within two
years after the election at which a county constitution was defeated, and prior to resubmitting
the question of whether to adopt a county constitution to the voters pursuant to this
subsection, the county commission shall resubmit the question set forth in section 66.700 to
the qualified voters of the county and a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters
voting thereon shall be in favor of the proposal.
66.711. 1. Pursuant to Section 9 of Article VI of the State Constitution, any county of
the first classification without a charter form of government may adopt an alternative form of
government and frame a county constitution for the vesting of any and all powers the general
assembly has the authority to confer, provided such powers are consistent with the
constitution of this state and not limited or denied by either the county constitution or by laws
of this state, except those powers to regulate and provide for free and open elections. A
county approving the alternative form of government and adopting a county constitution in
the manner prescribed by this section shall only impose such taxes as it is authorized by the
constitution and law to impose. The county commission of such a county may authorize the

HB 3013 6
submission of the question set forth in this section by placing such question on the ballot at a
[county or state general,] primary [or special] election [as set by the county commission].
The circuit judges of the circuit where such county is located shall establish a county
constitution commission to develop a county constitution if the qualified voters of the county,
at a [county or state general,] primary [or special] election, approve the following question:
Shall a commission be chosen by the ______ circuit court (circuit
number) to frame a county constitution which shall be submitted to the
voters of ______ County (county's name)?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

The election authority shall certify the results of the election to the county commission of the
county and the circuit court where such county is located. If a majority of the votes cast by
the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the circuit judges of the
circuit where such county is located shall establish a commission in the manner prescribed in
subsection 2 of this section. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting
thereon are opposed to the proposal, the circuit judges shall not establish a county
constitution.
2. In any county where the question submitted pursuant to subsection 1 of this section
is approved, the circuit judges of the circuit where such county is located shall, within sixty
days after certification of the election results by the election authority, appoint a commission
to frame the county constitution, consisting of fourteen residents of the county who shall
serve without pay and be equally divided between the two political parties casting the greater
number of votes for governor at the last preceding gubernatorial election.
3. The county constitution framed by the commission shall take effect on the day
fixed therein and shall supersede any existing county constitution or government, if approved
by the majority of the qualified voters of the county voting thereon. The county constitution
shall be submitted by the county constitution commission to the election authority of the
county not later than thirty days after the completion of the county constitution or more than
one year from the date of the selection of the county constitution commission by the circuit
court. The election authority of the county shall conduct the election at the next available
election authorized under state law. The election shall be conducted under the provisions of
chapter 115 and may, at the request of the county constitution commission, be conducted by
mail ballot. The commission may submit for separate vote any parts of the county
constitution, or any alternative sections or articles, and the alternative sections or articles
receiving the larger affirmative vote shall prevail if a constitution is adopted.
4. In addition to notices required under chapter 115, the election authority shall
publish the full text of the county constitution in each newspaper of general circulation in the

HB 3013 7
county at least once a week for at least three weeks, the last publication to be not more than
three nor less than two weeks immediately preceding the election.
5. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall ______ County adopt the proposed county constitution?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
proposal, then the county constitution shall be adopted. If a majority of the votes cast by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the proposal, the county constitution shall not
be adopted. No county constitution shall be submitted to the voters of the county within two
years after the election at which a county constitution was defeated, and prior to resubmitting
the question of whether to adopt a county constitution to the voters pursuant to this
subsection, the county commission shall resubmit the question set forth in subsection 1 of this
section to the qualified voters of the county and a majority of the votes cast by the qualified
voters voting thereon shall be in favor of the proposal.
6. Duplicate certificates shall be made, setting forth the county constitution adopted
and its ratification, signed by the election authority of the county after canvassing election
returns. One of such certified copies shall be deposited in the office of the secretary of state
and the other, after being recorded in the records of the county, shall be deposited among the
archives of the county and all courts shall take judicial notice thereof. This subsection shall
also apply to any amendment to the county constitution.
7. All amendments to such county constitution shall be approved by the voters and
shall become part of the county constitution at the time and under the conditions fixed in the
amendments.
8. Pursuant to section 1.140, the provisions of this section are severable. If any
provision of this section is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unconstitutional,
the remaining provisions of this act are valid unless the court finds the valid provisions of this
act are so essentially and inseparably connected with, and so dependent upon, the void
provision that it cannot be presumed the legislature would have enacted the valid provisions
without the void one; or unless the court finds that the valid provisions, standing alone, are
incomplete and are incapable of being executed in accordance with the legislative intent.
67.391. 1. The governing body of any first class county having a charter form of
government which contains all or any part of a city with a population of greater than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and the governing body of any first class county not adjacent to
any other first class county or the governing body of any second or third class county having
at least seventy-five miles of shoreline on the Missouri River are hereby authorized to

HB 3013 8
impose, by ordinance or order, a one-fourth cent sales tax on all retail sales made in such
county which are subject to taxation under the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.510.
The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed
by law, except that no ordinance imposing a sales tax under the provisions of this section shall
be effective unless the governing body of the county submits to the voters of the county, at a
[county or stat]e[general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing
body of the county to impose a tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the county of ______ (County's name) impose a countywide sales
tax of ______ (Insert amount) for a period not to exceed ______ (Insert
number) years for the purpose of investigating and prosecuting drug-
related offenses?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall become
effective on the first day of the second calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives
notice of adoption of the tax. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are
opposed to the proposal, then the governing body of the county shall have no power to impose
the sales tax herein authorized unless and until the governing body of the county shall again
have submitted another proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose the
sales tax authorized by sections 67.391 to [67.397] 67.395and such proposal is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
3. All revenue received by a county from the tax authorized under the provisions of
sections 67.391 to [67.397] 67.395 shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used
by the office of the prosecuting attorney solely for the investigation and prosecution of drug-
related offenses for so long as the tax shall remain in effect. The prosecuting attorney may
contract to distribute a portion of the special trust fund moneys to any not-for-profit
community crime prevention organization for the purpose of preventing drug-related
offenses, if such organization has been in existence for the purpose of community crime
prevention for a period of not less than five years. Once the tax authorized by sections 67.391
to [67.397] 67.395 is abolished or is terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the
special trust fund shall be used solely for activities initiated with revenues raised by the tax

HB 3013 9
authorized by sections 67.391 to [67.397] 67.395. Any funds in such special trust fund which
are not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the governing body in accordance
with applicable laws relating to the investment of other county funds.
4. The tax authorized by sections 67.391 to [67.397] 67.395shall terminate four years
from the date on which such tax was initially imposed by the county, unless sooner abolished
by the governing body of the county.
[67.457. 1. To establish a neighborhood improvement district, the
governing body of any city or county shall comply with either of the
procedures described in subsection 2 or 3 of this section.
2. The governing body of any city or county proposing to create a
neighborhood improvement district may by resolution submit the question of
creating such district to all qualified voters residing within such district at a
general or special election called for that purpose. Such resolution shall set
forth the project name for the proposed improvement, the general nature of the
proposed improvement, the estimated cost of such improvement, the
boundaries of the proposed neighborhood improvement district to be
assessed, and the proposed method or methods of assessment of real
property within the district, including any provision for the annual
assessment of maintenance costs of the improvement in each year during
the term of the bonds issued for the original improvement and after such bonds
are paid in full. The governing body of the city or county may create a
neighborhood improvement district when the question of creating such district
has been approved by the vote of the percentage of electors within such district
voting thereon that is equal to the percentage of voter approval required for the
issuance of general obligation bonds of such city or county under Article VI,
Section 26 of the constitution of this state. The notice of election containing
the question of creating a neighborhood improvement district shall contain the
project name for the proposed improvement, the general nature of the
proposed improvement, the estimated cost of such improvement, the
boundaries of the proposed neighborhood improvement district to be
assessed, the proposed method or methods of assessment of real property
within the district, including any provision for the annual assessment of
maintenance costs of the improvement in each year after the bonds issued for
the original improvement are paid in full, and a statement that the final cost of
such improvement assessed against real property within the district and the
amount of general obligation bonds issued therefor shall not exceed the
estimated cost of such improvement, as stated in such notice, by more than
twenty-five percent, and that the annual assessment for maintenance costs of
the improvements shall not exceed the estimated annual maintenance cost, as
stated in such notice, by more than twenty-five percent. The ballot upon
which the question of creating a neighborhood improvement district is
submitted to the qualified voters residing within the proposed district shall
contain a question in substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (name of city or county) be authorized to create a
neighborhood improvement district proposed for the ______ (project name for
the proposed improvement) and incur indebtedness and issue general

HB 3013 10
obligation bonds to pay for all or part of the cost of public improvements
within such district, the cost of all indebtedness so incurred to be assessed by
the governing body of the ______ (city or county) on the real property
benefitted by such improvements for a period of ______ years, and, if included
in the resolution, an assessment in each year thereafter with the proceeds
thereof used solely for maintenance of the improvement?
3. As an alternative to the procedure described in subsection 2 of this
section, the governing body of a city or county may create a neighborhood
improvement district when a proper petition has been signed by the owners of
record of at least two-thirds by area of all real property located within such
proposed district. Each owner of record of real property located in the
proposed district is allowed one signature. Any person, corporation, or limited
liability partnership owning more than one parcel of land located in such
proposed district shall be allowed only one signature on such petition. The
petition, in order to become effective, shall be filed with the city clerk or
county clerk. A proper petition for the creation of a neighborhood
improvement district shall set forth the project name for the proposed
improvement, the general nature of the proposed improvement, the estimated
cost of such improvement, the boundaries of the proposed neighborhood
improvement district to be assessed, the proposed method or methods of
assessment of real property within the district, including any provision for the
annual assessment of maintenance costs of the improvement in each year
during the term of the bonds issued for the original improvement and after
such bonds are paid in full, a notice that the names of the signers may not be
withdrawn later than seven days after the petition is filed with the city clerk or
county clerk, and a notice that the final cost of such improvement assessed
against real property within the district and the amount of general obligation
bonds issued therefor shall not exceed the estimated cost of such improvement,
as stated in such petition, by more than twenty-five percent, and that the
annual assessment for maintenance costs of the improvements shall not exceed
the estimated annual maintenance cost, as stated in such petition, by more than
twenty-five percent.
4. Upon receiving the requisite voter approval at an election or upon
the filing of a proper petition with the city clerk or county clerk, the governing
body may by resolution or ordinance determine the advisability of the
improvement and may order that the district be established and that
preliminary plans and specifications for the improvement be made. Such
resolution or ordinance shall state and make findings as to the project name for
the proposed improvement, the nature of the improvement, the estimated cost
of such improvement, the boundaries of the neighborhood improvement
district to be assessed, the proposed method or methods of assessment of real
property within the district, including any provision for the annual assessment
of maintenance costs of the improvement in each year after the bonds issued
for the original improvement are paid in full, and shall also state that the final
cost of such improvement assessed against the real property within the
neighborhood improvement district and the amount of general obligation
bonds issued therefor shall not, without a new election or petition, exceed the
estimated cost of such improvement by more than twenty-five percent.

HB 3013 11
5. The boundaries of the proposed district shall be described by metes
and bounds, streets or other sufficiently specific description. The area of the
neighborhood improvement district finally determined by the governing body
of the city or county to be assessed may be less than, but shall not exceed, the
total area comprising such district.
6. In any neighborhood improvement district organized prior to
August 28, 1994, an assessment may be levied and collected after the original
period approved for assessment of property within the district has expired,
with the proceeds thereof used solely for maintenance of the improvement, if
the residents of the neighborhood improvement district either vote to assess
real property within the district for the maintenance costs in the manner
100 prescribed in subsection 2 of this section or if the owners of two-thirds of the
101 area of all real property located within the district sign a petition for such
102 purpose in the same manner as prescribed in subsection 3 of this section.
103 7. Prior to any assessment hereafter being levied against any real
104 property within any neighborhood improvement district, and prior to any lien
105 enforceable under either chapter 140 or 141 being imposed after August 28,
106 2013, against any real property within a neighborhood improvement district,
107 the clerk of the governing body establishing the neighborhood improvement
108 district shall cause to be recorded with the recorder of deeds for the county in
109 which any portion of the neighborhood improvement district is located a
110 document conforming to the provisions of sections 59.310 and 59.313, and
111 which shall contain at least the following information:
112 (1) Each and all owners of record of real property located within the
113 neighborhood improvement district at the time of recording, who shall be
114 identified in the document as grantors and indexed by the recorder, as required
115 under and pursuant to section 59.440;
116 (2) The governing body establishing the neighborhood improvement
117 district and the title of any official or agency responsible for collecting or
118 enforcing any assessments, who shall be identified in the document as grantees
119 and so indexed by the recorder, as required under and pursuant to section
120 59.440;
121 (3) The legal description of the property within the neighborhood
122 improvement district which may either be the metes and bounds description
123 authorized in subsection 5 of this section or the legal description of each lot or
124 parcel within the neighborhood improvement district; and
125 (4) The identifying number of the resolution or ordinance creating the
126 neighborhood improvement district, or a copy of such resolution or ordinance.
127 8. (1) The governing body of the city or county establishing a
128 neighborhood improvement district shall, as soon as is practicable, submit the
129 following information to the state auditor and the department of revenue:
130 (a) A description of the boundaries of such district as well as the
131 average assessment made against real property located in such district;
132 (b) Any amendments made to the boundaries of a district; and
133 (c) The date on which a neighborhood improvement district is
134 dissolved.
135 (2) The governing body of the city or county establishing a
136 neighborhood improvement district on or after August 28, 2022, shall not

HB 3013 12
137 order any assessment to be made on any real property located within a district
138 until such governing body has submitted the information required by
139 paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of this subsection.]
67.457. 1. To establish a neighborhood improvement district, the governing body of
any city or county shall comply with either of the procedures described in subsection 2 or 3 of
this section.
2. The governing body of any city or county proposing to create a neighborhood
improvement district may by resolution submit the question of creating such district to all
qualified voters residing within such district at a [general or special] primary election [called
for that purpose]. Such resolution shall set forth the project name for the proposed
improvement, the general nature of the proposed improvement, the estimated cost of such
improvement, the boundaries of the proposed neighborhood improvement district to be
assessed, and the proposed method or methods of assessment of real property within the
district, including any provision for the annual assessment of maintenance costs of the
improvement in each year during the term of the bonds issued for the original improvement
and after such bonds are paid in full. The governing body of the city or county may create a
neighborhood improvement district when the question of creating such district has been
approved by the vote of the percentage of electors within such district voting thereon that is
equal to the percentage of voter approval required for the issuance of general obligation bonds
of such city or county under Article VI, Section 26 of the constitution of this state. The notice
of election containing the question of creating a neighborhood improvement district shall
contain the project name for the proposed improvement, the general nature of the proposed
improvement, the estimated cost of such improvement, the boundaries of the proposed
neighborhood improvement district to be assessed, the proposed method or methods of
assessment of real property within the district, including any provision for the annual
assessment of maintenance costs of the improvement in each year after the bonds issued for
the original improvement are paid in full, and a statement that the final cost of such
improvement assessed against real property within the district and the amount of general
obligation bonds issued therefor shall not exceed the estimated cost of such improvement, as
stated in such notice, by more than twenty-five percent, and that the annual assessment for
maintenance costs of the improvements shall not exceed the estimated annual maintenance
cost, as stated in such notice, by more than twenty-five percent. The ballot upon which the
question of creating a neighborhood improvement district is submitted to the qualified voters
residing within the proposed district shall contain a question in substantially the following
form:
Shall ______ (name of city or county) be authorized to create a neighborhood
improvement district proposed for the ______ (project name for the proposed improvement)

HB 3013 13
and incur indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds to pay for all or part of the cost of
public improvements within such district, the cost of all indebtedness so incurred to be
assessed by the governing body of the ______ (city or county) on the real property benefitted
by such improvements for a period of ______ years, and, if included in the resolution, an
assessment in each year thereafter with the proceeds thereof used solely for maintenance of
the improvement?
3. As an alternative to the procedure described in subsection 2 of this section, the
governing body of a city or county may create a neighborhood improvement district when a
proper petition has been signed by the owners of record of at least two-thirds by area of all
real property located within such proposed district. Each owner of record of real property
located in the proposed district is allowed one signature. Any person, corporation, or limited
liability partnership owning more than one parcel of land located in such proposed district
shall be allowed only one signature on such petition. The petition, in order to become
effective, shall be filed with the city clerk or county clerk. A proper petition for the creation
of a neighborhood improvement district shall set forth the project name for the proposed
improvement, the general nature of the proposed improvement, the estimated cost of such
improvement, the boundaries of the proposed neighborhood improvement district to be
assessed, the proposed method or methods of assessment of real property within the district,
including any provision for the annual assessment of maintenance costs of the improvement
in each year during the term of the bonds issued for the original improvement and after such
bonds are paid in full, a notice that the names of the signers may not be withdrawn later than
seven days after the petition is filed with the city clerk or county clerk, and a notice that the
final cost of such improvement assessed against real property within the district and the
amount of general obligation bonds issued therefor shall not exceed the estimated cost of such
improvement, as stated in such petition, by more than twenty-five percent, and that the annual
assessment for maintenance costs of the improvements shall not exceed the estimated annual
maintenance cost, as stated in such petition, by more than twenty-five percent.
4. Upon receiving the requisite voter approval at an election or upon the filing of a
proper petition with the city clerk or county clerk, the governing body may by resolution or
ordinance determine the advisability of the improvement and may order that the district be
established and that preliminary plans and specifications for the improvement be made. Such
resolution or ordinance shall state and make findings as to the project name for the proposed
improvement, the nature of the improvement, the estimated cost of such improvement, the
boundaries of the neighborhood improvement district to be assessed, the proposed method or
methods of assessment of real property within the district, including any provision for the
annual assessment of maintenance costs of the improvement in each year after the bonds
issued for the original improvement are paid in full, and shall also state that the final cost of

HB 3013 14
such improvement assessed against the real property within the neighborhood improvement
district and the amount of general obligation bonds issued therefor shall not, without a new
election or petition, exceed the estimated cost of such improvement by more than twenty-five
percent.
5. The boundaries of the proposed district shall be described by metes and bounds,
streets or other sufficiently specific description. The area of the neighborhood improvement
district finally determined by the governing body of the city or county to be assessed may be
less than, but shall not exceed, the total area comprising such district.
6. In any neighborhood improvement district organized prior to August 28, 1994, an
assessment may be levied and collected after the original period approved for assessment of
property within the district has expired, with the proceeds thereof used solely for maintenance
of the improvement, if the residents of the neighborhood improvement district either vote to
assess real property within the district for the maintenance costs in the manner prescribed in
subsection 2 of this section or if the owners of two-thirds of the area of all real property
located within the district sign a petition for such purpose in the same manner as prescribed in
subsection 3 of this section.
7. Prior to any assessment hereafter being levied against any real property within any
neighborhood improvement district, and prior to any lien enforceable under either chapter 140
or 141 being imposed after August 28, 2013, against any real property within a neighborhood
improvement district, the clerk of the governing body establishing the neighborhood
improvement district shall cause to be recorded with the recorder of deeds for the county in
which any portion of the neighborhood improvement district is located a document
conforming to the provisions of sections 59.310 and 59.313, and which shall contain at least
the following information:
(1) Each and all owners of record of real property located within the neighborhood
improvement district at the time of recording, who shall be identified in the document as
grantors and indexed by the recorder, as required under and pursuant to section 59.440;
(2) The governing body establishing the neighborhood improvement district and the
100 title of any official or agency responsible for collecting or enforcing any assessments, who
101 shall be identified in the document as grantees and so indexed by the recorder, as required
102 under and pursuant to section 59.440;
103 (3) The legal description of the property within the neighborhood improvement
104 district which may either be the metes and bounds description authorized in subsection 5 of
105 this section or the legal description of each lot or parcel within the neighborhood
106 improvement district; and
107 (4) The identifying number of the resolution or ordinance creating the neighborhood
108 improvement district, or a copy of such resolution or ordinance.

HB 3013 15
67.505. 1. Any county may, by a majority vote of its governing body, impose a
county sales tax, in conjunction with a property tax reduction for each year in which the sales
tax is imposed, for the benefit of such county in accordance with the provisions of sections
67.500 to 67.545; provided, however, that no ordinance or order enacted pursuant to the
authority granted by the provisions of sections 67.500 to 67.545 shall be effective unless the
governing body of the county submits to the voters of the county, at a [county or state
general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the
county to impose a tax and reduce property taxes under the provisions of sections 67.500 to
67.545.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the county of ______ (county's name) impose a countywide sales
tax of ______ (insert amount) and reduce its total property tax levy
annually by ______ (insert amount) percent of the total amount of sales
tax revenue collected in the same tax year?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in
effect. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the
proposal, then the governing body of the county shall have no power to impose the sales tax
and reduce the property tax as herein authorized unless and until the governing body of the
county shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the governing body of the
county to impose the sales tax and reduce the property tax under the provisions of sections
67.500 to 67.545 and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting
thereon.
3. The sales tax may be imposed at a rate of one-fourth of one percent, three-eighths
of one percent or one-half of one percent on the receipts from the sale at retail of all tangible
personal property or taxable services at retail within any county adopting such tax, if such
property and services are subject to taxation by the state of Missouri under the provisions of
sections 144.010 to 144.525. Each year in which a sales tax is imposed under the provisions
of sections 67.500 to 67.545, the county shall, after determining its budget, excluding funds
required to be set aside and placed to the credit of special road districts, within the limits set
by the constitution and laws of this state for the following calendar year and the total property

HB 3013 16
tax levy needed to raise the revenues required by such budget, reduce that total property tax
levy in an amount sufficient to decrease the total property taxes it will collect by an amount
equal to one of the following:
(1) Fifty percent of the sales tax revenue collected in the tax year for which the
property taxes are being levied;
(2) Sixty percent of the sales tax revenue collected in the tax year for which the
property taxes are being levied;
(3) Seventy percent of the sales tax revenue collected in the tax year for which the
property taxes are being levied;
(4) Eighty percent of the sales tax revenue collected in the tax year for which the
property taxes are being levied;
(5) Ninety percent of the sales tax revenue collected in the tax year for which the
property taxes are being levied;
(6) One hundred percent of the sales tax revenue collected in the tax year for which
the property taxes are being levied;

provided that, in the event that in the immediately preceding year a county actually collected
more or less sales tax revenue than the amount determined under subdivision (4) of section
67.500, the county shall adjust its total property tax levy for the current year to reflect such
increase or decrease.
4. No county in this state shall impose a tax under this section for the purpose of
funding in whole or in part the construction, operation, or maintenance of any zoological
activities, zoological facilities, zoological organizations, the metropolitan zoological park and
museum district as created under section 184.350, or any zoological boards.
67.547. 1. In addition to the tax authorized by section 67.505, any county as defined
in section 67.750 may, by a majority vote of its governing body, impose an additional county
sales tax on all sales which are subject to taxation under the provisions of sections 144.010 to
144.525. The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to any and all other sales tax
allowed by law; except that no ordinance or order imposing a sales tax under the provisions of
this section shall be effective unless the governing body of the county submits to the voters of
the county, at a [county or state general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to authorize
the governing body of the county to impose such tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to the following
language:
Shall the county of ______ (county's name) impose a countywide
sales tax of ______ (insert rate) percent for the purpose of _____
_ (insert purpose)?

HB 3013 17
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in
effect. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the
proposal, then the governing body of the county shall have no power to impose the sales tax
as herein authorized unless and until the governing body of the county submits another
proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose the sales tax under the
provisions of this section and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting thereon. A county shall not submit to the voters a proposed sales tax under this section
for a period of two years from the date of an election in which the county previously
submitted to the voters a proposed sales tax under this section, regardless of whether the
initial proposed sales tax was approved or disapproved by the voters. The revenue collected
from the sales tax authorized under this section shall only be used for the purpose approved
by voters of the county.
3. (1) The sales tax may be imposed at a rate of one-eighth of one percent, one-fourth
of one percent, three-eighths of one percent, or one-half of one percent on the receipts from
the sale at retail of all tangible personal property or taxable services at retail within any
county adopting such tax if such property and services are subject to taxation by the state of
Missouri under the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525. In any city not within a county
or any county described in subsection 5 of this section, no sales tax for the purpose of funding
zoological activities and zoological facilities as those terms are defined in section 184.500
shall exceed a rate of one-eighth of one percent unless the sales tax was levied and collected
before August 28, 2017. Beginning August 28, 2017, no county shall submit to the voters any
proposal that results in a combined rate of sales taxes adopted under this section in excess of
one percent.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection to the
contrary, beginning August 28, 2025, a county with more than eight thousand but fewer than
eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than seven hundred
thirty but fewer than eight hundred inhabitants may impose a sales tax that results in a
combined rate of sales tax adopted pursuant to this section in excess of one percent, but not in
excess of one and one-half percent, provided that any such sales tax shall be for the purpose
of providing law enforcement services. All sales tax elections conducted during the

HB 3013 18
November 8, 2022, general election shall be deemed in compliance with this subdivision,
provided that the total combined sales tax rate adopted pursuant to this section does not
exceed one and one-half percent.
4. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
5. In any first class county having a charter form of government and having a
population of nine hundred thousand or more, the proceeds of the sales tax authorized by this
section shall be distributed so that an amount equal to three-eighths of the proceeds of the tax
shall be distributed to the county and the remaining five-eighths shall be distributed to the
cities, towns and villages and the unincorporated area of the county on the ratio that the
population of each bears to the total population of the county. Three-eighths of the tax rate
adopted by such a county shall be included in the calculation of the county's one percent
combined tax rate ceiling provided in subsection 3 of this section. The population of each
city, town or village and the unincorporated area of the county and the total population of the
county shall be determined on the basis of the most recent federal decennial census. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the revenue collected is used to support
zoological activities of the zoological subdistrict as defined under section 184.352.
6. Except as prohibited under section 184.353, residents of any county that does not
adopt a sales tax under this section for the purpose of supporting zoological activities may be
charged an admission fee for zoological facilities, programs, or events that are not part of the
zoological subdistrict defined under subdivision (15) of section 184.352 as of August 28,
2017.
7. In any county of the second classification with more than nineteen thousand seven
hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand eight hundred inhabitants, the proceeds of the sales
tax authorized by this section shall be distributed so that an amount equal to three-fourths of
the proceeds of the tax shall be distributed to the county and the remaining one-fourth shall be
distributed equally among the incorporated cities, towns, and villages of the county. Upon
request from any city, town, or village within the county, the county shall make available for
inspection the distribution report provided to the county by the department of revenue. Any
expenses incurred by the county in supplying such report to a city, town, or village shall be
paid by such city, town, or village.
8. In any first class county having a charter form of government and having a
population of nine hundred thousand or more, no tax shall be imposed pursuant to this section
for the purpose of funding in whole or in part the construction, operation or maintenance of a
sports stadium, field house, indoor or outdoor recreational facility, center, playing field,
parking facility or anything incidental or necessary to a complex suitable for any type of
professional sport or recreation, either upon, above or below the ground.

HB 3013 19
9. No county in this state, other than a county with a charter form of government and
with more than nine hundred fifty thousand inhabitants and a city not within a county, shall
impose a tax under this section for the purpose of funding in whole or in part the construction,
operation, or maintenance of any zoological activities, zoological facilities, zoological
organizations, the metropolitan zoological park and museum district as created under section
184.350, or any zoological boards.
10. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from
the amounts in the trust fund and credited to any county for erroneous payments and
overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such counties. If any county abolishes the tax, the county shall notify the director of revenue
of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal and the director of
revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the
amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the
100 tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts.
101 After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in such county, the
102 director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the county and close the account
103 of that county. The director of revenue shall notify each county of each instance of any
104 amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
105 11. No revenue received from a tax for the purpose of funding zoological activities in
106 any county shall be used for the benefit of any entity that has ever been named Grant's Farm
107 or is located at ten thousand five hundred one Gravois Road, Saint Louis, Missouri, or
108 successor address, or to supplant any funding received from the metropolitan zoological park
109 and museum district established under section 184.350.
67.578. 1. The governing authority of any county of the third classification without a
township form of government and with more than sixteen thousand four hundred but less than
sixteen thousand five hundred inhabitants may impose a sales tax in an amount not to exceed
one-fifth of one percent on all retail sales made in the county which are subject to taxation
pursuant to sections 144.010 to 144.525, to be used solely for the funding of museums. For
purposes of this section, the term "museums" means museums operating in the county, which
are registered with the United States Internal Revenue Service as a 501(c)(3) corporation and
which are considered by the board to be a tourism attraction. The tax authorized by this
section shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no sales
tax shall be imposed pursuant to this section unless the governing authority submits to the
voters of the county, at a [county or stategeneral,] primary[, or special] election, a proposal to
authorize the governing authority to impose the tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:

HB 3013 20
Shall the county of ______ (insert the name of the county) impose a
sales tax of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for the funding of
museums? "Museums" means museums operating in the county, which
are registered with the United States Internal Revenue Service as a 501
(c)(3) corporation and which are considered by the museum board to be
a tourism attraction.
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the sales tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives notice of the adoption of the tax. If the
proposal receives less than the required majority of votes, then the governing authority shall
have no power to impose the tax unless and until the governing authority has again submitted
another proposal to authorize the governing authority to impose the sales tax authorized by
this section and such proposal is approved by the required majority of the qualified voters
voting thereon.
3. On or after the effective date of the tax, the director of revenue shall be responsible
for the administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of the tax, and sections 32.085
and 32.087 shall apply. The director may retain an amount not to exceed one percent for
deposit in the general revenue fund to offset the costs of collection. In order to permit sellers
required to collect and report the sales tax to collect the amount required to be reported and
remitted, but not to change the requirements of reporting or remitting the tax, or to serve as a
levy of the tax, and in order to avoid fractions of pennies, the governing authority may
authorize the use of a bracket system similar to that authorized in section 144.285, and
notwithstanding the provisions of that section, this new bracket system shall be used where
this tax is imposed and shall apply to all taxable transactions. Beginning with the effective
date of the tax, every retailer in the county shall add the sales tax to the sale price, and this tax
shall be a debt of the purchaser to the retailer until paid, and shall be recoverable at law in the
same manner as the purchase price. For purposes of this section, all retail sales shall be
deemed to be consummated at the place of business of the retailer.
4. All applicable provisions in sections 144.010 to 144.525 governing the state sales
tax, and section 32.057, the uniform confidentiality provision, shall apply to the collection of
the tax, and all exemptions granted to agencies of government, organizations, and persons

HB 3013 21
pursuant to sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to the imposition and
collection of the tax. The same sales tax permit, exemption certificate, and retail certificate
required by sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the administration and collection of the state sales
tax shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and no additional permit or exemption
certificate or retail certificate shall be required; except that, the director of revenue may
prescribe a form of exemption certificate for an exemption from the tax. All discounts
allowed the retailer pursuant to the state sales tax law for the collection of and for payment of
taxes are hereby allowed and made applicable to the tax. The penalties for violations
provided in section 32.057 and sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to
violations of this section. If any person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required
to be paid pursuant to this section, or in the event a determination has been made against the
person for taxes and penalty pursuant to this section, the limitation for bringing suit for the
collection of the delinquent tax and penalty shall be the same as that provided in sections
144.010 to 144.525.
5. The governing authority may authorize any museum board already existing in the
county, or may establish a museum board, to expend revenue collected pursuant to this
section. In the event that no museum board already exists, the board established pursuant to
this section shall consist of six members who are appointed by the governing authority from a
list of candidates supplied by the chair of each of the two major political parties of the county,
with three members from each of the two parties. Members shall serve for three-year terms,
but of the members first appointed, [one] two shall be appointed for a term of one year, two
shall be appointed for a term of two years, and two shall be appointed for a term of three
years. Each member shall be a resident of the county. The members shall not receive
compensation for service on the board, but shall be reimbursed from the revenues collected
pursuant to this section for any reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in service on the
board. The board shall determine in what manner the revenues will be expended, and
disbursements of these moneys shall be made strictly in accordance with this section.
Expenditures may be made for the employment of personnel selected by the board to assist in
carrying out the duties of the board, and the board is expressly authorized to employ such
personnel.
6. The governing authority may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters
at any [county or state general,] primary[, or special] election. The ballot of submission shall
contain, but need not be limited to, the following language:
Shall the county of ______ (insert name of county) repeal the sales tax
of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for the funding of museums?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

HB 3013 22
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are in favor of repeal, that repeal shall become
effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which the repeal was approved.
67.582. 1. The governing body of any county, except a county of the first class with a
charter form of government with a population of greater than four hundred thousand
inhabitants, is hereby authorized to impose, by ordinance or order, a sales tax in the amount of
up to one percent on all retail sales made in such county which are subject to taxation under
the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of providing law enforcement
services for such county. The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to any and all
other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no ordinance or order imposing a sales tax under
the provisions of this section shall be effective unless the governing body of the county
submits to the voters of the county, at a [county or state general,] primary [or special]
election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose a tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
(1) If the proposal submitted involves only authorization to impose the tax authorized
by this section the ballot shall contain substantially the following:
Shall the county of ______ (county's name) impose a countywide
sales tax of ______ (insert amount) for the purpose of providing
law enforcement services for the county?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "NO"; or
(2) If the proposal submitted involves authorization to enter into agreements to form a
regional jail district and obligates the county to make payments from the tax authorized by
this section the ballot shall contain substantially the following:
Shall the county of ______ (county's name) be authorized to
enter into agreements for the purpose of forming a regional jail
district and obligating the county to impose a countywide sales
tax of ______ (insert amount) to fund ______ dollars of the costs
to construct a regional jail and to fund the costs to operate a
regional jail, with any funds in excess of that necessary to

HB 3013 23
construct and operate such jail to be used for law enforcement
purposes?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal submitted pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, then the
ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in effect on the first day of the
second quarter immediately following the election approving the proposal. If the
constitutionally required percentage of the voters voting thereon are in favor of the
proposal submitted pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection, then the ordinance or order
and any amendments thereto shall be in effect on the first day of the second quarter
immediately following the election approving the proposal. If a proposal receives less than
the required majority, then the governing body of the county shall have no power to impose
the sales tax herein authorized unless and until the governing body of the county shall again
have submitted another proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose the
sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by the required majority of
the qualified voters voting thereon. However, in no event shall a proposal pursuant to this
section be submitted to the voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the last
proposal pursuant to this section.
3. All revenue received by a county from the tax authorized under the provisions of
this section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for providing
law enforcement services for such county for so long as the tax shall remain in effect.
Revenue placed in the special trust fund may also be utilized for capital improvement projects
for law enforcement facilities and for the payment of any interest and principal on bonds
issued for said capital improvement projects.
4. Once the tax authorized by this section is abolished or is terminated by any means,
all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall be used solely for providing law
enforcement services for the county. Any funds in such special trust fund which are not
needed for current expenditures may be invested by the governing body in accordance with
applicable laws relating to the investment of other county funds.
5. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue under this section on behalf of
any county, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited in the state's
general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in section

HB 3013 24
32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be known as the
"County Law Enforcement Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the county law
enforcement sales tax trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be
commingled with any funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate records
of the amount of money in the trust and which was collected in each county imposing a sales
tax under this section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of the county
and the public. Not later than the tenth day of each month the director of revenue shall
distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the county
which levied the tax; such funds shall be deposited with the county treasurer of each such
county, and all expenditures of funds arising from the county law enforcement sales tax trust
fund shall be by an appropriation act to be enacted by the governing body of each such
county. Expenditures may be made from the fund for any law enforcement functions
authorized in the ordinance or order adopted by the governing body submitting the law
enforcement tax to the voters.
6. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from the
amounts in the trust fund and credited to any county for erroneous payments and
overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such counties. If any county abolishes the tax, the county shall notify the director of revenue
of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal and the director of
revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the
amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the
tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts.
After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in such county, the
director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the county and close the account
of that county. The director of revenue shall notify each county of each instance of any
amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
7. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
67.583. 1. The governing body of any county of the second class with a population of
more than forty thousand but less than sixty thousand and which contains institutions
operated by the department of corrections and by the department of mental health is hereby
authorized to impose, by ordinance or order, a sales tax in the amount of one-eighth of one
percent on all retail sales made in such county which are subject to taxation under the
provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525. The tax authorized by this section shall be in
addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law; provided, however, that no ordinance
or order imposing a sales tax under the provisions of this section shall be effective unless the
governing body of the county submits to the voters of the county, at a [county or state

HB 3013 25
general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the
county to impose a tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the county of ______ (county's name) impose a countywide sales
tax of ______ (insert amount) for the purpose of providing retirement
and health care benefits for county employees and their dependents?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in
effect. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the
proposal, then the governing body of the county shall have no power to impose the sales tax
herein authorized unless and until the governing body of the county shall again have
submitted another proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose the sales
tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified
voters voting thereon. However, in no event shall a proposal pursuant to this section be
submitted to the voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the last proposal pursuant
to this section.
3. All revenue received by a county from the tax authorized under the provisions of
this section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for providing
retirement and health care benefits for county employees and their dependents.
4. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue under this section on behalf of
any county, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited in the state's
general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in section
32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be known as the
"County Employee Benefit Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the county employee
benefit sales tax trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled
with any funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount
of money in the trust and which was collected in each county imposing a sales tax under this
section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of the county and the
public. Not later than the tenth day of each month, the director of revenue shall distribute all
moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the county which levied the
tax. Such funds shall be deposited with the county treasurer of each such county, and all

HB 3013 26
expenditures of funds arising from the county employee benefit sales tax trust fund shall be
for the provision of retirement benefits or health care benefits for employees of the county
and their dependents and for no other purpose.
5. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from the
amounts in the trust fund and credited to any county for erroneous payments and
overpayments made and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such counties. If any county abolishes the tax, the county shall notify the director of revenue
of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal and the director of
revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the
amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the
tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts.
After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in such county, the
director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the county and close the account
of that county. The director of revenue shall notify each county of each instance of any
amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
6. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
67.584. 1. The governing body of any county of the first classification with more
than one hundred ninety-eight thousand but less than one hundred ninety-eight thousand two
hundred inhabitants is hereby authorized to impose, by ordinance or order, a sales tax in the
amount of up to one-half percent on all retail sales made in such county which are subject to
taxation pursuant to sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of providing law
enforcement services for such county. The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition
to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no ordinance or order imposing a
sales tax pursuant to this section shall be effective unless the governing body of the county
submits to the voters of the county, at a [county or state general,] primary[, or special]
election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose a tax.
2. If the proposal submitted involves only authorization to impose the tax authorized
by this section, the ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the
following language:
Shall the county of ______ (county's name) impose a countywide sales
tax of ______ (insert amount) for the purpose of providing law
enforcement services for the county?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

HB 3013 27

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal submitted pursuant to this subsection, then the ordinance or order and
any amendments thereto shall be in effect on the first day of the second quarter immediately
following the election approving the proposal. If a proposal receives less than the required
majority, then the governing body of the county shall have no power to impose the sales tax
herein authorized unless and until the governing body of the county shall again have
submitted another proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose the sales
tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by the required majority of the
qualified voters voting thereon. However, in no event shall a proposal pursuant to this section
be submitted to the voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the last proposal
pursuant to this section.
3. Twenty-five percent of the revenue received by a county treasurer from the tax
authorized pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used
solely by a prosecuting attorney's office for such county for so long as the tax shall remain in
effect. The remainder of revenue shall be deposited in the county law enforcement sales tax
trust fund established pursuant to section 67.582 of the county levying the tax pursuant to this
section. The revenue derived from the tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be used for
public law enforcement services only. No revenue derived from the tax imposed pursuant to
this section shall be used for any private contractor providing law enforcement services or for
any private jail.
4. Once the tax authorized by this section is abolished or is terminated by any means,
all funds remaining in the prosecuting attorney's trust fund shall be used solely by a
prosecuting attorney's office for the county. Any funds in such special trust fund which are
not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the governing body in accordance
with applicable laws relating to the investment of other county funds.
5. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue pursuant to this section on
behalf of any county, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited in the
state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in
section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be
known as the "County Prosecuting Attorney's Office Sales Tax Trust Fund" or in the county
law enforcement sales tax trust fund, pursuant to the deposit ratio in subsection 3 of this
section. The moneys in the trust funds shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be
commingled with any funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate records
of the amount of money in the trusts and which was collected in each county imposing a sales
tax pursuant to this section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of the
county and the public. Not later than the tenth day of each month the director of revenue shall

HB 3013 28
distribute all moneys deposited in the trust funds during the preceding month to the county
which levied the tax; such funds shall be deposited with the county treasurer of each such
county, and all expenditures of funds arising from either trust fund shall be by an
appropriation act to be enacted by the governing body of each such county. Expenditures
may be made from the funds for any functions authorized in the ordinance or order adopted
by the governing body submitting the tax to the voters.
6. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from the
amounts in the trust funds and credited to any county for erroneous payments and
overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such counties. If any county abolishes the tax, the county shall notify the director of revenue
of the action at least ninety days before the effective date of the repeal and the director of
revenue may order retention in the appropriate trust fund, for a period of one year, of two
percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or
overpayments of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in
such county, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the county and
close the account of that county established pursuant to this section. The director of revenue
shall notify each county of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed
from receipts due the county.
7. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
67.587. 1. The governing body of any county of the third classification without a
township form of government and with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty
thousand inhabitants and with a city of the fourth classification with more than three thousand
but fewer than three thousand seven hundred inhabitants as the county seat may impose, by
order or ordinance, a sales tax on all retail sales made within the county which are subject to
sales tax under chapter 144. The tax authorized in this section shall be equal to one-half of
one percent, and shall be imposed solely for the purpose of improving transportation
infrastructure in such county. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to all
other sales taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all other charges and
taxes. The order or ordinance shall not become effective unless the governing body of the
county submits to the voters residing within the county at a [state general,] primary[, or
special] election a proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose a tax
under this section.
2. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:

HB 3013 29
Shall ______ (insert the name of the political subdivision) impose a
sales tax at a rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent, solely for
the purpose of funding improvements to transportation infrastructure?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter immediately following notification to the department of revenue. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
3. All revenue collected under this section by the director of the department of
revenue on behalf of any county, except for one percent for the cost of collection which shall
be deposited in the state's general revenue fund, shall be deposited in a special trust fund and
shall be used solely for the designated purposes. Moneys in the fund shall not be deemed to
be state funds, and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The director may
make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund and credited to the county for erroneous
payments and overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited
to the credit of such county. Any funds in the special trust fund which are not needed for
current expenditures shall be invested in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
4. On or after the effective date of the tax, the director of revenue shall be responsible
for the administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of the tax, and sections 32.085
and 32.087 shall apply. In order to permit sellers required to collect and report the sales tax to
collect the amount required to be reported and remitted, but not to change the requirements of
reporting or remitting the tax, or to serve as a levy of the tax, and in order to avoid fractions of
pennies, the governing body of the county may authorize the use of a bracket system similar
to that authorized in section 144.285, and notwithstanding the provisions of that section, this
new bracket system shall be used where this tax is imposed and shall apply to all taxable
transactions. Beginning with the effective date of the tax, every retailer in the county shall
add the sales tax to the sale price, and this tax shall be a debt of the purchaser to the retailer
until paid, and shall be recoverable at law in the same manner as the purchase price. For

HB 3013 30
purposes of this section, all retail sales shall be deemed to be consummated at the place of
business of the retailer.
5. All applicable provisions in sections 144.010 to 144.525, governing the state sales
tax, and section 32.057, the uniform confidentiality provision, shall apply to the collection of
the tax, and all exemptions granted to agencies of government, organizations, and persons
under sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to the imposition and
collection of the tax. The same sales tax permit, exemption certificate, and retail certificate
required by sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the administration and collection of the state sales
tax shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and no additional permit or exemption
certificate or retail certificate shall be required; except that, the director of revenue may
prescribe a form of exemption certificate for an exemption from the tax. All discounts
allowed the retailer under the state sales tax for the collection of and for payment of taxes are
hereby allowed and made applicable to the tax. The penalties for violations provided in
section 32.057 and sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to violations of
this section. If any person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required to be paid
under this section, or in the event a determination has been made against the person for taxes
and penalty under this section, the limitation for bringing suit for the collection of the
delinquent tax and penalty shall be the same as that provided in sections 144.010 to 144.525.
6. The governing body of any county that has adopted the sales tax authorized in this
section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for
elections for the county] at the primary election and shall submit such question at least
every four years. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the political subdivision) repeal the
sales tax imposed at a rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for
the purpose of funding improvements to transportation infrastructure?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
year in which such repeal was approved.

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this section shall remain effective until

HB 3013 31
the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and the repeal is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
7. If the tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the special
trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes, and the county shall
notify the director of the department of revenue of the action at least thirty days before the
effective date of the repeal and the director may order retention in the trust fund, for a period
of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover
possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts
deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of
abolition of the tax in such county, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the
county and close the account of that county. The director shall notify each county of each
instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
67.590. 1. The governing body of any second class county which has a population of
at least eighty-seven thousand five hundred inhabitants but not more than one hundred
thousand inhabitants is hereby authorized to impose, by ordinance or order, a three-eighths of
one percent sales tax on all retail sales made in such county which are subject to taxation
under the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525. The tax authorized by this section shall
be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, provided, however, that no
ordinance imposing a sales tax under the provisions of this section shall be effective unless
the governing body of the county submits to the voters of the county, at a [county or state
general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the
county to impose a tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the county of ______ (county's name) impose a countywide sales
tax of ______ (insert amount) for a period not to exceed ______ (insert
number) years for the purpose of constructing facilities to be used as a
sheriff's office, jail, and juvenile facility, and for the purpose of
constructing a police department-fire department communications
center and such other law enforcement facilities as agreed upon by the
county of ______ (county's name) and the city of ______ (city's name),
to be leased to such city by such county?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".


HB 3013 32
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in
effect. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the
proposal, then the governing body of the county shall have no power to impose the sales tax
herein authorized unless and until the governing body of the county shall again have
submitted another proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose the sales
tax authorized by sections 67.590 to 67.594, and such proposal is approved by a majority of
the qualified voters voting thereon. However, in no event shall a proposal pursuant to
sections 67.590 to 67.594 be submitted to the voters sooner than twelve months from the date
of the last proposal pursuant to sections 67.590 to 67.594.
3. All revenue received by a county from the tax authorized under the provisions of
sections 67.590 to 67.594 shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for
the construction of a jail, a juvenile facility, and a sheriff's office within such county, and for
the construction of a police department-fire department communications center and such
other law enforcement facilities as agreed upon by the county and the city, for so long as the
tax shall remain in effect. Once the tax authorized by sections 67.590 to 67.594 is abolished
or is terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall be used
solely for the maintenance of the facilities and buildings constructed with revenues raised by
the tax authorized by sections 67.590 to 67.594. Any funds in such special trust fund which
are not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the governing body in accordance
with applicable laws relating to the investment of other county funds.
4. The tax authorized by sections 67.590 to 67.594 shall terminate five years from the
date on which such tax was initially imposed by the county, unless sooner abolished by the
governing body of the county.
5. Except as modified in sections 67.590 to 67.594, all provisions of sections 32.085
and 32.087 shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
67.657. 1. Nothing contained in sections 67.650 to 67.658 shall impair the powers of
any county, municipality or other political subdivision to acquire, own, operate, develop or
improve any facility of the type the authority is given the right and power to own, operate,
develop or improve.
2. Any county, municipality or other political subdivision or public agency is
authorized to make gifts, donations, grants and contributions of money or real or personal
property to the authority, whether such money or property is derived from tax revenues or
from any other source.
3. The state of Missouri or any agency, department or instrumentality thereof and the
county, the city, or any political subdivision, public agency or public body, or any
combination thereof pursuant to sections 70.210 to 70.325, or otherwise, are authorized to

HB 3013 33
enter into contracts, agreements, leases and subleases with each other, the authority and others
to acquire, sell, convey, lease, sublease, own, operate, finance, develop or improve, or any
combination thereof, any facility of the type the authority is given the right to construct, own,
operate, develop or improve, including without limitation to agree to pay rents or other fees or
charges, subject to annual appropriations, and to mortgage, pledge, assign, convey, or grant
security in any interest which any such entity may have in such facility.
4. In addition to any other tax imposed by law, and notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of section 67.619, to the contrary, the governing body of the
county may submit to the voters of the county a tax not to exceed three and one-half percent
on the amount of sales or charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels
and motels situated within the county involved, and doing business within such county for the
purpose of funding a regional convention and sports complex authority and for other
recreational and entertainment purposes. If the governing body so orders, the election
officials of the county shall submit a proposition to the voters of such county at the next
[statewide or countywide] primary election [or at a special election called for that purpose,
such special election to be held at the expense of the regional convention and sports complex
authority]. Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters in substantially the following
form at such election:
Shall a sales tax of ______ percent on the amount of sales or charges
for all rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels and motels be levied
in the county of ______ to provide certain funds for the regional
convention and sports complex authority and for general revenue
purposes?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition in such county at such
election approve such proposition, then such sales tax shall be in full force and effect as of the
first day of the calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held.
5. On and after the effective day of any tax authorized under the provisions of
subsection 4 of this section, the governing body of the county may adopt one of the two
following provisions for the collection and administration of the tax:
(1) The collector of revenue in such county may collect the tax pursuant to rules and
regulations promulgated by the governing body of the county. The tax to be collected by the
collector of revenue, less an amount not less than one percent and not more than three percent
which may be retained for costs of collection, shall be remitted to the county and deposited in
a special trust fund to be known as the "County Convention and Recreation Trust Fund" not
later than thirty days following the end of each month;

HB 3013 34
(2) The governing body of the county may enter into an agreement with the director
of revenue of the state of Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in
subsection 4 of this section. In the event the governing body enters into an agreement with
the director of revenue of the state of Missouri for the collection of the tax authorized in
subsection 4 of this section, the director of revenue shall perform all functions incident to the
administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of such tax, and the director of revenue
shall collect such additional tax. The tax shall be collected and reported upon such forms and
under such administrative rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the director of
revenue, and the director of revenue shall retain not less than one percent nor more than three
percent for cost of collection and shall transfer all other moneys collected for such tax to the
county for deposit in the county convention and recreation trust fund.
6. All funds deposited in the county convention and recreation trust fund shall,
subject to annual appropriation, be disbursed by the county only for deposit in the regional
convention and sports complex fund to pay the county's share of any rent, fees or charges
payable pursuant to any contract, agreement, lease or sublease provided for in subsection 3 of
this section; provided that in the event the county chooses to participate in a qualifying project
and enters into any such contract, agreement, lease or sublease, then any funds in excess of its
obligations hereunder which are deposited in the county convention and recreation trust fund
in any year pursuant to subsection 4 of this section may be appropriated and disbursed by the
county for general revenue purposes.
7. Notwithstanding any provision of subsection 6 of this section to the contrary, funds
deposited in the county convention and recreation trust fund pursuant to subsection 5 of this
section in excess of amounts payable as the county's share of any rent, fees or charges payable
pursuant to any contract, agreement, lease or sublease provided for in subsection 3 of this
section, including reasonable reserves for future payments of such amounts, shall not be
appropriated or paid except for funding of the regional convention and sports complex
authority or for regional convention and tourism purposes to the regional convention and
visitors commission established by section 67.601 if it is providing management and
operations services for a facility of the regional convention and sports complex authority of
which the state of Missouri, the city, and St. Louis County are lessees pursuant to a contract,
agreement or sublease with such lessees.
8. In addition to any other tax imposed by law, and notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (1) of subsection 5 of section 67.619 to the contrary, the governing body of the
city may repeal a present two-dollar license fee per occupied room levied in such city on
hotels and motels and submit to the voters of the city a tax not to exceed three and one-half
percent on the amount of sales or charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests
of hotels and motels situated within the city involved, and doing business within such city for

HB 3013 35
the purposes of funding debt service, lease payments or other expenses of an existing
convention center, including any southern expansion thereof, of such city, a regional
convention and sports complex authority or a regional convention and visitors commission or
any combination thereof as herein provided. If the governing body so orders, the election
officials of the city shall submit a proposition to the voters of such city at the next[ statewide
or citywide] primary election [or at a special election called for that purpose, such special
election to be held at the expense of the city]. Such proposition shall be submitted to the
voters in substantially the following form at such election:
Shall the present two-dollar license fee per occupied room levied in the
city of ______ on hotels and motels be repealed and a sales tax of ____
__ percent on the amount of sales or charges for all rooms paid by the
transient guests of hotels and motels be levied in the city of ______ to
provide funds for convention, tourism and sports facilities purposes
and agencies?
100 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
101
102 In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition in such city at such
103 election approve such proposition, then such two-dollar license fee per occupied room shall
104 be repealed and such sales tax shall be in full force and effect as of the first day of the
105 calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held.
106 9. On and after the effective date of any tax authorized under the provisions of
107 subsection 8 of this section, the governing body of the city may adopt one of the two
108 following provisions for the collection and administration of the tax:
109 (1) The collector of revenue in such city may collect the tax pursuant to rules and
110 regulations promulgated by the governing body of the city. The tax to be collected by the
111 collector of revenue, less an amount not less than one percent and not more than three percent
112 which may be retained for costs of collection, shall be remitted to the city and deposited in a
113 special trust fund to be known as the "City Convention and Sports Facility Trust Fund" not
114 later than thirty days following the end of each month;
115 (2) The governing body of the city may enter into an agreement with the director of
116 revenue of the state of Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in subsection
117 8 of this section. In the event the governing body enters into an agreement with the director
118 of revenue of the state of Missouri for the collection of the tax authorized in subsection 8 of
119 this section, the director of revenue shall perform all functions incident to the administration,
120 collection, enforcement and operation of such tax, and the director of revenue shall collect
121 such additional tax. The tax shall be collected and reported upon such forms and under such
122 administrative rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the director of revenue, and the

HB 3013 36
123 director of revenue shall retain not less than one percent nor more than three percent for cost
124 of collection and shall transfer all other moneys collected for such tax to the city for deposit in
125 the convention and sports facility trust fund.
126 10. All funds deposited in the city convention and sports facility trust fund shall,
127 subject to annual appropriation, be disbursed by the city only for first, debt service, lease
128 payments or other expenses related to an existing convention center, including any southern
129 expansion thereof, of such city, second, to pay the city's share of any rent, fees or charges
130 payable pursuant to any lease provided for in subsection 3 of this section and third, the
131 remainder, if any, annually to the regional convention and visitors commission established by
132 section 67.601 if it is providing management and operations services for a facility of the
133 regional convention and sports complex authority of which the state of Missouri, the city, and
134 St. Louis County are lessees pursuant to a contract, agreement or sublease with such lessees.
67.667. The governing body of any county described in section 67.665 may, by
adopting an order, impose the tourism tax; provided, however, that no order enacted pursuant
to the authority granted by the provisions of section 67.665 shall be effective unless the
governing body of the county submits to the voters of the county, at a [countywidegeneral or]
primary election [or at a special election called for that purpose], a proposal to authorize the
governing body of the county to impose the tourism tax. The ballot of submission shall
contain, but not be limited to, the following language:
(cid:0) For the tourism tax
(cid:0) Against the tourism tax

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the order shall be in effect. If a majority of the votes cast by the
qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the governing body of the county
shall have no power to impose the tax herein authorized unless and until the governing body
of the county shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the governing body of
the county to impose the tax, and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified
voters voting thereon.
67.700. 1. Any county, as defined in section 67.724, may, by ordinance or order,
impose a sales tax on all retail sales made in such county which are subject to taxation under
the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525 for any capital improvement purpose
designated by the county in its ballot of submission to its voters; provided, however, that no
ordinance or order enacted pursuant to the authority granted by sections 67.700 to 67.727
shall be effective unless the governing body of the county submits to the voters of the county,
at a [county or state general,] primary[, or special] election, a proposal to authorize the
governing body of the county to impose a tax under the provisions of sections 67.700 to

HB 3013 37
67.727. The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes
allowed by law.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the county of ______ (county's name) impose a countywide sales
tax at the rate of ______ (insert amount) for a period of ______ (insert
number) years from the date on which such tax is first imposed for the
purpose of ______ (insert capital improvement purpose)?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in
effect. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the
proposal, then the governing body of the county shall have no power to impose the sales tax
authorized by sections 67.700 to 67.727 unless and until the governing body of the county
shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize it to impose the sales tax under the
provisions of sections 67.700 to 67.727 and such proposal is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting thereon.
3. All revenue received by a county from the tax authorized by sections 67.700 to
67.727 which has been designated for a certain capital improvement purpose shall be
deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for such designated purpose. Upon
the expiration of the period of years approved by the voters under subsection 2 of this section
or if the tax authorized by sections 67.700 to 67.727 is repealed under section 67.721, all
funds remaining in the special trust fund shall continue to be used solely for such designated
capital improvement purpose including the payment of principal and interest on any bonds
issued to pay for such capital improvement. Any funds in such special trust fund which are
not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the governing body in accordance
with applicable laws relating to the investment of other county funds.
4. The sales tax may be imposed at a rate of one-eighth of one percent, one-fifth of
one percent, one-fourth of one percent, three-eighths of one percent, or one-half of one
percent on the receipts from the sale at retail of all tangible personal property or taxable
services at retail within the county adopting such tax, if such property and services are subject
to taxation by the state of Missouri under the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525.

HB 3013 38
5. In addition to the rates provided in subsection 4 of this section, any county of the
first class without a charter form of government which adjoins a county of the first class
containing part of a city containing more than three hundred fifty thousand inhabitants and
which also adjoins a county of the third class having a township form of government shall
also be authorized to (1) levy such sales tax at a rate of one-eighth of one percent; or (2) levy
such sales tax at a rate of one-fourth of one percent in conjunction with a reduction in its
property tax levy or levies for general revenues or for funding the maintenance of roads and
bridges, or both, for each year in which the sales tax is imposed. Such reduction shall be in an
amount sufficient to decrease the property taxes it will collect by not less than fifty percent of
the sales tax revenue collected in the tax year for which the property taxes are being levied. If
in the immediately preceding year a county actually collected less sales tax revenue than was
projected for purposes of reducing its property tax levy or levies, the county shall adjust its
property tax levy or levies for the current year to reflect such decrease. Any such county
seeking voter approval of the sales tax alternative authorized in this subsection shall include
in the ballot of submission authorized in subsection 2 of this section language clearly stating
the appropriate percentage of the sales tax revenue shall be used for property tax reduction as
provided herein. For purposes of this subsection, the term "sales tax revenue collected" shall
have the meaning provided in section 67.500.
67.997. 1. The governing body of any county of the third classification without a
township form of government and with more than eighteen thousand one hundred but fewer
than eighteen thousand two hundred inhabitants may impose, by order or ordinance, a sales
tax on all retail sales made within the county which are subject to sales tax under chapter 144.
The tax authorized in this section shall not exceed one-fourth of one percent, and shall be
imposed solely for the purpose of funding senior services and youth programs provided by the
county. One-half of all revenue collected under this section, less one-half the cost of
collection, shall be used solely to fund any service or activity deemed necessary by the senior
service tax commission established in this section, and one-half of all revenue collected under
this section, less one-half the cost of collection, shall be used solely to fund all youth
programs administered by an existing county community task force. The tax authorized in
this section shall be in addition to all other sales taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated
separately from all other charges and taxes. The order or ordinance shall not become
effective unless the governing body of the county submits to the voters residing within the
county at a [stategeneral,] primary[, or special] election a proposal to authorize the governing
body of the county to impose a tax under this section.
2. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:

HB 3013 39
Shall ______ (insert the name of the county) impose a sales tax at a
rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent, with half of the revenue
from the tax, less one-half the cost of collection, to be used solely to
fund senior services provided by the county and half of the revenue
from the tax, less one-half the cost of collection, to be used solely to
fund youth programs provided by the county?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter immediately following the approval of the tax or notification to the
department of revenue if such tax will be administered by the department of revenue. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
3. On or after the effective date of any tax authorized under this section, the county
which imposed the tax shall enter into an agreement with the director of the department of
revenue for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in this section. On or after the
effective date of the tax the director of revenue shall be responsible for the administration,
collection, enforcement, and operation of the tax, and sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply.
All revenue collected under this section by the director of the department of revenue on behalf
of any county, except for one percent for the cost of collection which shall be deposited in the
state's general revenue fund, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created
and shall be known as the "Senior Services and Youth Programs Sales Tax Trust Fund", and
shall be used solely for the designated purposes. Moneys in the fund shall not be deemed to
be state funds, and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The director may
make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund and credited to the county for erroneous
payments and overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited
to the credit of such county. Any funds in the special trust fund which are not needed for
current expenditures shall be invested in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.

HB 3013 40
4. In order to permit sellers required to collect and report the sales tax to collect the
amount required to be reported and remitted, but not to change the requirements of reporting
or remitting the tax, or to serve as a levy of the tax, and in order to avoid fractions of pennies,
the governing body of the county may authorize the use of a bracket system similar to that
authorized in section 144.285 and notwithstanding the provisions of that section, this new
bracket system shall be used where this tax is imposed and shall apply to all taxable
transactions. Beginning with the effective date of the tax, every retailer in the county shall
add the sales tax to the sale price, and this tax shall be a debt of the purchaser to the retailer
until paid, and shall be recoverable at law in the same manner as the purchase price. For
purposes of this section, all retail sales shall be deemed to be consummated at the place of
business of the retailer.
5. All applicable provisions in sections 144.010 to 144.525 governing the state sales
tax, and section 32.057, the uniform confidentiality provision, shall apply to the collection of
the tax, and all exemptions granted to agencies of government, organizations, and persons
under sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to the imposition and
collection of the tax. The same sales tax permit, exemption certificate, and retail certificate
required by sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the administration and collection of the state sales
tax shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and no additional permit or exemption
certificate or retail certificate shall be required; except that, the director of revenue may
prescribe a form of exemption certificate for an exemption from the tax. All discounts
allowed the retailer under the state sales tax for the collection of and for payment of taxes are
hereby allowed and made applicable to the tax. The penalties for violations provided in
section 32.057 and sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to violations of
this section. If any person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required to be paid
under this section, or in the event a determination has been made against the person for taxes
and penalty under this section, the limitation for bringing suit for the collection of the
delinquent tax and penalty shall be the same as that provided in sections 144.010 to 144.525.
6. The governing body of any county that has adopted the sales tax authorized in this
section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for
elections for the county] at the primary election. The ballot of submission shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the county) repeal the sales tax
imposed at a rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for the
purpose of funding senior services and youth programs provided by the
county?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

HB 3013 41
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this
section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the
qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the
100 question.
101 7. Whenever the governing body of any county that has adopted the sales tax
102 authorized in this section receives a petition, signed by ten percent of the registered voters of
103 the county voting in the last gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the sales
104 tax imposed under this section, the governing body shall submit to the voters of the county a
105 proposal to repeal the tax. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified
106 voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal, the repeal shall become effective on
107 December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of
108 the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal,
109 then the sales tax authorized in this section shall remain effective until the question is
110 resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority
111 of the qualified voters voting on the question.
112 8. If the tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the special
113 trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes, and the county shall
114 notify the director of the department of revenue of the action at least thirty days before the
115 effective date of the repeal and the director may order retention in the trust fund, for a period
116 of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover
117 possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts
118 deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of
119 abolition of the tax in such county, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the
120 county and close the account of that county. The director shall notify each county of each
121 instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
122 9. Each county imposing the tax authorized in this section shall establish a senior
123 services tax commission to administer the portion of the sales tax revenue dedicated to
124 providing senior services. Such commission shall consist of seven members appointed by the
125 county commission. The county commission shall determine the qualifications, terms of

HB 3013 42
126 office, compensation, powers, duties, restrictions, procedures, and all other necessary
127 functions of the commission.
67.1006. 1. In any county of the second class which has a two-year community
college and is located south of the Missouri River and adjacent to a county of the second class
which contains a state educational institution described as a state teachers college in
paragraph (c) of subdivision (5) of section 176.010, a proposal to authorize the governing
body of the county to impose a tax may be submitted to the voters of the county at a [state
general,] primary [or special] election as follows:
(1) By a majority vote of the county governing body; or
(2) Upon petition of eight percent of the voters who cast votes for the member of the
county governing body who received the highest number of votes at the last election in which
members of the governing body were elected, the county clerk shall submit the proposal to
the voters of the county. The tax shall be levied on the sales or charges for all sleeping rooms
paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in the county at a rate not to exceed
two dollars per room per night. The tax authorized by sections 67.1006 to 67.1012 shall be in
addition to any and all taxes imposed by law and shall be stated separately from all other
charges and taxes.
2. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall there be imposed in the county of ______ (name of county) a tax
of ______ (rate of tax) on each sleeping room occupied and rented by
transient guests of hotels and motels located in the county, the proceeds
of which shall be expended for tourism purposes?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority
of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
question, then the tax authorized by sections 67.1006 to 67.1012 shall not become effective
unless and until the question is resubmitted under the provisions of sections 67.1006 to
67.1012 to the qualified voters of the county and such question is approved by a majority of
the qualified voters of the county voting on the question.
3. The governing body of any county imposing a tax under this section may, by order
or ordinance, change the rate of such tax from two dollars per room per night to not more than
five percent per occupied room per night. No such order or ordinance shall become effective
unless the governing body of the county submits to the voters of the county at a [state
general,] primary[, or special] election a proposal to authorize the governing body of the

HB 3013 43
county to change the rate of tax imposed under this section. If a majority of the votes cast on
the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the question, then the
change in the tax rate shall become effective on the first day of the second calendar quarter
following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority of the votes cast
on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question, then the
change in the tax rate shall not become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted
under this section to the qualified voters of the county and such question is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
67.1016. 1. The governing body of any county of the second, third, or fourth
classification may impose, by order or ordinance, a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms
paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in the county or a portion thereof. The
tax shall be not more than one cent per occupied room per night, and shall be imposed solely
for the purpose of promoting tourism-related activities in the county. The tax authorized in
this section shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping room and all other taxes
imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
2. No such order or ordinance shall become effective unless the governing body of
the county submits to the voters of the county at a [state general,] primary[, or special]
election a proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose a tax under this
section. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon
are in favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority
of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted
under this section to the qualified voters of the county and such question is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
3. All revenue generated by the tax shall be collected by the county collector of
revenue, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, and shall be used solely for the designated
purposes. If the tax is repealed, all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall continue to
be used solely for the designated purposes. Any funds in the special trust fund that are not
needed for current expenditures may be invested by the governing body in accordance with
applicable laws relating to the investment of other county funds. Any interest and moneys
earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
4. Upon adoption of the tax under this section, there shall be established in each
county adopting the tax a "Tourism Commission", to consist of five members appointed by
the governing body of the county. No more than one member of the tourism commission
shall be a member of the governing body of the county. Of the initial members appointed,
two shall hold office for one year, two shall hold office for two years, and one shall hold

HB 3013 44
office for three years. Members appointed after expiration of the initial terms shall be
appointed to a three-year term. Each member may be reappointed. Vacancies shall be filled
by appointment by the governing body of the county for the remainder of the unexpired term.
The members shall not receive compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed for
their actual and necessary expenses incurred in service of the tourism commission.
5. The governing body of any county that has adopted the tax authorized in this
section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for
elections for the county] at the primary election. If a majority of the votes cast on the
proposal are in favor of repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of
the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the
question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax
authorized in this section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this
section to the qualified voters of the county, and the repeal is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting on the question.
6. Whenever the governing body of any county that has adopted the tax authorized in
this section receives a petition, signed by a number of registered voters of the county equal to
at least two percent of the number of registered voters of the county voting in the last
gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the tax imposed under this section, the
governing body shall submit to the voters of the county a proposal to repeal the tax. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of
the repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in
which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax shall remain effective
until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of the county and
the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
7. As used in this section, "transient guests" means a person or persons who occupy a
room or rooms in a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
67.1158. 1. The governing body of a county which has established an authority under
the provisions of sections 67.1150 to 67.1158 may impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping
rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in the county, which shall be
more than two percent but not more than five percent per occupied room per night, except that
such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the county submits to the
voters of the county at a [state general,] primary[, or special] election, a proposal to authorize
the governing body of the county to impose a tax under the provisions of this section. The tax
authorized by this section shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping room and shall be
in addition to any and all taxes imposed by law, and the proceeds of such tax shall be used by
the authority solely for funding the construction and operation of convention, visitor and

HB 3013 45
sports facilities, other incidental facilities, and operation of the authority consistent with the
provisions of sections 67.1150 to 67.1158. Such tax shall be stated separately from all other
charges and taxes.
2. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ (County) levy a tax of ______ percent on each
sleeping room occupied and rented by transient guests of hotels and
motels located in the county, the proceeds of which shall be expended
for the funding of convention, visitor and sports facilities, other
incidental facilities, and the county convention and sports facilities
authority?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the calendar
quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question,
then the governing body for the county shall have no power to impose the tax authorized by
this section unless and until the governing body of the county resubmits the question and such
question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
3. After the effective date of any tax authorized under the provisions of this section,
the county that levied the tax may adopt one of the following provisions for the collection and
administration of the tax:
(1) The county may adopt rules and regulations for the internal collection of such tax
by the county officers usually responsible for collection and administration of county taxes;
(2) The county may enter into an agreement with the authority for the authority to
collect such tax and perform all functions incident to the administration, collection,
enforcement, and operation of such tax. The tax authorized by this section shall be collected
and reported upon such forms and under such administrative rules and regulations as may be
prescribed by the authority; or
(3) The county may enter into an agreement with the director of revenue of the state
of Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in this section. In the event any
county enters into an agreement with the director of revenue of the state of Missouri for the
collection of the tax authorized in this section, the director of revenue shall perform all
functions incident to the administration, collection, enforcement and operation of such tax,
and shall collect the additional tax authorized under the provisions of this section. The tax
authorized by this section shall be collected and reported upon such forms and under such
administrative rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the director of revenue, and the

HB 3013 46
director of revenue shall retain not less than one percent nor more than three percent for cost
of collection.
4. If a tax is imposed by a county under this section, the tax for each calendar quarter
shall be due on the first day of the next calendar quarter. If any taxes are not paid within
thirty days after the due date, the authority collecting the tax may collect, in addition to the
amount of the tax due, one percent interest per month on the unpaid taxes and a penalty of two
percent per month on the unpaid tax. Any penalty or interest shall be calculated beginning on
the original due date. The authority, in its discretion, may abate a portion of the penalty to
facilitate the voluntary payment of the tax.
5. If a tax is imposed by a county under this section, either the county or the authority
shall have the power to audit the taxed facilities to ensure compliance with the tax by the
facility. During such audit, the taxed facilities shall give access to examine necessary records
to ensure compliance.
6. Suits to enforce the collection and payment of the tax against the taxed facilities
shall be filed and prosecuted only by the authority. The authority shall be entitled to recover
costs and attorney's fees incurred by the authority in collecting the tax.
67.1177. 1. The board, by a majority vote, may submit to the residents of such
district a tax of not less than two percent and not more than six percent on the amount of sales
or charges for all sleeping rooms offered to the public and paid by the transient guests of
hotels, motels and resorts situated within the district. Upon the written request of the board to
the election officials of the county in which the district is situated, such election officials shall
submit a proposition to the residents of such district at a [countywide or statewide] primary
[or general] election[, or at a special election called for that purpose]. Such election officials
shall give legal notice as provided in chapter 115. As used in this section, the term "hotels,
motels and resorts" includes any condominium offered to the public which is rented to a
person or entity for a period of less than thirty-one days, any privately owned campground
offered to the public which rents space to persons or entities for a period of less than thirty-
one days, and also includes any rental of a houseboat originating from a point within the
district and which is offered to the public. The term "hotels, motels and resorts" shall not
include any facilities operated by a recognized church and its affiliates for the purpose of
providing religious education and recreation to the church's members. As used in this section,
the term "transient guest" means a person who occupies a room or rooms in a hotel, motel or
resort for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
2. Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters of the business district in
substantially the following form at such election:
Shall a lodging tax of ______ percent on the amount of sales or charges
for all lodging paid by the transient guests of hotels, motels and resorts

HB 3013 47
be levied in the lake area business district of the county of ______ to
provide funds for the promotion of tourism in the district?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
3. In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such proposition in such district
approve such proposition, then such tax shall be in full force and effect as of the first day of
the calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. The
results of an election held under this section shall be certified by the election officials of the
county to the board not more than thirty days after the day on which such election was held.
The district shall be liable for its share of the costs of the election pursuant to section 115.065.
4. In the event a tax is imposed under this section, such tax shall be in addition to any
countywide gross receipts tax on hotels, motels or resorts in effect at the time of the election
or imposed after the date of the election. If a tax is imposed under the provisions of this
section, the county may collect a penalty of one percent and interest not to exceed two percent
per month on unpaid taxes which shall be considered delinquent thirty days after the last day
of each quarter.
5. The revenues received from the tax authorized in this section shall be used by the
advisory board for advertising and promotion of tourism. Such advertising and promotional
activities shall be developed into a comprehensive marketing plan, so as to meet the needs of
all sizes and types of businesses within the lodging industry. The board members of each
lodging category, as described in subsection 1 of section 67.1175, shall have sole authority for
the expenditure of funds collected from that category, and tourism-related projects that may
be identified as beneficial to any of the three lodging categories established in subsection 1 of
section 67.1175 shall be eligible for funding, based on the proportionate share of revenues
collected from that category. This shall include, but not be limited to, attending sports and
travel shows, printing a vacation guide, soliciting convention business, constructing or
purchasing convention facilities and visitor centers, and securing commercial air service into
the area, which may include the subsidizing of airline seats. Moneys may also be expended
by the board to contract with other entities to assist in bringing tourists to the district.
6. On and after the effective date of any tax authorized under the provisions of this
section, the advisory board shall enter into an agreement with the county collector of the
county where the district is situated for the purpose of collecting the tax. The tax to be
collected by the county collector shall be remitted to the advisory board of the district not
later than thirty days following the end of any calendar quarter. The county commission shall
adopt rules and regulations for the collection and administration of the tax. The county
collector shall retain on behalf of the county two percent for cost of collection.

HB 3013 48
67.1187. All surcharges authorized and collected under sections 67.1185 to 67.1189
shall be deposited by the county in a special trust fund to be known as the "County Tourism
Surcharge Trust Fund". The moneys in such fund shall not be commingled with any funds of
the county. Moneys in the fund shall be used solely by the county for funding public safety
services, including, but not limited to, fire protection activities and ambulance services, and
for funding the promotion of tourism within the county. Seventy-five percent of the
surcharges collected shall be used, upon appropriation, solely for funding public safety
services, and twenty-five percent of the surcharges collected shall be used, upon
appropriation, for tourism marketing and promotional purposes. The surcharge authorized
by sections 67.1185 to 67.1189 shall be in addition to any and all other taxes allowed by law,
but no order imposing a surcharge under sections 67.1185 to 67.1189 shall be effective unless
the governing body of the county submits to the voters of the county at a [county or state
general,] primary [or special] election a proposal to authorize the governing body of the
county to impose such surcharge.
67.1300. 1. The governing body of any of the contiguous counties of the third
classification without a township form of government enumerated in subdivisions (1) to (5) of
this subsection or in any county of the fourth classification acting as a county of the second
classification, having a population of at least forty thousand but less than forty-five thousand
with a state university, and adjoining a county of the first classification with part of a city with
a population of three hundred fifty thousand or more inhabitants or a county of the third
classification with a township form of government and with a population of at least eight
thousand but less than eight thousand four hundred inhabitants or a county of the third
classification with more than fifteen townships having a population of at least twenty-one
thousand inhabitants or a county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with a population of at least seven thousand four hundred but less than eight
thousand inhabitants or any county of the third classification with a population greater than
three thousand but less than four thousand or any county of the third classification with a
population greater than six thousand one hundred but less than six thousand four hundred or
any county of the third classification with a population greater than six thousand eight
hundred but less than seven thousand or any county of the third classification with a
population greater than seven thousand eight hundred but less than seven thousand nine
hundred or any county of the third classification with a population greater than eight thousand
four hundred sixty but less than eight thousand five hundred or any county of the third
classification with a population greater than nine thousand but less than nine thousand two
hundred or any county of the third classification with a population greater than ten thousand
five hundred but less than ten thousand six hundred or any county of the third classification
with a population greater than twenty-three thousand five hundred but less than twenty-three

HB 3013 49
thousand seven hundred or a county of the third classification with a population greater than
thirty-three thousand but less than thirty-four thousand or a county of the third classification
with a population greater than twenty thousand eight hundred but less than twenty-one
thousand or a county of the third classification with a population greater than fourteen
thousand one hundred but less than fourteen thousand five hundred or a county of the third
classification with a population greater than twenty thousand eight hundred fifty but less than
twenty-two thousand or a county of the third classification with a population greater than
thirty-nine thousand but less than forty thousand or a county of the third classification with a
township form of organization and a population greater than twenty-eight thousand but less
than twenty-nine thousand or a county of the third classification with a population greater
than fifteen thousand but less than fifteen thousand five hundred or a county of the third
classification with a population greater than eighteen thousand but less than nineteen
thousand seventy or a county of the third classification with a population greater than thirteen
thousand nine hundred but less than fourteen thousand four hundred or a county of the third
classification with a population greater than twenty-seven thousand but less than twenty-
seven thousand five hundred or a county of the first classification without a charter form of
government and a population of at least eighty thousand but not greater than eighty-three
thousand or a county of the third classification with a population greater than fifteen thousand
but less than fifteen thousand nine hundred without a township form of government which
does not adjoin any county of the first, second or fourth classification or a county of the third
classification with a population greater than twenty-three thousand but less than twenty-five
thousand without a township form of government which does not adjoin any county of the
second or fourth classification and does adjoin a county of the first classification with a
population greater than one hundred twenty thousand but less than one hundred fifty thousand
or in any county of the fourth classification acting as a county of the second classification,
having a population of at least forty-eight thousand or any governing body of a municipality
located in any of such counties may impose, by ordinance or order, a sales tax on all retail
sales made in such county or municipality which are subject to taxation pursuant to the
provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525:
(1) A county with a population of at least four thousand two hundred inhabitants but
not more than four thousand five hundred inhabitants;
(2) A county with a population of at least four thousand seven hundred inhabitants but
not more than four thousand nine hundred inhabitants;
(3) A county with a population of at least seven thousand three hundred inhabitants
but not more than seven thousand six hundred inhabitants;
(4) A county with a population of at least ten thousand one hundred inhabitants but
not more than ten thousand three hundred inhabitants; and

HB 3013 50
(5) A county with a population of at least four thousand three hundred inhabitants but
not more than four thousand five hundred inhabitants.
2. The maximum rate for a sales tax pursuant to this section shall be one percent for
municipalities and one-half of one percent for counties.
3. The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to any and all other sales
taxes allowed by law, except that no ordinance or order imposing a sales tax pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall be effective unless the governing body of the county or
municipality submits to the voters of the county or municipality, at a regularly scheduled
[county, municipal or state general or] primary election, a proposal to authorize the governing
body of the county or municipality to impose a tax. Any sales tax imposed pursuant to this
section shall not be authorized for a period of more than five years.
4. Such proposal shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the (city, town, village or county) of ______ impose a sales tax of
______ (insert amount) for the purpose of economic development in
the (city, town, village or county)?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in
effect on the first day of the second quarter after the director of revenue receives notice of
adoption of the tax. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed
to the proposal, then the governing body of the county or municipality shall not impose the
sales tax authorized in this section until the governing body of the county or municipality
resubmits another proposal to authorize the governing body of the county or municipality to
impose the sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by a majority of
the qualified voters voting thereon; however no such proposal shall be resubmitted to the
voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the submission of the last such proposal.
5. All revenue received by a county or municipality from the tax authorized pursuant
to the provisions of this section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used
solely for economic development purposes within such county or municipality for so long as
the tax shall remain in effect.
6. Once the tax authorized by this section is abolished or is terminated by any means,
all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall be used solely for economic development
purposes within the county or municipality. Any funds in such special trust fund which are
not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the governing body in accordance
with applicable laws relating to the investment of other county or municipal funds.

HB 3013 51
7. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue pursuant to this section on
behalf of any county or municipality, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be
deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as
100 provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created,
101 to be known as the "Local Economic Development Sales Tax Trust Fund".
102 8. The moneys in the local economic development sales tax trust fund shall not be
103 deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The
104 director of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount of money in the trust fund and
105 which was collected in each county or municipality imposing a sales tax pursuant to this
106 section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of the county or
107 municipality and the public.
108 9. Not later than the tenth day of each month the director of revenue shall distribute
109 all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the county or
110 municipality which levied the tax. Such funds shall be deposited with the county treasurer of
111 each such county or the appropriate municipal officer in the case of a municipal tax, and all
112 expenditures of funds arising from the local economic development sales tax trust fund shall
113 be by an appropriation act to be enacted by the governing body of each such county or
114 municipality. Expenditures may be made from the fund for any economic development
115 purposes authorized in the ordinance or order adopted by the governing body submitting the
116 tax to the voters.
117 10. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from
118 the amounts in the trust fund and credited to any county or municipality for erroneous
119 payments and overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited
120 to the credit of such counties and municipalities.
121 11. If any county or municipality abolishes the tax, the county or municipality shall
122 notify the director of revenue of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the
123 repeal and the director of revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one
124 year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible
125 refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to
126 the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of
127 the tax in such county or municipality, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the
128 account to the county or municipality and close the account of that county or municipality.
129 The director of revenue shall notify each county or municipality of each instance of any
130 amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county or municipality.
131 12. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
132 shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.

HB 3013 52
133 13. For purposes of this section, the term "economic development" is limited to the
134 following:
135 (1) Operations of economic development or community development offices,
136 including the salaries of employees;
137 (2) Provision of training for job creation or retention;
138 (3) Provision of infrastructure and sites for industrial development or for public
139 infrastructure projects; and
140 (4) Refurbishing of existing structures and property relating to community
141 development.
67.1303. 1. The governing body of any home rule city with more than one hundred
fifty-one thousand five hundred but less than one hundred fifty-one thousand six hundred
inhabitants, any home rule city with more than forty-five thousand five hundred but less than
forty-five thousand nine hundred inhabitants and the governing body of any city within any
county of the first classification with more than one hundred four thousand six hundred but
less than one hundred four thousand seven hundred inhabitants and the governing body of any
county of the third classification without a township form of government and with more than
forty thousand eight hundred but less than forty thousand nine hundred inhabitants or any city
within such county may impose, by order or ordinance, a sales tax on all retail sales made in
the city or county which are subject to sales tax under chapter 144. In addition, the governing
body of any county of the first classification with more than eighty-five thousand nine
hundred but less than eighty-six thousand inhabitants or the governing body of any home rule
city with more than seventy-three thousand but less than seventy-five thousand inhabitants
may impose, by order or ordinance, a sales tax on all retail sales made in the city or county
which are subject to sales tax under chapter 144. The tax authorized in this section shall not
be more than one-half of one percent. The order or ordinance imposing the tax shall not
become effective unless the governing body of the city or county submits to the voters of the
city or county at a [state general or] primary election a proposal to authorize the governing
body to impose a tax under this section. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition
to all other sales taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all other charges
and taxes.
2. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city or county) impose a sales tax
at a rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for economic
development purposes?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO


HB 3013 53
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority
of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted
under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting on the question, provided that no proposal shall be resubmitted to the
voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the submission of the last proposal.
3. No revenue generated by the tax authorized in this section shall be used for any
retail development project. At least twenty percent of the revenue generated by the tax
authorized in this section shall be used solely for projects directly related to long-term
economic development preparation, including, but not limited to, the following:
(1) Acquisition of land;
(2) Installation of infrastructure for industrial or business parks;
(3) Improvement of water and wastewater treatment capacity;
(4) Extension of streets;
(5) Providing matching dollars for state or federal grants;
(6) Marketing;
(7) Construction and operation of job training and educational facilities; and
(8) Providing grants and low-interest loans to companies for job training, equipment
acquisition, site development, and infrastructure. Not more than twenty-five percent of the
revenue generated may be used annually for administrative purposes, including staff and
facility costs.
4. All revenue generated by the tax shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall
be used solely for the designated purposes. If the tax is repealed, all funds remaining in the
special trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes. Any funds in
the special trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the
governing body in accordance with applicable laws relating to the investment of other city or
county funds.
5. Any city or county imposing the tax authorized in this section shall establish an
economic development tax board. The board shall consist of eleven members, to be
appointed as follows:
(1) Two members shall be appointed by the school boards whose districts are
included within any economic development plan or area funded by the sales tax authorized in
this section. Such members shall be appointed in any manner agreed upon by the affected
districts;

HB 3013 54
(2) One member shall be appointed, in any manner agreed upon by the affected
districts, to represent all other districts levying ad valorem taxes within the area selected for
an economic development project or area funded by the sales tax authorized in this section,
excluding representatives of the governing body of the city or county;
(3) One member shall be appointed by the largest public school district in the city or
county;
(4) In each city or county, five members shall be appointed by the chief elected
officer of the city or county with the consent of the majority of the governing body of the city
or county;
(5) In each city, two members shall be appointed by the governing body of the county
in which the city is located. In each county, two members shall be appointed by the governing
body of the county. At the option of the members appointed by a city or county the members
who are appointed by the school boards and other taxing districts may serve on the board for a
term to coincide with the length of time an economic development project, plan, or
designation of an economic development area is considered for approval by the board, or for
the definite terms as provided in this subsection. If the members representing school districts
and other taxing districts are appointed for a term coinciding with the length of time an
economic development project, plan, or area is approved, such term shall terminate upon final
approval of the project, plan, or designation of the area by the governing body of the city or
county. If any school district or other taxing jurisdiction fails to appoint members of the
board within thirty days of receipt of written notice of a proposed economic development
plan, economic development project, or designation of an economic development area, the
remaining members may proceed to exercise the power of the board. Of the members first
appointed by the city or county, three shall be designated to serve for terms of two years, three
shall be designated to serve for a term of three years, and the remaining members shall be
designated to serve for a term of four years from the date of such initial appointments.
Thereafter, the members appointed by the city or county shall serve for a term of four years,
except that all vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms in the same manner as were the
original appointments.
6. The board, subject to approval of the governing body of the city or county, shall
develop economic development plans, economic development projects, or designations of an
economic development area, and shall hold public hearings and provide notice of any such
hearings. The board shall vote on all proposed economic development plans, economic
development projects, or designations of an economic development area, and amendments
thereto, within thirty days following completion of the hearing on any such plan, project, or
100 designation, and shall make recommendations to the governing body within ninety days of the

HB 3013 55
101 hearing concerning the adoption of or amendment to economic development plans, economic
102 development projects, or designations of an economic development area.
103 7. The board shall report at least annually to the governing body of the city or county
104 on the use of the funds provided under this section and on the progress of any plan, project, or
105 designation adopted under this section.
106 8. The governing body of any city or county that has adopted the sales tax authorized
107 in this section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available
108 for elections for the city or county] at the primary election. The ballot of submission shall
109 be in substantially the following form:
110 Shall ______ (insert the name of the city or county) repeal the sales tax
111 imposed at a rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for
112 economic development purposes?
113 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
114
115 If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are in favor of repeal, that repeal shall become
116 effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If
117 a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
118 to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this section shall remain effective until the
119 question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of the city or county, and the
120 repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
121 9. Whenever the governing body of any city or county that has adopted the sales tax
122 authorized in this section receives a petition, signed by ten percent of the registered voters of
123 the city or county voting in the last gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the
124 sales tax imposed under this section, the governing body shall submit to the voters a proposal
125 to repeal the tax. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
126 thereon are in favor of the repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first
127 of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the
128 question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax shall
129 remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and
130 the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
67.1305. 1. As used in this section, the term "city" shall mean any incorporated city,
town, or village.
2. In lieu of the sales taxes authorized under sections 67.1300 and 67.1303, the
governing body of any city or county may impose, by order or ordinance, a sales tax on all
retail sales made in the city or county which are subject to sales tax under chapter 144. The
tax authorized in this section shall not be more than one-half of one percent. The order or
ordinance imposing the tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the city

HB 3013 56
or county submits to the voters of the city or county at any [citywide, county or stategeneral,]
primary [or special] election a proposal to authorize the governing body to impose a tax under
this section. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to all other sales taxes
imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes. The tax
authorized in this section shall not be imposed by any city or county that has imposed a tax
under section 67.1300 or 67.1303 unless the tax imposed under those sections has expired or
been repealed.
3. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city or county) impose a sales tax
at a rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for economic
development purposes?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority
of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted
under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting on the question, provided that no proposal shall be resubmitted to the
voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the submission of the last proposal.
4. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue under this section on behalf of
any county or municipality, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited in
the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in
section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be
known as the "Local Option Economic Development Sales Tax Trust Fund".
5. The moneys in the local option economic development sales tax trust fund shall not
be deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The
director of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount of money in the trust fund and
which was collected in each city or county imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section, and
the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of the city or county and the public.
6. Not later than the tenth day of each month the director of revenue shall distribute
all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the city or county which
levied the tax. Such funds shall be deposited with the county treasurer of each such county or
the appropriate municipal officer in the case of a municipal tax, and all expenditures of funds

HB 3013 57
arising from the local economic development sales tax trust fund shall be in accordance with
this section.
7. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from the
amounts in the trust fund and credited to any city or county for erroneous payments and
overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such cities and counties.
8. If any county or municipality abolishes the tax, the city or county shall notify the
director of revenue of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal
and the director of revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of
two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or
overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in
such city or county, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the city or
county and close the account of that city or county. The director of revenue shall notify each
city or county of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts
due the city or county.
9. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
10. (1) No revenue generated by the tax authorized in this section shall be used for
any retail development project, except for the redevelopment of downtown areas and historic
districts. Not more than twenty-five percent of the revenue generated shall be used annually
for administrative purposes, including staff and facility costs.
(2) At least twenty percent of the revenue generated by the tax authorized in this
section shall be used solely for projects directly related to long-term economic development
preparation, including, but not limited to, the following:
(a) Acquisition of land;
(b) Installation of infrastructure for industrial or business parks;
(c) Improvement of water and wastewater treatment capacity;
(d) Extension of streets;
(e) Public facilities directly related to economic development and job creation; and
(f) Providing matching dollars for state or federal grants relating to such long-term
projects.
(3) The remaining revenue generated by the tax authorized in this section may be
used for, but shall not be limited to, the following:
(a) Marketing;
(b) Providing grants and loans to companies for job training, equipment acquisition,
site development, and infrastructures;

HB 3013 58
(c) Training programs to prepare workers for advanced technologies and high skill
jobs;
(d) Legal and accounting expenses directly associated with the economic
development planning and preparation process;
(e) Developing value-added and export opportunities for Missouri agricultural
products.
11. All revenue generated by the tax shall be deposited in a special trust fund and
shall be used solely for the designated purposes. If the tax is repealed, all funds remaining in
the special trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes. Any funds
in the special trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the
governing body in accordance with applicable laws relating to the investment of other city or
county funds.
12. (1) Any city or county imposing the tax authorized in this section shall establish
an economic development tax board. The volunteer board shall receive no compensation or
operating budget.
(2) The economic development tax board established by a city shall consist of at least
five members, but may be increased to nine members. Either a five-member or nine-member
board shall be designated in the order or ordinance imposing the sales tax authorized by this
section, and the members are to be appointed as follows:
100 (a) One member of a five-member board, or two members of a nine-member board,
101 shall be appointed by the school districts included within any economic development plan or
102 area funded by the sales tax authorized in this section. Such member or members shall be
103 appointed in any manner agreed upon by the affected districts;
104 (b) Three members of a five-member board, or five members of a nine-member
105 board, shall be appointed by the chief elected officer of the city with the consent of the
106 majority of the governing body of the city;
107 (c) One member of a five-member board, or two members of a nine-member board,
108 shall be appointed by the governing body of the county in which the city is located.
109 (3) The economic development tax board established by a county shall consist of
110 seven members, to be appointed as follows:
111 (a) One member shall be appointed by the school districts included within any
112 economic development plan or area funded by the sales tax authorized in this section. Such
113 member shall be appointed in any manner agreed upon by the affected districts;
114 (b) Four members shall be appointed by the governing body of the county; and
115 (c) Two members from the cities, towns, or villages within the county appointed in
116 any manner agreed upon by the chief elected officers of the cities or villages.
117

HB 3013 59
118 Of the members initially appointed, three shall be designated to serve for terms of two years,
119 except that when a nine-member board is designated, seven of the members initially
120 appointed shall be designated to serve for terms of two years, and the remaining members
121 shall be designated to serve for a term of four years from the date of such initial appointments.
122 Thereafter, the members appointed shall serve for a term of four years, except that all
123 vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms in the same manner as were the original
124 appointments.
125 (4) If an economic development tax board established by a city is already in existence
126 on August 28, 2012, any increase in the number of members of the board shall be designated
127 in an order or ordinance. The four board members added to the board shall be appointed to a
128 term with an expiration coinciding with the expiration of the terms of the three board member
129 positions that were originally appointed to terms of two years. Thereafter, the additional
130 members appointed shall serve for a term of four years, except that all vacancies shall be
131 filled for unexpired terms in the same manner as were the additional appointments.
132 13. The board, subject to approval of the governing body of the city or county, shall
133 consider economic development plans, economic development projects, or designations of an
134 economic development area, and shall hold public hearings and provide notice of any such
135 hearings. The board shall vote on all proposed economic development plans, economic
136 development projects, or designations of an economic development area, and amendments
137 thereto, within thirty days following completion of the hearing on any such plan, project, or
138 designation, and shall make recommendations to the governing body within ninety days of the
139 hearing concerning the adoption of or amendment to economic development plans, economic
140 development projects, or designations of an economic development area. The governing
141 body of the city or county shall have the final determination on use and expenditure of any
142 funds received from the tax imposed under this section.
143 14. The board may consider and recommend using funds received from the tax
144 imposed under this section for plans, projects or area designations outside the boundaries of
145 the city or county imposing the tax if, and only if:
146 (1) The city or county imposing the tax or the state receives significant economic
147 benefit from the plan, project or area designation; and
148 (2) The board establishes an agreement with the governing bodies of all cities and
149 counties in which the plan, project or area designation is located detailing the authority and
150 responsibilities of each governing body with regard to the plan, project or area designation.
151 15. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the economic
152 development sales tax imposed under this section when imposed within a special taxing
153 district, including but not limited to a tax increment financing district, neighborhood
154 improvement district, or community improvement district, shall be excluded from the

HB 3013 60
155 calculation of revenues available to such districts, and no revenues from any sales tax
156 imposed under this section shall be used for the purposes of any such district unless
157 recommended by the economic development tax board established under this section and
158 approved by the governing body imposing the tax.
159 16. The board and the governing body of the city or county imposing the tax shall
160 report at least annually to the governing body of the city or county on the use of the funds
161 provided under this section and on the progress of any plan, project, or designation adopted
162 under this section and shall make such report available to the public.
163 17. Not later than the first day of March each year the board shall submit to the joint
164 committee on economic development a report, not exceeding one page in length, which must
165 include the following information for each project using the tax authorized under this section:
166 (1) A statement of its primary economic development goals;
167 (2) A statement of the total economic development sales tax revenues received during
168 the immediately preceding calendar year;
169 (3) A statement of total expenditures during the preceding calendar year in each of the
170 following categories:
171 (a) Infrastructure improvements;
172 (b) Land and/or buildings;
173 (c) Machinery and equipment;
174 (d) Job training investments;
175 (e) Direct business incentives;
176 (f) Marketing;
177 (g) Administration and legal expenses; and
178 (h) Other expenditures.
179 18. The governing body of any city or county that has adopted the sales tax
180 authorized in this section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any
181 date available for elections for the city or county] at the primary election. The ballot of
182 submission shall be in substantially the following form:
183 Shall ______ (insert the name of the city or county) repeal the sales tax
184 imposed at a rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for
185 economic development purposes?
186 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
187
188 If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are in favor of the repeal, that repeal shall
189 become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such repeal was
190 approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
191 thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this section shall remain

HB 3013 61
192 effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of the city
193 or county, and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the
194 question.
195 19. Whenever the governing body of any city or county that has adopted the sales tax
196 authorized in this section receives a petition, signed by ten percent of the registered voters of
197 the city or county voting in the last gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the
198 sales tax imposed under this section, the governing body shall submit to the voters a proposal
199 to repeal the tax. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
200 thereon are in favor of the repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first
201 of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the
202 question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax shall
203 remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and
204 the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
205 20. If any provision of this section or section 67.1303 or the application thereof to any
206 person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
207 application of this section or section 67.1303 which can be given effect without the invalid
208 provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section and section 67.1303 are
209 declared severable.
67.1360. 1. The governing body of the following cities and counties may impose a
tax as provided in this section:
(1) A city with a population of more than seven thousand and less than seven
thousand five hundred;
(2) A county with a population of over nine thousand six hundred and less than
twelve thousand which has a total assessed valuation of at least sixty-three million dollars, if
the county submits the issue to the voters of such county prior to January 1, 2003;
(3) A third class city which is the county seat of a county of the third classification
without a township form of government with a population of at least twenty-five thousand but
not more than thirty thousand inhabitants;
(4) Any fourth class city having, according to the last federal decennial census, a
population of more than one thousand eight hundred fifty inhabitants but less than one
thousand nine hundred fifty inhabitants in a county of the first classification with a charter
form of government and having a population of greater than six hundred thousand but less
than nine hundred thousand inhabitants;
(5) Any city having a population of more than three thousand but less than eight
thousand inhabitants in a county of the fourth classification having a population of greater
than forty-eight thousand inhabitants;

HB 3013 62
(6) Any city having a population of less than two hundred fifty inhabitants in a county
of the fourth classification having a population of greater than forty-eight thousand
inhabitants;
(7) Any fourth class city having a population of more than two thousand five hundred
but less than three thousand inhabitants in a county of the third classification having a
population of more than twenty-five thousand but less than twenty-seven thousand
inhabitants;
(8) Any third class city with a population of more than three thousand two hundred
but less than three thousand three hundred located in a county of the third classification
having a population of more than thirty-five thousand but less than thirty-six thousand;
(9) Any county of the second classification without a township form of government
and a population of less than thirty thousand;
(10) Any city of the fourth class in a county of the second classification without a
township form of government and a population of less than thirty thousand;
(11) Any county of the third classification with a township form of government and a
population of at least twenty-eight thousand but not more than thirty thousand;
(12) Any city of the fourth class with a population of more than one thousand eight
hundred but less than two thousand in a county of the third classification with a township
form of government and a population of at least twenty-eight thousand but not more than
thirty thousand;
(13) Any city of the third class with a population of more than seven thousand two
hundred but less than seven thousand five hundred within a county of the third classification
with a population of more than twenty-one thousand but less than twenty-three thousand;
(14) Any fourth class city having a population of more than two thousand eight
hundred but less than three thousand one hundred inhabitants in a county of the third
classification with a township form of government having a population of more than eight
thousand four hundred but less than nine thousand inhabitants;
(15) Any fourth class city with a population of more than four hundred seventy but
less than five hundred twenty inhabitants located in a county of the third classification with a
population of more than fifteen thousand nine hundred but less than sixteen thousand
inhabitants;
(16) Any third class city with a population of more than three thousand eight hundred
but less than four thousand inhabitants located in a county of the third classification with a
population of more than fifteen thousand nine hundred but less than sixteen thousand
inhabitants;
(17) Any fourth class city with a population of more than four thousand three hundred
but less than four thousand five hundred inhabitants located in a county of the third

HB 3013 63
classification without a township form of government with a population greater than sixteen
thousand but less than sixteen thousand two hundred inhabitants;
(18) Any fourth class city with a population of more than two thousand four hundred
but less than two thousand six hundred inhabitants located in a county of the first
classification without a charter form of government with a population of more than fifty-five
thousand but less than sixty thousand inhabitants;
(19) Any fourth class city with a population of more than two thousand five hundred
but less than two thousand six hundred inhabitants located in a county of the third
classification with a population of more than nineteen thousand one hundred but less than
nineteen thousand two hundred inhabitants;
(20) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government
with a population greater than sixteen thousand but less than sixteen thousand two hundred
inhabitants;
(21) Any county of the second classification with a population of more than forty-
four thousand but less than fifty thousand inhabitants;
(22) Any third class city with a population of more than nine thousand five hundred
but less than nine thousand seven hundred inhabitants located in a county of the first
classification without a charter form of government and with a population of more than one
hundred ninety-eight thousand but less than one hundred ninety-eight thousand two hundred
inhabitants;
(23) Any city of the fourth classification with more than five thousand two hundred
but less than five thousand three hundred inhabitants located in a county of the third
classification without a township form of government and with more than twenty-four
thousand five hundred but less than twenty-four thousand six hundred inhabitants;
(24) Any third class city with a population of more than nineteen thousand nine
hundred but less than twenty thousand in a county of the first classification without a charter
form of government and with a population of more than one hundred ninety-eight thousand
but less than one hundred ninety-eight thousand two hundred inhabitants;
(25) Any city of the fourth classification with more than two thousand six hundred
but less than two thousand seven hundred inhabitants located in any county of the third
classification without a township form of government and with more than fifteen thousand
three hundred but less than fifteen thousand four hundred inhabitants;
(26) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government
and with more than fourteen thousand nine hundred but less than fifteen thousand inhabitants;
(27) Any city of the fourth classification with more than five thousand four hundred
but fewer than five thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in more than one county;

HB 3013 64
(28) Any city of the fourth classification with more than six thousand three hundred
but fewer than six thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in more than one county
through the creation of a tourism district which may include, in addition to the geographic
area of such city, the area encompassed by the portion of the school district, located within a
county of the first classification with more than ninety-three thousand eight hundred but
fewer than ninety-three thousand nine hundred inhabitants, having an average daily
attendance for school year 2005-06 between one thousand eight hundred and one thousand
nine hundred;
100 (29) Any city of the fourth classification with more than seven thousand seven
101 hundred but less than seven thousand eight hundred inhabitants located in a county of the first
102 classification with more than ninety-three thousand eight hundred but less than ninety-three
103 thousand nine hundred inhabitants;
104 (30) Any city of the fourth classification with more than two thousand nine hundred
105 but less than three thousand inhabitants located in a county of the first classification with
106 more than seventy-three thousand seven hundred but less than seventy-three thousand eight
107 hundred inhabitants;
108 (31) Any city of the third classification with more than nine thousand three hundred
109 but less than nine thousand four hundred inhabitants;
110 (32) Any city of the fourth classification with more than three thousand eight hundred
111 but fewer than three thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the first
112 classification with more than thirty-nine thousand seven hundred but fewer than thirty-nine
113 thousand eight hundred inhabitants;
114 (33) Any city of the fourth classification with more than one thousand eight hundred
115 but fewer than one thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the first
116 classification with more than one hundred thirty-five thousand four hundred but fewer than
117 one hundred thirty-five thousand five hundred inhabitants;
118 (34) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government
119 and with more than twelve thousand one hundred but fewer than twelve thousand two
120 hundred inhabitants;
121 (35) Any city of the fourth classification with more than three thousand eight hundred
122 but fewer than four thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county; provided,
123 however, that motels owned by not-for-profit organizations are exempt;
124 (36) Any city of the fourth classification with more than five thousand but fewer than
125 five thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in any county with a charter form of
126 government and with more than two hundred thousand but fewer than three hundred fifty
127 thousand inhabitants; or

HB 3013 65
128 (37) Any city with more than four thousand but fewer than five thousand five hundred
129 inhabitants and located in any county of the fourth classification with more than thirty
130 thousand but fewer than forty-two thousand inhabitants.
131 2. The governing body of any city or county listed in subsection 1 of this section may
132 impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels,
133 motels, bed and breakfast inns, and campgrounds and any docking facility that rents slips to
134 recreational boats that are used by transients for sleeping, which shall be at least two percent
135 but not more than five percent per occupied room per night, except that such tax shall not
136 become effective unless the governing body of the city or county submits to the voters of the
137 city or county at a [state general,] primary[, or special] election, a proposal to authorize the
138 governing body of the city or county to impose a tax pursuant to the provisions of this section
139 and section 67.1362. The tax authorized by this section and section 67.1362 shall be in
140 addition to any charge paid to the owner or operator and shall be in addition to any and all
141 taxes imposed by law and the proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city or county solely
142 for funding the promotion of tourism. Such tax shall be stated separately from all other
143 charges and taxes.
67.1361. 1. The governing body of any county of the first classification without a
charter form of government and with more than eighty-five thousand nine hundred but less
than eighty-six thousand inhabitants and the governing body of any home rule city with more
than seventy-three thousand nine hundred but less than seventy-four thousand inhabitants
may impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels,
motels, bed and breakfast inns and campgrounds and any docking facility which rents slips to
recreational boats which are used by transients for sleeping, which shall be at least two
percent, but not more than eight percent per occupied room or slip per night, except that such
tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the county or city submits to the
voters of the county or city at a [state general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to
authorize the governing body of the county or city to impose a tax pursuant to this section.
The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to any charge paid to the owner or
operator and shall be in addition to any and all taxes imposed by law and the proceeds of such
tax shall be used by the city or county for funding the promotion of tourism and convention
facilities including capital expenditures therefor. Such tax shall be stated separately from all
other charges and taxes.
2. Any tax imposed by a county pursuant to subsection 1 of this section shall apply
only to unincorporated areas of such county.
3. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ (city or county) levy a tax of ______ percent on each
sleeping room or campsite occupied and rented by transient guests and

HB 3013 66
any docking facility which rents slips to recreational boats which are
used by transients for sleeping in the ______ (city or county), where
the proceeds of which shall be expended for promotion of tourism and
convention facilities?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the calendar
quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question,
then the governing body for the city or county shall have no power to impose the tax
authorized by this section unless and until the governing body of the city or county again
submits the question to the qualified voters of the city or county and such question is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
4. On and after the effective date of any tax authorized under the provisions of this
section, the city or county may adopt one of the two following provisions for the collection
and administration of the tax:
(1) The city or county may adopt rules and regulations for the internal collection of
such tax by the city or county officers usually responsible for collection and administration of
city or county taxes; or
(2) The city or county mayenter into an agreement with the director of revenue of the
state of Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in this section. In the event
any city or county enters into an agreement with the director of revenue of the state of
Missouri for the collection of the tax authorized in this section, the director of revenue shall
perform all functions incident to the administration, collection, enforcement and operation of
such tax, and the director of revenue shall collect the additional tax authorized under the
provisions of this section. The tax authorized under the provisions of this section shall be
collected and reported upon such forms and under such administrative rules and regulations
as may be prescribed by the director of revenue, and the director of revenue shall retain an
amount not to exceed one percent for cost of collection.
5. If a tax is imposed by a city or county under this section, the city or county may
collect a penalty of one percent and interest not to exceed two percent per month on unpaid
taxes which shall be considered delinquent thirty days after the last day of each quarter.
6. As used in this section "transient guests" means a person or persons who occupy
room or rooms in a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.

HB 3013 67
67.1366. 1. The governing body of a charter city with a population of more than one
hundred thousand located in a charter county of the first classification may impose a tax on
the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels, motels, bed and
breakfast inns and campgrounds which shall be at least five percent, but not more than seven
percent per occupied room per night, except that such tax shall not become effective unless
the governing body of the city submits to the voters of the city at a [stategeneral,] primary [or
special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to impose a tax under
the provisions of this section. The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to any
charge paid to the owner or operator and shall be in addition to any and all taxes imposed by
law and the proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city for funding the promotion,
operation and development of tourism and for the operating costs of a community center.
Such tax shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
2. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ (city) levy a tax of ______ percent on each
sleeping room or campsite occupied and rented by transient
guests which are used by transients for sleeping in the ______
(city), where the proceeds shall be expended for promotion of
tourism and the costs of operating a community center?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the calendar
quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question,
then the governing body for the city shall have no power to impose the tax authorized by
subsection 1 of this section unless and until the governing body of the city again submits the
question to the qualified voters of the city and such question is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting on the question.
3. On and after the effective date of any tax authorized under the provisions of
subsection 1 of this section, the city may adopt one of the two following provisions for the
collection and administration of the tax:
(1) The city may adopt rules and regulations for the internal collection of such tax by
the city officers usually responsible for collection and administration of city taxes; or
(2) The city may enter into an agreement with the director of revenue of the state of
Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in subsection 1 of this section. In the
event any city enters into an agreement with the director of revenue of the state of Missouri
for the collection of the tax authorized in subsection 1 of this section, the director of revenue

HB 3013 68
shall perform all functions incident to the administration, collection, enforcement and
operation of such tax, and the director of revenue shall collect the additional tax authorized
pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of this section. The tax authorized under the
provisions of subsection 1 of this section shall be collected and reported upon such forms and
under such administrative rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the director of
revenue, and the director of revenue shall retain an amount not to exceed one percent for cost
of collection.
4. If a tax is imposed by a city pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, the city may
collect a penalty of one percent and interest not to exceed two percent per month on unpaid
taxes which shall be considered delinquent thirty days after the last day of each quarter.
5. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to limit the power of a constitutional
charter city in a noncharter county from imposing a business license tax on hotels, motels, bed
and breakfast inns and campgrounds upon such terms, conditions and procedures as set forth
in its own charter or ordinances.
67.1451. 1. If a district is a political subdivision, the election and qualifications of
members to the district's board of directors shall be in accordance with this section. If a
district is a not-for-profit corporation, the election and qualification of members to its board
of directors shall be in accordance with chapter 355.
2. (1) The district shall be governed by a board consisting of at least five but not
more than thirty directors.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, each director shall, during his or
her entire term:
(a) Be at least eighteen years of age;
(b) Be either:
a. An owner, as defined in section 67.1401, of real property or of a business operating
within the district; or
b. A registered voter residing within the district; and
(c) Satisfy any other qualifications set forth in the petition establishing the district.
(3) In the case of districts established after August 28, 2021, if there are no registered
voters in the district on the date the petition is filed, at least one director shall, during his or
her entire term, be a person who:
(a) Resides within the municipality that established the district;
(b) Is qualified and registered to vote under chapter 115 according to the records of
the election authority as of the thirtieth day prior to the date of the applicable election;
(c) Has no financial interest in any real property or business operating within the
district; and

HB 3013 69
(d) Is not a relative within the second degree of consanguinity or affinity to an owner
of real property or a business operating in the district.
(4) If there are fewer than five owners of real property located within a district, the
board may be comprised of up to five legally authorized representatives of any of the owners
of real property located within the district.
3. If the district is a political subdivision, the board shall be elected or appointed, as
provided in the petition. However, in the case of districts established after August 28, 2021, if
the board is to be elected, the petition shall require at least one member of the board be
appointed by the governing body of the municipality in the same manner as provided in this
section for board appointments. The appointed board member shall serve a four-year term.
4. If the board is to be elected, the procedure for election shall be as follows:
(1) The municipal clerk shall specify a date on which the election shall occur which
date shall be a Tuesday and shall not be earlier than the tenth Tuesday, and shall not be later
than the fifteenth Tuesday, after the effective date of the ordinance adopted to establish the
district. After August 28, 2026, all elections under this section shall occur at the primary
election;
(2) The election shall be conducted in the same manner as provided for in section
67.1551, provided that the published notice of the election shall contain the information
required by section 67.1551 for published notices, except that it shall state that the purpose of
the election is for the election of directors, in lieu of the information related to taxes;
(3) Candidates shall pay the sum of five dollars as a filing fee and shall file not later
than the second Tuesday after the effective date of the ordinance establishing the district with
the municipal clerk a statement under oath that he or she possesses all of the qualifications set
out in this section for a director. Thereafter, such candidate shall have his or her name placed
on the ballot as a candidate for director;
(4) The director or directors to be elected shall be elected at large. The person
receiving the most votes shall be elected to the position having the longest term; the person
receiving the second highest votes shall be elected to the position having the next longest term
and so forth. For any district formed prior to August 28, 2003, of the initial directors, one-
half shall serve for a two-year term, one-half shall serve for a four-year term and if an odd
number of directors are elected, the director receiving the least number of votes shall serve for
a two-year term, until such director's successor is elected. For any district formed on or after
August 28, 2003, for the initial directors, one-half shall serve for a two-year term, and one-
half shall serve for the term specified by the district pursuant to subdivision (5) of this
subsection, and if an odd number of directors are elected, the director receiving the least
number of votes shall serve for a two-year term, until such director's successor is elected;

HB 3013 70
(5) Successor directors shall be elected in the same manner as the initial directors.
The date of the election of successor directors shall be specified by the municipal clerk which
date shall be a Tuesday and shall not be later than the date of the expiration of the stated term
of the expiring director. Each successor director shall serve a term for the length specified
prior to the election by the district, which term shall be at least three years and not more than
four years, and shall continue until such director's successor is elected.

In the event of a vacancy on the board of directors, the remaining directors shall elect an
interim director to fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.
5. If the petition provides that the board is to be appointed by the municipality, such
appointments shall be made by the chief elected officer of the municipality with the consent
of the governing body of the municipality. For any district formed prior to August 28, 2003,
of the initial appointed directors, one-half of the directors shall be appointed to serve for a
two-year term and the remaining one-half shall be appointed to serve for a four-year term
until such director's successor is appointed; provided that, if there is an odd number of
directors, the last person appointed shall serve a two-year term. For any district formed on or
after August 28, 2003, of the initial appointed directors, one-half shall be appointed to serve
for a two-year term, and one-half shall be appointed to serve for the term specified by the
district for successor directors pursuant to this subsection, and if an odd number of directors
are appointed, the last person appointed shall serve for a two-year term; provided that each
director shall serve until such director's successor is appointed. Successor directors shall be
appointed in the same manner as the initial directors and shall serve for a term of years
specified by the district prior to the appointment, which term shall be at least three years and
not more than four years.
6. If the petition states the names of the initial directors, those directors shall serve for
the terms specified in the petition and successor directors shall be determined either by the
above-listed election process or appointment process as provided in the petition.
7. Any director may be removed for cause by a two-thirds affirmative vote of the
directors of the board. Written notice of the proposed removal shall be given to all directors
prior to action thereon.
8. The board is authorized to act on behalf of the district, subject to approval of
qualified voters as required in this section; except that, all official acts of the board shall be by
written resolution approved by the board.
67.1551. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 115, an election for real estate
tax pursuant to sections 67.1401 to 67.1571 shall be conducted in accordance with the
provisions of this section.

HB 3013 71
2. After the board has passed a resolution for the levy of real property tax and a vote
of the qualified voters is required, the board shall provide written notice of such resolution to
the election authority. The board shall be entitled to rescind such resolution provided that
written notice of such rescission is delivered to the election authority prior to the time the
election authority mails the ballots to the qualified voters.
3. Upon receipt of written notice of a district's resolution for the levy of a real
property tax the election authority shall:
(1) Specify a date upon which the election shall occur which date shall be a Tuesday,
and shall be not earlier than the tenth Tuesday, and not later than the fifteenth Tuesday, after
the date of the board's passage of the resolution and shall not be on the same day as an
election conducted pursuant to the provisions of chapter 115. After August 28, 2026, such
elections shall occur at the primary election;
(2) Publish notice of the election in a newspaper of general circulation within the
municipality two times. The first publication date shall be more than sixty days prior to the
date of the election and the second publication date shall be not more than thirty days and not
less than ten days prior to the date of the election. The published notice shall include, but not
be limited to, the following information:
(a) The name and general boundaries of the district;
(b) The type of tax proposed, its rate, purpose and duration;
(c) The date the ballots for the election shall be mailed to qualified voters;
(d) The date of the election;
(e) Qualified voters will consist of:
a. Such persons who reside within the district and who are registered voters pursuant
to the records of the election authority as of the thirtieth day prior to the date of the election;
or
b. If no such registered voters reside in the district, the owners of real property located
within the district pursuant to the tax records of the county clerk, or the collector of revenue if
the district is located in a city not within a county, for real property as of the thirtieth day prior
to the date of the election;
(f) A statement that persons residing in the district shall register to vote with the
election authority on or before the thirtieth day prior to the date of the election in order to be a
qualified voter for purposes of the election;
(g) A statement that the ballot must be returned to the election authority's office in
person, or by depositing the ballot in the United States mail addressed to the election
authority's office and postmarked, not later than the date of the election; and
(h) A statement that any qualified voter that did not receive a ballot in the mail or lost
the ballot received in the mail may pick up a mail-in ballot at the election authority's office,

HB 3013 72
specifying the dates and time such ballot will be available and the location of the election
authority's office;
(3) The election authority shall mail to each qualified voter not more than fifteen days
and not less than ten days prior to the date of the election together with a notice containing
substantially the same information as the published notice and a return addressed envelope
directed to the election authority's office with a sworn affidavit on the reverse side of such
envelope for the qualified voter's signature. For purposes of mailing ballots to real property
owners only one ballot shall be mailed per capita at the address shown on the records of the
county clerk, or the collector of revenue if the district is located in a city not within a county.
Such affidavit shall be in substantially the following form:
FOR REGISTERED VOTERS:
I hereby declare under penalties of perjury that I reside in the ______
(insert name) Community Improvement District and I am a registered
voter and qualified to vote in this election.
____________________________
__
Qualified Voter's Signature
____________________________
__
Printed Name of Qualified Voter
FOR REAL PROPERTY OWNERS:
I hereby declare under penalty of perjury that I am the owner of real
property in the ______ (insert name) Community Improvement District
and qualified to vote in this election, or authorized to affix my
signature on behalf of the owner (named below) of real property in the
______ (insert name) Community Improvement District which is
qualified to vote in this election.
____________________________
__
Signature
____________________________
__
Print Name of Real Property Owner
If Signer is Different from Owner:
Name of Signer: ______
State Basis of Legal Authority to Sign: ______


HB 3013 73
All persons or entities having a fee ownership in the property shall sign the ballot. Additional
signature pages may be affixed to this ballot to accommodate all required signatures.
4. Each qualified voter shall have one vote. Each voted ballot shall be signed with the
authorized signature.
5. Mail-in ballots shall be returned to the election authority's office in person, or by
depositing the ballot in the United States mail addressed to the election authority's office and
postmarked, no later than the date of the election. The election authority shall transmit all
voted ballots to a team of judges of not less than four, with an equal number from each of the
two major political parties. The judges shall be selected by the municipal clerk from lists
compiled by the election authority. Upon receipt of the voted ballots, the judges shall verify
the authenticity of the ballots, canvass the votes, and certify the results. Certification by the
election judges shall be final and shall be immediately transmitted to the election authority.
Any qualified voter who voted in such election may contest the result in the same manner as
provided in chapter 115.
6. The results of the election shall be entered upon the records of the election
authority and a certified copy of the election results shall be filed with the municipal clerk,
who shall cause the same to be entered upon the records of the municipal clerk.
7. The district shall reimburse the election authority for the costs it incurs to conduct
an election under this section.
67.1775. 1. The governing body of a city not within a county, or any county of this
state may, after voter approval under this section, levy a sales tax not to exceed one-quarter of
a cent in the county or city, or city not within a county, for the purpose of providing services
described in section 210.861, including counseling, family support, and temporary residential
services to persons nineteen years of age or less. The question shall be submitted to the
qualified voters of the county or city, or city not within a county, at a [county or city or state
general,] primary [or special] election upon the motion of the governing body of the county or
city, or city not within a county or upon the petition of eight percent of the qualified voters of
the county or city, or city not within a county, determined on the basis of the number of votes
cast for governor in such county at the last gubernatorial election held prior to the filing of the
petition. The election officials of the county or city, or city not within a county, shall give
legal notice as provided in chapter 115. The question shall be submitted in substantially the
following form:
Shall ______ County or City, solely for the purpose of establishing a
community children's services fund for the purpose of providing
services to protect the well-being and safety of children and youth
nineteen years of age or less and to strengthen families, be authorized

HB 3013 74
to levy a sales tax of ______ (not to exceed one-quarter of a cent) in the
city or county?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in
effect on the first day of the second calendar quarter after the director receives notification of
the local sales tax. If a question receives less than the required majority, then the governing
authority of the city or county, or city not within a county, shall have no power to impose the
sales tax unless and until the governing authority of the city or county, or city not within a
county, has submitted another question to authorize the imposition of the sales tax authorized
by this section and such question is approved by the required majority of the qualified voters
voting thereon. However, in no event shall a question under this section be submitted to the
voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the last question under this section.
2. After the effective date of any tax imposed under the provisions of this section, the
director of revenue shall perform all functions incident to the administration, collection,
enforcement, and operation of the tax and the director of revenue shall collect in addition to
the sales tax for the state of Missouri the additional tax authorized under the authority of this
section. The tax imposed under this section and the tax imposed under the sales tax law of the
state of Missouri shall be collected together and reported upon such forms and under such
administrative rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the director of revenue.
3. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue under this section on behalf of
any city or county, or city not within a county, less one percent for the cost of collection,
which shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for
surety bonds as provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited with the state treasurer in a
special fund, which is hereby created, to be known as the "Community Children's Services
Fund". The moneys in the city or county, or city not within a county, community children's
services fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled with any
funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount of
money in the fund which was collected in each city or county, or city not within a county,
imposing a sales tax under this section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of
officers of each city or county, or city not within a county, and the general public. Not later
than the tenth day of each month, the director of revenue shall distribute all moneys deposited
in the fund during the preceding month by distributing to the city or county treasurer, or the
treasurer of a city not within a county, or such other officer as may be designated by a city or
county ordinance or order, or ordinance or order of a city not within a county, of each city or

HB 3013 75
county, or city not within a county, imposing the tax authorized by this section, the sum, as
certified by the director of revenue, due the city or county.
4. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from the
amounts in the fund and credited to any city or county, or city not within a county, for
erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts
deposited to the credit of such counties. Each city or county, or city not within a county, shall
notify the director of revenue at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the expiration
of the sales tax authorized by this section and the director of revenue may order retention in
the fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such
notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of such tax and to redeem dishonored checks
and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the date
of expiration of the tax authorized by this section in such city not within a county or such city
or county, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the city or county,
or city not within a county, and close the account of that city or county, or city not within a
county. The director of revenue shall notify each city or county, or city not within a county, of
each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the city or
county.
5. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
6. All revenues generated by the tax prescribed in this section shall be deposited in
the county treasury or, in a city not within a county, to the board established by law to
administer such fund to the credit of a special community children's services fund to
accomplish the purposes set out herein and in section 210.861, and shall be used for no other
purpose. Such fund shall be administered by a board of directors, established under section
210.861.
67.1922. 1. The governing body of any county containing any part of a Corps of
Engineers lake with a shoreline of at least seven hundred miles and not exceeding a shoreline
of nine hundred miles or the governing body of any county which borders on or which
contains part of a lake with not less than one hundred miles of shoreline may impose by order
one or more sales taxes, not to exceed one and one-half percent in the aggregate, on all retail
sales made in such county which are subject to taxation pursuant to the provisions of sections
144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of affecting any combination of water quality,
infrastructure, or tourism in the county. The taxes authorized by this section shall be in
addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law; except that no order imposing a sales
tax pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be effective unless the governing body of
the county submits to the voters of the county, at a [municipal or state] primary[, general or
special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose such tax.

HB 3013 76
2. Each ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the county of ______ (county's name) impose a countywide sales
tax of ______ (insert percent) for the purpose of affecting ______
(water quality, infrastructure, and tourism) (water quality and
infrastructure) (water quality and tourism) (infrastructure and tourism)
(water quality) (infrastructure) (tourism) (insert one) as provided by
law?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters of the county voting
thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the order shall become effective on the first day of
the second calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives notice of adoption of the tax.
If the proposal receives less than the required majority, then the governing body of the county
shall have no power to impose the sales tax authorized pursuant to this section unless and
until the governing body shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the
governing body to impose the sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is
approved by the required majority of the qualified voters of the county voting on such
proposal.
67.1959. 1. The board, by a majority vote, may submit to the residents of such
district a tax of not more than one percent on all retail sales, except sales of food as defined in
section 144.014, sales of new or used motor vehicles, trailers, boats, or other outboard motors,
all utilities, telephone and wireless services, and sales of funeral services, made within the
district which are subject to taxation pursuant to the provisions of sections 144.010 to
144.525. Upon the written request of the board to the election authority of the county in
which a majority of the area of the district is situated, such election authority shall submit a
proposition to the residents of such district at a [municipal or statewide] primary [or general]
election[, or at a special election called for that purpose]. Such election authority shall give
legal notice as provided in chapter 115.
2. Such proposition shall be submitted to the voters of the district in substantially the
following form at such election:
Shall the Tourism Community Enhancement District impose a sales tax
of ______ (insert amount) for the purpose of promoting tourism in the
district?

HB 3013 77
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters of the proposed district
voting thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the order shall become effective on the first
day of the second calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives notice of adoption of
the tax. If the proposal receives less than the required majority, then the board shall have no
power to impose the sales tax authorized pursuant to this section unless and until the board
shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the board to impose the sales tax
authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by the required majority of the
qualified voters of the district.
67.1974. The boundaries of the district may be expanded by the addition of either an
adjacent unincorporated or incorporated area. Upon presentation of a petition to the board
signed by two percent of registered voters residing in either the unincorporated or
incorporated area adjacent to the district. If the board determines that expansion is in the best
interest of the current district, then the board shall give written notice to the election authority
in the county in which the unincorporated or incorporated area is located to call an election.
The election authority shall submit a proposition to the residents of the unincorporated or
incorporated area at a[ municipal or state] primary [or general] election[, or at a special
election called for that purpose]. Such election authority shall give notice as provided in
chapter 115. The proposition shall be submitted to voters in the unincorporated or
incorporated area in substantially the following manner:
Shall the (unincorporated or incorporated area) of ______ (county, city,
town or village) be included in the ______ (name of district) Tourism
Community Enhancement District and any sales tax imposed by the __
____ (name of district) Tourism Community Enhancement District also
be imposed in the ______ (unincorporated or incorporated area) of ___
___ (county, city, town or village)?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".


HB 3013 78
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters of the unincorporated or
incorporated area voting thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the order shall become
effective on the first day of the second calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives
notice of adoption of the tax. If the proposal receives less than the required majority, then the
board shall have no power to impose the sales tax authorized pursuant to this section unless
and until the board shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the expansion of
the current district and such proposal is approved by the required majority of the qualified
voters of the unincorporated or incorporated area voting on such proposal.
67.2000. 1. This section shall be known as the "Exhibition Center and Recreational
Facility District Act".
2. An exhibition center and recreational facility district may be created under this
section in the following counties:
(1) Any county of the first classification with more than seventy-one thousand three
hundred but less than seventy-one thousand four hundred inhabitants;
(2) Any county of the first classification with more than one hundred ninety-eight
thousand but less than one hundred ninety-nine thousand two hundred inhabitants;
(3) Any county of the first classification with more than eighty-five thousand nine
hundred but less than eighty-six thousand inhabitants;
(4) Any county of the second classification with more than fifty-two thousand six
hundred but less than fifty-two thousand seven hundred inhabitants;
(5) Any county of the first classification with more than one hundred four thousand
six hundred but less than one hundred four thousand seven hundred inhabitants;
(6) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than seventeen thousand nine hundred but less than eighteen thousand inhabitants;
(7) Any county of the first classification with more than thirty-seven thousand but
less than thirty-seven thousand one hundred inhabitants;
(8) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than twenty-three thousand five hundred but less than twenty-three thousand six
hundred inhabitants;
(9) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than nineteen thousand three hundred but less than nineteen thousand four hundred
inhabitants;
(10) Any county of the first classification with more than two hundred forty thousand
three hundred but less than two hundred forty thousand four hundred inhabitants;
(11) Any county of the third classification with a township form of government and
with more than eight thousand nine hundred but fewer than nine thousand inhabitants;

HB 3013 79
(12) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government
and with more than eighteen thousand nine hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand
inhabitants;
(13) Any county of the third classification with a township form of government and
with more than eight thousand but fewer than eight thousand one hundred inhabitants;
(14) Any county of the third classification with a township form of government and
with more than eleven thousand five hundred but fewer than eleven thousand six hundred
inhabitants.
3. Whenever not less than fifty owners of real property located within any county
listed in subsection 2 of this section desire to create an exhibition center and recreational
facility district, the property owners shall file a petition with the governing body of each
county located within the boundaries of the proposed district requesting the creation of the
district. The district boundaries may include all or part of the counties described in this
section. The petition shall contain the following information:
(1) The name and residence of each petitioner and the location of the real property
owned by the petitioner;
(2) A specific description of the proposed district boundaries, including a map
illustrating the boundaries; and
(3) The name of the proposed district.
4. Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to this section, the governing body of any
county described in this section may, by resolution, approve the creation of a district. Any
resolution to establish such a district shall be adopted by the governing body of each county
located within the proposed district, and shall contain the following information:
(1) A description of the boundaries of the proposed district;
(2) The time and place of a hearing to be held to consider establishment of the
proposed district;
(3) The proposed sales tax rate to be voted on within the proposed district; and
(4) The proposed uses for the revenue generated by the new sales tax.
5. Whenever a hearing is held as provided by this section, the governing body of each
county located within the proposed district shall:
(1) Publish notice of the hearing on two separate occasions in at least one newspaper
of general circulation in each county located within the proposed district, with the first
publication to occur not more than thirty days before the hearing, and the second publication
to occur not more than fifteen days or less than ten days before the hearing;
(2) Hear all protests and receive evidence for or against the establishment of the
proposed district; and
(3) Rule upon all protests, which determinations shall be final.

HB 3013 80
6. Following the hearing, if the governing body of each county located within the
proposed district decides to establish the proposed district, it shall adopt an order to that
effect; if the governing body of any county located within the proposed district decides to not
establish the proposed district, the boundaries of the proposed district shall not include that
county. The order shall contain the following:
(1) The description of the boundaries of the district;
(2) A statement that an exhibition center and recreational facility district has been
established;
(3) The name of the district;
(4) The uses for any revenue generated by a sales tax imposed pursuant to this
section; and
(5) A declaration that the district is a political subdivision of the state.
7. A district established pursuant to this section may, at a [general,] primary[, or
special] election, submit to the qualified voters within the district boundaries a sales tax of
one-fourth of one percent, for a period not to exceed twenty-five years, on all retail sales
within the district, which are subject to taxation pursuant to sections 144.010 to 144.525, to
fund the acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation, improvement, and promotion of
an exhibition center and recreational facilities. The ballot of submission shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ (name of district) impose a sales tax of one-fourth of
one percent to fund the acquisition, construction, maintenance,
operation, improvement, and promotion of an exhibition center and
recreational facilities, for a period of ______ (insert number of years)?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast in the portion of any county that is part of the proposed district
favor the proposal, then the sales tax shall become effective in that portion of the county that
is part of the proposed district on the first day of the first calendar quarter immediately
following the election. If a majority of the votes cast in the portion of a county that is a part
of the proposed district oppose the proposal, then that portion of such county shall not impose
the sales tax authorized in this section until after the county governing body has submitted
100 another such sales tax proposal and the proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified
101 voters voting thereon. However, if a sales tax proposal is not approved, the governing body
102 of the county shall not resubmit a proposal to the voters pursuant to this section sooner than

HB 3013 81
103 twelve months from the date of the last proposal submitted pursuant to this section. If the
104 qualified voters in two or more counties that have contiguous districts approve the sales tax
105 proposal, the districts shall combine to become one district.
106 8. There is hereby created a board of trustees to administer any district created and the
107 expenditure of revenue generated pursuant to this section consisting of four individuals to
108 represent each county approving the district, as provided in this subsection. The governing
109 body of each county located within the district, upon approval of that county's sales tax
110 proposal, shall appoint four members to the board of trustees; at least one shall be an owner of
111 a nonlodging business located within the taxing district, or their designee, at least one shall be
112 an owner of a lodging facility located within the district, or their designee, and all members
113 shall reside in the district except that one nonlodging business owner, or their designee, and
114 one lodging facility owner, or their designee, may reside outside the district. Each trustee
115 shall be at least twenty-five years of age and a resident of this state. Of the initial trustees
116 appointed from each county, two shall hold office for two years, and two shall hold office for
117 four years. Trustees appointed after expiration of the initial terms shall be appointed to a
118 four-year term by the governing body of the county the trustee represents, with the initially
119 appointed trustee to remain in office until a successor is appointed, and shall take office upon
120 being appointed. Each trustee may be reappointed. Vacancies shall be filled in the same
121 manner in which the trustee vacating the office was originally appointed. The trustees shall
122 not receive compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed for their actual and
123 necessary expenses. The board shall elect a chair and other officers necessary for its
124 membership. Trustees may be removed if:
125 (1) By a two-thirds vote, the board moves for the member's removal and submits such
126 motion to the governing body of the county from which the trustee was appointed; and
127 (2) The governing body of the county from which the trustee was appointed, by a
128 majority vote, adopts the motion for removal.
129 9. The board of trustees shall have the following powers, authority, and privileges:
130 (1) To have and use a corporate seal;
131 (2) To sue and be sued, and be a party to suits, actions, and proceedings;
132 (3) To enter into contracts, franchises, and agreements with any person or entity,
133 public or private, affecting the affairs of the district, including contracts with any
134 municipality, district, or state, or the United States, and any of their agencies, political
135 subdivisions, or instrumentalities, for the funding, including without limitation interest rate
136 exchange or swap agreements, planning, development, construction, acquisition,
137 maintenance, or operation of a single exhibition center and recreational facilities or to
138 assist in such activity. "Recreational facilities" means locations explicitly designated for

HB 3013 82
139 public use where the primary use of the facility involves participation in hobbies or athletic
140 activities;
141 (4) To borrow money and incur indebtedness and evidence the same by certificates,
142 notes, or debentures, to issue bonds and use any one or more lawful funding methods the
143 district may obtain for its purposes at such rates of interest as the district may determine. Any
144 bonds, notes, and other obligations issued or delivered by the district may be secured by
145 mortgage, pledge, or deed of trust of any or all of the property and income of the district.
146 Every issue of such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be payable out of property and
147 revenues of the district and may be further secured by other property of the district, which
148 may be pledged, assigned, mortgaged, or a security interest granted for such payment, without
149 preference or priority of the first bonds issued, subject to any agreement with the holders of
150 any other bonds pledging any specified property or revenues. Such bonds, notes, or other
151 obligations shall be authorized by resolution of the district board, and shall bear such date or
152 dates, and shall mature at such time or times, but not in excess of thirty years, as the
153 resolution shall specify. Such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be in such
154 denomination, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such form, either coupon or
155 registered, be issued as current interest bonds, compound interest bonds, variable rate bonds,
156 convertible bonds, or zero coupon bonds, be issued in such manner, be payable in such place
157 or places, and be subject to redemption as such resolution may provide, notwithstanding
158 section 108.170. The bonds, notes, or other obligations may be sold at either public or private
159 sale, at such interest rates, and at such price or prices as the district shall determine;
160 (5) To acquire, transfer, donate, lease, exchange, mortgage, and encumber real and
161 personal property in furtherance of district purposes;
162 (6) To refund any bonds, notes, or other obligations of the district without an election.
163 The terms and conditions of refunding obligations shall be substantially the same as those of
164 the original issue, and the board shall provide for the payment of interest at not to exceed the
165 legal rate, and the principal of such refunding obligations in the same manner as is provided
166 for the payment of interest and principal of obligations refunded;
167 (7) To have the management, control, and supervision of all the business and affairs
168 of the district, and the construction, installation, operation, and maintenance of district
169 improvements therein; to collect rentals, fees, and other charges in connection with its
170 services or for the use of any of its facilities;
171 (8) To hire and retain agents, employees, engineers, and attorneys;
172 (9) To receive and accept by bequest, gift, or donation any kind of property;
173 (10) To adopt and amend bylaws and any other rules and regulations not in conflict
174 with the constitution and laws of this state, necessary for the carrying on of the business,
175 objects, and affairs of the board and of the district; and

HB 3013 83
176 (11) To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied
177 from the specific powers granted by this section.
178 10. There is hereby created the "Exhibition Center and Recreational Facility District
179 Sales Tax Trust Fund", which shall consist of all sales tax revenue collected pursuant to this
180 section. The director of revenue shall be custodian of the trust fund, and moneys in the trust
181 fund shall be used solely for the purposes authorized in this section. Moneys in the trust fund
182 shall be considered nonstate funds pursuant to Section 15, Article IV, Constitution of
183 Missouri. The director of revenue shall invest moneys in the trust fund in the same manner as
184 other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
185 credited to the trust fund. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue pursuant to this
186 section on behalf of the district, less one percent for the cost of collection which shall be
187 deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as
188 provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in the trust fund. The director of revenue shall
189 keep accurate records of the amount of moneys in the trust fund which was collected in the
190 district imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section, and the records shall be open to the
191 inspection of the officers of each district and the general public. Not later than the tenth day
192 of each month, the director of revenue shall distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund
193 during the preceding month to the district. The director of revenue may authorize refunds
194 from the amounts in the trust fund and credited to the district for erroneous payments and
195 overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
196 the district.
197 11. The sales tax authorized by this section is in addition to all other sales taxes
198 allowed by law. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and
199 32.087 apply to the sales tax imposed pursuant to this section.
200 12. Any sales tax imposed pursuant to this section shall not extend past the initial
201 term approved by the voters unless an extension of the sales tax is submitted to and approved
202 by the qualified voters in each county in the manner provided in this section. Each extension
203 of the sales tax shall be for a period not to exceed twenty years. The ballot of submission for
204 the extension shall be in substantially the following form:
205 Shall the ______ (name of district) extend the sales tax of one-fourth of
206 one percent for a period of ______ (insert number of years) years to
207 fund the acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation,
208 improvement, and promotion of an exhibition center and recreational
209 facilities?
210 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

HB 3013 84
211 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
212 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
213 opposite "NO".
214
215 If a majority of the votes cast favor the extension, then the sales tax shall remain in effect at
216 the rate and for the time period approved by the voters. If a sales tax extension is not
217 approved, the district may submit another sales tax proposal as authorized in this section, but
218 the district shall not submit such a proposal to the voters sooner than twelve months from the
219 date of the last extension submitted.
220 13. Once the sales tax authorized by this section is abolished or terminated by any
221 means, all funds remaining in the trust fund shall be used solely for the purposes approved in
222 the ballot question authorizing the sales tax. The sales tax shall not be abolished or
223 terminated while the district has any financing or other obligations outstanding; provided that
224 any new financing, debt, or other obligation or any restructuring or refinancing of an existing
225 debt or obligation incurred more than ten years after voter approval of the sales tax provided
226 in this section or more than ten years after any voter-approved extension thereof shall not
227 cause the extension of the sales tax provided in this section or cause the final maturity of any
228 financing or other obligations outstanding to be extended. Any funds in the trust fund which
229 are not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the district in the securities
230 described in subdivisions (1) to (12) of subsection 1 of section 30.270 or repurchase
231 agreements secured by such securities. If the district abolishes the sales tax, the district shall
232 notify the director of revenue of the action at least ninety days before the effective date of the
233 repeal, and the director of revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one
234 year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible
235 refunds or overpayment of the sales tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited
236 to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition
237 of the sales tax in the district, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to
238 the district and close the account of the district. The director of revenue shall notify the
239 district of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the
240 district.
241 14. In the event that the district is dissolved or terminated by any means, the
242 governing bodies of the counties in the district shall appoint a person to act as trustee for the
243 district so dissolved or terminated. Before beginning the discharge of duties, the trustee shall
244 take and subscribe an oath to faithfully discharge the duties of the office, and shall give bond
245 with sufficient security, approved by the governing bodies of the counties, to the use of the
246 dissolved or terminated district, for the faithful discharge of duties. The trustee shall have and

HB 3013 85
247 exercise all powers necessary to liquidate the district, and upon satisfaction of all remaining
248 obligations of the district, shall pay over to the county treasurer of each county in the district
249 and take receipt for all remaining moneys in amounts based on the ratio the levy of each
250 county bears to the total levy for the district in the previous three years or since the
251 establishment of the district, whichever time period is shorter. Upon payment to the county
252 treasurers, the trustee shall deliver to the clerk of the governing body of any county in the
253 district all books, papers, records, and deeds belonging to the dissolved district.
67.2030. 1. The governing authority of any city of the fourth classification with more
than one thousand six hundred but less than one thousand seven hundred inhabitants and
located in any county of the first classification with more than seventy-three thousand seven
hundred but less than seventy-three thousand eight hundred inhabitants is hereby authorized
to impose, by ordinance or order, a sales tax in the amount not to exceed one-half of one
percent on all retail sales made in such city which are subject to taxation pursuant to sections
144.010 to 144.525 for the promotion of tourism in such city. The tax authorized by this
section shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no
ordinance or order imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section shall be effective unless the
governing authority of the city submits to the qualified voters of the city, at any [municipal or
state general,] primary[, or special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing authority
of the city to impose a tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the city of ______ (city's name) impose a citywide sales tax of __
____ (insert amount) for the purpose of promoting tourism in the city?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in
effect on the first day of the first calendar quarter immediately following notification to the
director of the department of revenue of the election approving the proposal. If a proposal
receives less than the required majority, then the governing authority of the city shall have no
power to impose the sales tax unless and until the governing authority of the city has
submitted another proposal to authorize the imposition of the sales tax authorized by this
section and such proposal is approved by the required majority of the qualified voters voting
thereon. However, in no event shall a proposal pursuant to this section be submitted to the
voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the last proposal pursuant to this section.

HB 3013 86
3. On and after the effective date of any tax authorized in this section, the city may
adopt one of the two following provisions for the collection and administration of the tax:
(1) The city may adopt rules and regulations for the internal collection of such tax by
the city officers usually responsible for collection and administration of city taxes; or
(2) The city may enter into an agreement with the director of revenue of the state of
Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in this section. In the event any city
enters into an agreement with the director of revenue of the state of Missouri for the collection
of the tax authorized in this section, the director of revenue shall perform all functions
incident to the administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of such tax, and the
director of revenue shall collect the additional tax authorized in this section. The tax
authorized in this section shall be collected and reported upon such forms and under such
administrative rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the director of revenue, and the
director of revenue shall retain an amount not to exceed one percent for cost of collection.
4. If a tax is imposed by a city pursuant to this section, the city may collect a penalty
of one percent and interest not to exceed two percent per month on unpaid taxes which shall
be considered delinquent thirty days after the last day of each quarter.
5. (1) The governing authority of any city that has adopted any sales tax pursuant to
this section shall, upon filing of a petition calling for the repeal of such sales tax signed by at
least ten percent of the qualified voters in the city, submit the question of repeal of the sales
tax to the qualified voters at any primary [or general] election. The ballot of submission shall
be in substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert name of city) repeal the sales tax of ______ (insert
rate of percent) percent for tourism purposes now in effect in ______
(insert name of city)?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are in favor of repeal, that repeal shall become
effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved.
(2) Once the tax is repealed as provided in this section, all funds remaining in any
trust fund or account established to receive revenues generated by the tax shall be used solely
for the original stated purpose of the tax. Any funds which are not needed for current
expenditures may be invested by the governing authority in accordance with applicable laws
relating to the investment of other city funds.

HB 3013 87
(3) The governing authority of a city repealing a tax pursuant to this section shall
notify the director of revenue of the action at least forty-five days before the effective date of
the repeal and the director of revenue may order retention in any trust fund created in the state
treasury associated with the tax, for a period of one year, of two percent of the amount
collected after receipt of such notice to cover refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem
dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has
elapsed after the effective date of repeal of the tax in the city, the director of revenue shall
remit the balance in the trust fund to the city and close the account of that city. The director
of revenue shall notify each city of each instance of any amount refunded or any check
redeemed from receipts due the city.
(4) In the event that the repeal of a sales tax pursuant to this section dissolves or
terminates a taxing district, the governing authority of the city shall appoint a person to act as
trustee for the district so dissolved or terminated. Before beginning the discharge of duties,
the trustee shall take and subscribe an oath to faithfully discharge the duties of the office, and
shall give bond with sufficient security, approved by the governing authority of the city, to the
use of the dissolved or terminated district, for the faithful discharge of duties. The trustee
shall have and exercise all powers necessary to liquidate the district, and upon satisfaction of
all remaining obligations of the district, shall pay over to the city treasurer or the equivalent
official and take receipt for all remaining moneys. Upon payment to the city treasurer, the
trustee shall deliver to the clerk of the governing authority of the city all books, papers,
records, and deeds belonging to the dissolved district.
6. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
67.2040. 1. The governing body of any county of the third classification without a
township form of government and with more than forty-one thousand one hundred but fewer
than forty-one thousand two hundred inhabitants may impose, by order or ordinance, a sales
tax on all retail sales made within the county which are subject to sales tax under chapter 144.
The tax authorized in this section shall be equal to one-eighth of one percent, and shall be
imposed solely for the purpose of funding construction for a shelter for women and children,
as defined in section 455.200. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to all
other sales taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all other charges and
taxes. The order or ordinance shall not become effective unless the governing body of the
county submits to the voters residing within the county at a [state general,] primary[, or
special] election a proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose a tax
under this section.
2. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:

HB 3013 88
Shall ______ (insert the name of the political subdivision) impose a
sales tax at a rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent, solely for
the purpose of funding construction for a shelter for women and
children?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter immediately following notification to the department of revenue. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
3. All revenue collected under this section by the director of the department of
revenue on behalf of any county, except for one percent for the cost of collection which shall
be deposited in the state's general revenue fund, shall be deposited in a special trust fund,
which is hereby created and shall be known as the "Women's and Children's Shelter Sales Tax
Fund", and shall be used solely for the designated purposes. Moneys in the fund shall not be
deemed to be state funds, and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The
director may make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund and credited to the county for
erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts
deposited to the credit of such county. Any funds in the special trust fund which are not
needed for current expenditures shall be invested in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
4. On or after the effective date of the tax, the director of revenue shall be responsible
for the administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of the tax, and sections 32.085
and 32.087 shall apply. In order to permit sellers required to collect and report the sales tax to
collect the amount required to be reported and remitted, but not to change the requirements of
reporting or remitting the tax, or to serve as a levy of the tax, and in order to avoid fractions of
pennies, the governing body of the county may authorize the use of a bracket system similar
to that authorized in section 144.285, and notwithstanding the provisions of that section, this
new bracket system shall be used where this tax is imposed and shall apply to all taxable
transactions. Beginning with the effective date of the tax, every retailer in the county shall

HB 3013 89
add the sales tax to the sale price, and this tax shall be a debt of the purchaser to the retailer
until paid, and shall be recoverable at law in the same manner as the purchase price. For
purposes of this section, all retail sales shall be deemed to be consummated at the place of
business of the retailer.
5. All applicable provisions in sections 144.010 to 144.525, governing the state sales
tax, and section 32.057, the uniform confidentiality provision, shall apply to the collection of
the tax, and all exemptions granted to agencies of government, organizations, and persons
under sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to the imposition and
collection of the tax. The same sales tax permit, exemption certificate, and retail certificate
required by sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the administration and collection of the state sales
tax shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and no additional permit or exemption
certificate or retail certificate shall be required; except that, the director of revenue may
prescribe a form of exemption certificate for an exemption from the tax. All discounts
allowed the retailer under the state sales tax for the collection of and for payment of taxes are
hereby allowed and made applicable to the tax. The penalties for violations provided in
section 32.057 and sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to violations of
this section. If any person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required to be paid
under this section, or in the event a determination has been made against the person for taxes
and penalty under this section, the limitation for bringing suit for the collection of the
delinquent tax and penalty shall be the same as that provided in sections 144.010 to 144.525.
6. Any sales tax imposed under this section shall expire three years after the date such
tax becomes effective, unless such tax is repealed under this section before the expiration date
provided for in this subsection.
7. The governing body of any county that has adopted the sales tax authorized in this
section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for
elections for the county] at the primary election. The ballot of submission shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the political subdivision) repeal the
sales tax imposed at a rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for
the purpose of funding construction for a shelter for women and
children?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".


HB 3013 90
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this
section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the
qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the
question.
8. Whenever the governing body of any county that has adopted the sales tax
authorized in this section receives a petition, signed by ten percent of the registered voters of
the county voting in the last gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the sales
tax imposed under this section, the governing body shall submit to the voters of the county a
proposal to repeal the tax. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified
voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal, the repeal shall become effective on
100 December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of
101 the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal,
102 then the sales tax authorized in this section shall remain effective until the question is
103 resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority
104 of the qualified voters voting on the question.
105 9. If the tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the special
106 trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes, and the county shall
107 notify the director of the department of revenue of the action at least thirty days before the
108 effective date of the repeal and the director may order retention in the trust fund, for a period
109 of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover
110 possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts
111 deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of
112 abolition of the tax in such county, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the
113 county and close the account of that county. The director shall notify each county of each
114 instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
68.250. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 115 except the provisions of
section 115.125, when applicable, an election for any proposed real property tax or proposed
sales and use tax, or both, within a district pursuant to this act shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
2. After the board has passed a resolution approving the levy of a real property tax or
a sales and use tax, or both, the board shall provide written notice of such resolution, along
with the circuit court's certified question regarding the real property tax or the sales and use
tax, or both, as applicable, to the election authority. The board shall be entitled to repeal or
amend such resolution provided that written notice of such repeal or amendment is delivered

HB 3013 91
to the election authority prior to the date that the election authority mails the ballots to the
qualified voters.
3. Upon receipt of written notice of a port authority's resolution, along with the circuit
court's certified question, for the levy of a real property tax or a sales and use tax, or both, the
election authority shall:
(1) Specify a date upon which the election shall occur, which date shall be a Tuesday
and shall be, unless otherwise approved by the board and election authority and applicable
circuit court pursuant to section 115.125, not earlier than the tenth Tuesday, and not later than
the fifteenth Tuesday, after the date the board passes the resolution and shall not be on the
same day as an election conducted pursuant to the provisions of chapter 115. After August
28, 2026, the election shall occur at the primary election;
(2) Publish notice of the election in a newspaper of general circulation within the
municipality two times. The first publication date shall be not more than forty-five, but not
less than thirty-five, days prior to the date of the election and the second publication date shall
be not more than twenty, and not less than ten, days prior to the date of the election. The
published notice shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:
(a) The name and general boundaries of the district;
(b) The type of tax proposed (real property tax or sales and use tax or both), its rate or
rates, and its purpose or purposes;
(c) The date the ballots for the election shall be mailed to qualified voters;
(d) The date of the election;
(e) The applicable definition of qualified voters;
(f) A statement that persons residing in the district shall register to vote with the
election authority on or before the thirtieth day prior to the date of the election in order to be a
qualified voter for purposes of the election;
(g) A statement that the ballot shall be returned to the election authority's office in
person, or by depositing the ballot in the United States mail addressed to the election
authority's office and postmarked not later than the date of the election; and
(h) A statement that any qualified voter that did not receive a ballot in the mail or lost
the ballot received in the mail may pick up a mail-in ballot at the election authority's office,
specifying the dates and time such ballot will be available and the location of the election
authority's office;
(3) The election authority shall mail the ballot, a notice containing substantially the
same information as the published notice and a return addressed envelope directed to the
election authority's office with a sworn affidavit on the reverse side of such envelope for the
qualified voter's signature, to each qualified voter not more than fifteen days and not less than
ten days prior to the date of the election. For purposes of mailing ballots to real property

HB 3013 92
owners, only one ballot shall be mailed per capita at the address shown on the official, or
recorded, real estate records of the county recorder, or the city recorder of deeds if the district
is located in a city not within a county, as of the thirtieth day prior to the date of the election.
Such affidavit shall be in substantially the following form:
FOR REGISTERED VOTERS:
I hereby declare under penalties of perjury that I reside in the ______
Port Improvement District No. ______ (insert name of district) and I
am a registered voter and qualified to vote in this election.
_______________
Qualified Voter's Signature
_______________
Printed Name of Qualified Voter
FOR REAL PROPERTY OWNERS:
I hereby declare under penalty of perjury that I am the owner of real
property in the ______ Port Improvement District No. ______ (insert
name of district) and qualified to vote in this election, or authorized to
affix my signature on behalf of the owner (named below) of real
property in the ______ Port Improvement District No. ______ (insert
name of district) which is qualified to vote in this election.
_______________
Signature
_______________
Print Name of Real Property Owner
If Signer is Different from Owner:
Name of Signer: ______
State Basis of Legal Authority to Sign: ______

All persons or entities having a fee ownership in the property shall sign the ballot. Additional
signature pages may be affixed to this ballot to accommodate all required signatures.
4. Each qualified voter shall have one vote. Each voted ballot shall be signed with the
authorized signature.
5. Mail-in ballots shall be returned to the election authority's office in person, or by
depositing the ballot in the United States mail addressed to the election authority's office and
postmarked no later than the date of the election. The election authority shall transmit all
voted ballots to a team of judges of not less than four. The judges shall be selected by the
election authority from lists it has compiled prior to the date by which the mail-in ballots must
be returned. Upon receipt of the voted ballots, the judges shall verify the authenticity of the

HB 3013 93
ballots, canvass the votes, and certify the results. Certification by the election judges shall be
final and shall be immediately transmitted to the election authority. Any qualified voter who
voted in such election may contest the result in the same manner as provided in chapter 115.
6. The results of the election shall be entered upon the records of the election
authority and two certified copies of the election results shall be filed with the port authority
and entered upon the records of the port authority.
7. The port authority shall reimburse the election authority for the costs it incurs to
conduct an election under this section.
8. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, nothing in this act shall prevent a port
authority from proposing both a real property tax levy question and a sales and use tax levy
question to the district's qualified voters in the same election.
9. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, this section shall not apply when the port
authority is the owner of all of the real property within the proposed district.
71.800. 1. For the purpose of paying for all costs and expenses incurred in the
operation of the district, the provision of services or improvements authorized in section
71.796, and incidental to the leasing, construction, acquisition, and maintenance of any
improvements provided for under sections 71.790 to 71.808 or for paying principal and
interest on notes or bonds authorized for the construction or acquisition of any said
improvement, the district may impose a tax upon the owners of real property within the
district which shall not exceed eighty-five cents on the one-hundred-dollar assessed valuation.
In any city other than a city not within a county, real property subject to partial tax abatement
under either the provisions of the urban redevelopment corporations law of Missouri or the
provisions of sections 99.700 to 99.710 shall for the purpose of assessment and collection of
ad valorem real estate taxes levied under the provisions of this section be assessed and ad
valorem real estate taxes shall be collected as if the real estate were not subject to the tax
abatement. The collection of delinquent receipts of said tax shall be in the same manner and
form as that provided by law for all ad valorem property taxes. Taxes levied and collected
under sections 71.790 to 71.808 shall be uniform upon the same class of subjects within the
territorial limits of the authority levying the tax.
2. For the purpose of paying for all costs and expenses incurred in the operation of the
district and the provision of services or improvements authorized in section 71.796, the
district may impose additional tax on businesses and individuals doing business within the
district. If the governing body imposes any business license taxes, such additional taxes shall
not exceed fifty percent of the business license taxes. Whenever a hearing is held herein, the
governing body shall hear all protests and receive evidence for or against the proposed action;
rule upon all protests which determination shall be final; and may continue the hearing from
time to time. Proceedings shall terminate if protest is made by businesses in the proposed

HB 3013 94
area which pay a majority of the additional taxes within the area. For purposes of the
additional tax to be imposed pursuant to this part, the governing body of the city may make a
reasonable classification of businesses, giving consideration to various factors.
3. In addition to the taxes authorized by subsections 1 and 2 of this section, any
district within a city which has a population of three hundred fifty thousand or more and is
located within more than one county upon authorization of a majority of the voters voting
thereon may impose one or more of the following special assessments on all real property
located within the district:
(1) Not more than five cents per square foot on each square foot of land;
(2) Not more than one-half of a cent per square foot on each square foot of
improvements on land; and
(3) Not more than twelve dollars per abutting foot of the lots, tracts and parcels of
land within the district abutting on public streets, roads and highways.
4. For purposes of sections 10(c), 16, and 22 of article X of the Constitution of
Missouri, and of section 137.073, the following terms as applied to an election pursuant to
this section mean:
(1) "Approval of the required majority" or "direct voter approval", a simple majority;
(2) "Qualified voters", persons or other entities who have filed an application
pursuant to subsection 6 of this section.
5. The governing body of any city in which there is a special business district may
order an election on the approval of a new tax rate ceiling or assessment limit for any tax
imposed pursuant to subsections 1 to 3 of this section. All costs of any such election shall be
borne by the district out of its existing levy. The order shall set forth the new tax rate ceiling
or assessment limit proposed. Any provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the tax
rate ceiling may be increased or decreased, from any rate as revised under the provisions of
section 137.073 to any rate not in excess of eighty-five cents on the one-hundred-dollar
assessed valuation. Such order shall specify a date on which ballots for the election shall be
mailed. [Such date shall be a Tuesday, and shall be not earlier than the eighth Tuesday from
the issuance of the order, nor later than August fifteenth of the year the order is issued and
shall not be on the same day as an election conducted under the provisions of chapter 115.]
Such election shall take place on the primary election day.
6. Application for a ballot shall be conducted as provided in this subsection:
(1) Persons entitled to apply for a ballot in an election to approve a new tax rate
ceiling for a tax imposed pursuant to subsection 1 or 3 of this section shall be:
(a) A resident individual of the district; or
(b) A person, including an individual, partnership, limited partnership, corporation,
estate, or trust, which owns real property within the special business district;

HB 3013 95
(2) A person entitled to apply for a ballot in an election to approve a new tax rate
ceiling for a tax imposed pursuant to subsection 2 of this section shall be a person, including
an individual, partnership, limited partnership, corporation, estate, or trust, which possesses a
license to do business in the district;
(3) Only persons entitled to apply for a ballot in elections pursuant to this section
shall apply. Such persons shall apply with the clerk of the city in which the special business
district is organized. Each person applying shall provide:
(a) Such person's name, address, mailing address, and phone number;
(b) An authorized signature; and
(c) Evidence that such person is entitled to vote. Such evidence shall be:
a. For resident individuals, proof of registration from the election authority;
b. For owners of real property, a tax receipt or deed or other document which
evidences an equitable ownership, and identifies the real property by location;
c. For holders of business licenses, a copy of such business license;
(4) No person shall apply later than the fourth Tuesday before the date for mailing
ballots specified in the governing body's order.
7. The clerk shall mail a ballot to each applicant of the district along with a return
addressed envelope directed to the city clerk's office with a sworn affidavit on the reverse side
of such envelope for the voter's signature. Such affidavit shall be in the following form:
I hereby declare under penalties of perjury that I am qualified to vote,
or to affix my authorized signature in the name of an entity which is
entitled to vote, in this election.
________________________
Authorized Signature Subscribed and sworn to
before me this ______ day
of ______, 20______
________________________
Printed Name of Voter
________________________ ________________________
Address of Voter Signature of notary or other
officer authorized to administer
oaths
________________________
Mailing Address of Voter
(if different)
8. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following forms:

HB 3013 96
(1) Shall the special business district of ______ be authorized to impose a tax
on owners of real property in a sum not to exceed ______ cents on the one
100 hundred dollar assessed valuation?
101 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
102 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "YES".
103 If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "NO".
104 (2) Shall the special business district of ______ be authorized to impose its
105 business license tax on businesses and individuals doing business within the
106 special business district in an amount not to exceed ______ percent of the
107 business license tax imposed by ______?
108 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
109 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "YES".
110 If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "NO".
111 (3) Shall the special business district of ______ be authorized to impose a
112 special assessment not to exceed ______ cents per square foot on each
113 square foot of land within the district?
114 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
115 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "YES".
116 If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "NO".
117 (4) Shall the special business district of ______ be authorized to impose a
118 special assessment not to exceed ______ cents per square foot on each
119 square foot of improvements on land within the district?
120 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
121 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "YES".
122 If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "NO".
123 (5) Shall the special business district of ______ be authorized to impose a
124 special assessment not to exceed ______ dollars per abutting foot of the
125 lots, tracts and parcels of land within the district abutting on public streets,
126 roads and highways?
127 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
128 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "YES".
129 If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "NO".
130 (6) Shall the special business district of ______ change its tax on ______ to ___
131 ___?
132 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

HB 3013 97
133 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "YES".
134 If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box opposite "NO".
135
136 Each ballot shall be plain paper, through which printing or writing cannot be read.
137 9. Each qualified voter shall have one vote. Each voter which is not an individual
138 shall determine how to cast its vote as provided for in its articles of incorporation, articles of
139 partnership, bylaws, or other document which sets forth an appropriate mechanism for the
140 determination of the entity's vote. If a voter has no such mechanism, then its vote shall be
141 cast as determined by a majority of the persons who run the day-to-day affairs of the voter.
142 Each voted ballot shall be signed with the authorized signature.
143 10. Voted ballots shall be returned to the city clerk's office by mail or hand delivery
144 no later than 5:00 p.m. on the sixth Tuesday after the date for mailing the ballots as set forth
145 in the governing body's order. The city clerk shall transmit all voted ballots to a team of
146 judges of not less than four, with an equal number from each of the two major political
147 parties. The judges shall be selected by the city clerk from lists compiled by the election
148 authority. Upon receipt of the voted ballots the judges shall verify the authenticity of the
149 ballots, canvass the votes, and certify the results. Certification by the election judges shall be
150 final and shall be immediately transmitted to the governing body. Any voter who applied for
151 such election may contest the result in the same manner as provided in chapter 115.
152 11. If approved, the new tax rate ceiling or assessment limit shall be effective for the
153 tax year in which the election is held, the provisions of section 67.110 to the contrary
154 notwithstanding.
71.1000. 1. Two or more municipalities may elect to form a broadband infrastructure
improvement district for the delivery of broadband internet service to the residents of such
municipality, which district shall be a body politic and corporate.
2. A municipality electing to form a district under this section shall submit to the
eligible voters of each such municipality a proposition at a [general or special] primary
election [of such municipality], in substantially the following form:
"Shall the municipality of ___________ enter into a broadband
infrastructure improvement district to be known as ___________
_____?"
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
3. Additional municipalities may be admitted to the district in the manner provided in
subsection 8 of this section.
4. A district created under this section shall have the power to partner with a
telecommunications company or broadband service provider in order to construct or improve

HB 3013 98
telecommunications facilities which shall be wholly owned and operated by the
telecommunications company or broadband service provider, as the terms
"telecommunications company" and "telecommunications facilities" are defined in section
386.020 and subject to the provisions of section 392.410, that are in an unserved or
underserved area, as defined in section 620.2450, to the residents of the district. Before any
facilities are improved or constructed as a result of this section, the area shall be certified as
unserved or underserved by the director of broadband development within the department of
economic development.
5. A district may finance the provision or expansion of broadband internet service
through grants, loans, bonds, user fees, or a tax as set forth in subsection 6 of this section.
6. (1) Any district may impose by resolution a sales tax on all retail sales made in
such district which are subject to taxation pursuant to sections 144.010 to 144.525. The sales
tax imposed pursuant to this subsection shall not exceed one percent, except that such tax
shall not become effective unless the governing body of each municipality member of the
district submits to the voters of such municipality at an election held on the first Tuesday after
the first Monday in [November] August of even-numbered years, a proposal to authorize the
district to impose a tax under the provisions of this subsection. The tax authorized by this
subsection shall be in addition to any and all taxes imposed by law, and the proceeds of such
tax shall be used solely to provide broadband service to residents of the district. Such tax
shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
(2) The ballot shall be substantially in the following form:
"Shall the _________ (insert name of district) impose a districtwide
sales tax at the rate of _________ (insert amount) for the purpose of
providing broadband services to residents of the district?"
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon in each
municipality are in favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day
of the calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon in any one
municipality are opposed to the question, then the governing body for the district shall have
no power to impose the tax authorized by this subsection.
(3) The director of the department of revenue shall collect any tax adopted pursuant to
this section pursuant to section 32.087.

HB 3013 99
7. (1) The district governing board shall be composed of at least one representative
from each member, but in no case shall there be less than four representatives.
(2) Annually, on or before the last Monday in April commencing in the year
following the effective date of the district's creation, the local governing body of each
member shall appoint a representative to the district governing board for three-year terms.
The local governing body of a member, by majority vote, may replace its appointed
representative at any time.
(3) For the purpose of transacting business, the presence of representatives
representing more than fifty percent of district members shall constitute a quorum. Any
action adopted by a majority of the votes cast at a meeting of the governing board at which a
quorum is present shall be the action of the board.
(4) Each district member's representative shall be entitled to cast one vote.
(5) Unless replaced as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a representative
on the governing board shall hold office until his or her successor is duly appointed. Any
representative may be reappointed to successive terms without limit.
(6) Any vacancy on the board shall be filled within thirty days after such vacancy
occurs by appointment of the local governing body which appointed the representative whose
position has become vacant. An appointee to a vacancy shall serve until the expiration of the
term of the representative whose position to the appointment was made and may thereafter be
reappointed.
(7) Each district member may reimburse its representative to the governing board for
expenses as it determines reasonable.
(8) (a) The officers of the district shall be the chair and the vice chair of the board,
the clerk of the district, and the treasurer of the district.
(b) The chair shall preside at all meetings of the board and shall make and sign all
contracts on behalf of the district upon approval by the board. The chair shall perform all
duties incident to the position and office.
(c) During the absence of or inability of the chair to render or perform his or her
duties or exercise his or her powers, the same shall be performed and exercised by the vice
chair and when so acting, the vice chair shall have all the powers and be subject to all the
responsibilities hereby given to or imposed upon the chair.
(d) During the absence or inability of the vice chair to render or perform his or her
duties or exercise his or her powers, the board shall elect from among its membership an
acting vice chair who shall have the powers and be subject to all the responsibilities hereby
given or imposed upon the vice chair.
(e) Upon the death, disability, resignation, or removal of the chair or vice chair, the
board shall elect a successor to such vacant office until the next annual meeting.

HB 3013 100
(9) The board shall adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its
business.
8. (1) The board may authorize the inclusion of additional district members in the
broadband infrastructure improvement district upon such terms and conditions as in the
board's sole discretion shall be deemed to be fair, reasonable, and in the best interests of the
district.
(2) Prior to applying for admission to a broadband infrastructure improvement
district, a municipality electing to join a district shall submit to the eligible voters of the
municipality a proposition at a [general or special] primary election [of such municipality],
in substantially the following form:
"Shall the municipality of ___________ join the broadband
100 infrastructure improvement district known as _________________?"
101 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
102
103 The local governing body of any nonmember municipality which desires to be admitted to the
104 district shall make application for admission to the board after an affirmative result from such
105 election.
106 (3) The board shall determine the financial, economic, governance, and operational
107 effects that are likely to occur if such municipality is admitted and thereafter either grant or
108 deny authority for admission of the petitioning municipality. If the board grants such
109 authority, it shall also specify any terms and conditions, including financial obligations, upon
110 which such admission is predicated. Upon resolution of the board, such applicant
111 municipality shall become a district member.
112 9. A district member may withdraw from the district in the same manner as the vote
113 for admission to the district set forth in subsection 8 of this section.
114 10. Dissolution of a broadband infrastructure improvement district created pursuant
115 to this section shall follow the procedures established in sections 67.950 and 67.955.
72.420. 1. The provisions of this section shall apply to the consolidation of two or
more cities, towns, villages, unincorporated areas, or any combination thereof, in any county
with a charter form of government where fifty or more cities, towns and villages have been
incorporated. If a boundary commission has been established pursuant to [section] sections
72.400 to 72.423, such proposal shall be submitted to the commission, but if no such
commission has been established, consolidation of such areas shall be accomplished pursuant
to this section. All municipalities and unincorporated areas which may be consolidated under
the procedures established in this section must be contiguous to each other, so that if the
consolidation is approved by the voters pursuant to subsections 7 to 9 of this section, there

HB 3013 101
will be one municipality with all parts contiguous to at least one other portion of the new
municipality.
2. Whenever a petition for consolidation containing the signatures of at least fifteen
percent of the qualified voters of each municipality or unincorporated area, determined on the
basis of the number of votes cast for governor at the last gubernatorial election held prior to
the filing of the petition, is received by the governing body of the county, the governing body
of the county shall submit the question of consolidation to the qualified voters of each
municipality and unincorporated area named in the petition at the next [state or county]
primary[, general or special] election. The petition need not contain signatures of qualified
voters of a municipality if the governing body of such municipality adopts an ordinance
approving the proposed consolidation which meets the requirements of subsection 5 of this
section, and sends a copy of the ordinance to the governing body of the county in conjunction
with the petition prescribed by this subsection.
3. A petition for consolidation shall contain the following:
(1) The names of the municipalities and a description of any unincorporated area to
be consolidated;
(2) The proposed effective date of consolidation;
(3) The number of votes cast in the last election in each municipality and
unincorporated area; and
(4) A statement that all signers are registered voters in the affected municipalities or
unincorporated areas.

The petition may contain the form of government, the name of the municipality as
consolidated and the details of transition, such as which officers will serve, which employees
shall be retained, what taxes will be collected, what ordinances will be in effect and similar
matters for the operation of the consolidated municipality until the new governing body
provides otherwise.
4. All persons signing the petition for consolidation shall designate their address
opposite their signatures, and such signatures shall be affixed before a person who shall
certify, by affidavit acknowledged before a notary public, that such signatures were affixed in
his presence.
5. Any ordinance approving a proposed consolidation shall contain the following:
(1) The names of the municipalities and a description of any unincorporated area to
be consolidated;
(2) The proposed effective date of the consolidation;
(3) The number of votes cast in the last election in that municipality.


HB 3013 102
The ordinance may contain the form of government, the name of the municipality as
consolidated, and the details of transition prescribed in subsection 3 of this section.
6. The costs of an election held under this section shall be assessed proportionately to
each municipality; however, when a voting jurisdiction is composed of unincorporated
territory or territories, all costs of the election in such voting jurisdictions shall be paid
proportionally by each municipality in the proposed consolidation. Proportional election
costs paid under this section shall be assessed by charging each municipality the same
percentage of the total cost of the election as the number of registered voters of the
municipality on the day of the election is to the total number of registered voters on the day of
the election, derived by adding together the number of registered voters in each municipality.
7. The question shall be submitted separately, but on the same date, to each
municipality and unincorporated area described in the petition or ordinances filed pursuant to
subsections 2 to 5 of this section. The question shall be submitted in substantially the
following form:
Shall the municipalities of ______ (list all municipalities) be
consolidated into one municipality?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

The consolidation shall only become effective if a separate majority of the votes cast on the
proposal in each municipality and unincorporated area affected by such proposal are in favor
of the consolidation. If the voters of any municipality or unincorporated area vote against
such proposal, the consolidation shall not take effect, even if the voters of all other
municipalities and unincorporated areas vote in favor of the proposal.
8. If a consolidation is approved by the voters, such proposal shall be effective six
months following the date of the election or the date specified in such proposal, whichever
date is later. Immediately following the certification of the election, the governing body of
each affected municipality shall select two members and the governing body of the county in
which each unincorporated territory is situated shall select two members from each affected
unincorporated territory to meet with similar members appointed from other affected
municipalities and unincorporated territories in order to determine the details of the transition.
9. If the consolidation is approved, it shall create a new municipality, and the
governing body of the county shall declare such municipality, designating in such order the
metes and bounds thereof, and henceforth the inhabitants within such bounds shall be a body
politic and incorporate, by the name and style of "the city of ______".
72.422. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of sections 72.400 to 72.420 to the
contrary, residents of an unincorporated area of a county may remain unincorporated and not

HB 3013 103
subject to any boundary change pursuant to sections 72.400 to 72.420 if the following are
satisfied:
(1) The county petitions the boundary commission;
(2) A legal description of the unincorporated area accompanies the petition. If there
is a minor error or discrepancy in the legal description of the unincorporated area, the
commission, with the concurrence of the county, may make such changes to the proposal as
are necessary to rectify the error in the legal description;
(3) The unincorporated area either contains a population of not less than two thousand
five hundred or is contiguous with an existing established unincorporated area;
(4) A plan of intent accompanies the petition addressing the issues to be considered
by the commission.
2. When an unincorporated area proposal has been submitted to the commission, the
commission shall, within twenty-one days of receipt of such proposal, publish notice of such
proposal and the date of the public hearing thereon in at least one newspaper of general
circulation qualified to publish legal notices. Within twenty-one days of receipt of such
proposal, the commission shall also mail written notification of such proposal and public
hearing date to the county clerk, and to the city or village clerk of each neighboring
municipality or village, and to any other political subdivision which, in the opinion of the
commission, is materially affected by the proposal. The costs of publication and notification
shall be borne by the county. The commission shall hold such public hearing concerning the
proposal not less than fourteen nor more than sixty days after such publication and
notification are complete. At such public hearing, the county and any municipality with an
overlapping map plan shall be parties, and any other interested person, corporation, or
political subdivision may also present evidence regarding the unincorporated area proposal.
An unincorporated area proposal which has been disapproved by the commission and which
is resubmitted with changes to the commission shall be subject to the public hearing
requirement of this section, unless the commission determines that a public hearing on the
resubmitted proposal is not necessary to achieve the objectives of this section. The
commission shall issue findings approving or disapproving such proposal within nine months
after submittal, except that final action may be deferred on part or all of an unincorporated
proposal when necessary to accommodate an overlapping boundary change proposal as more
particularly provided in subsection 10 of section 72.405. The proposal shall be submitted at
the next [general or special] primary election in accordance with the provisions of chapter
115. The cost of the election shall be paid by the county. If the proposal is approved by the
voters then the area shall be an established unincorporated area and shall remain
unincorporated territory for a period of five years from the date of the vote and shall not
be subject to any boundary change pursuant to sections 72.400 to 72.420.

HB 3013 104
3. In reviewing any proposed unincorporated area proposal, the commission shall
approve such proposal if it finds that continued provision of local services to the area by the
county will not impose an unreasonable burden on county government and that such
designation is in the best interest of the unincorporated territories affected by the proposal and
the areas of the county next to such area. In making its determination, the commission shall
consider the following factors:
(1) The impact, including but not limited to the impact on the tax base or on the
ability to raise revenue, of such proposal on:
(a) The area subject to the proposed established unincorporated area and its residents;
(b) Adjoining areas not involved in the proposed established area and the residents
thereof; and
(c) The entire geographic area of the county and its residents;
(2) A legal description of the unincorporated area;
(3) The creation of logical and reasonable municipal boundaries in the county, and for
such purpose the commission shall have the ability to make additions, deletions and
modifications which address legal boundaries, technical or service delivery problems or
boundaries which overlap those of other proposals; however, such additions, deletions and
modifications shall not make substantial changes to any proposed unincorporated area
proposal;
(4) Whether approval of the unincorporated area proposal will result in unreasonable
difficulty in provision of services by the county;
(5) The effect approval of the established unincorporated area will have on the
distribution of tax resources in the county;
(6) The compactness of the area subject to such proposal.
4. After approval by the voters of an unincorporated area proposal, no boundary
change affecting any part of such area shall be proposed to the commission until expiration of
the area's status as an established unincorporated area, but map plans affecting the area may
be filed during the planning period pursuant to section 72.423. If no map plan of a boundary
change proposal with respect to an established unincorporated area has been submitted during
the most recent planning period pursuant to section 72.423, the commission shall commence
review of the circumstances of such established unincorporated area six months prior to its
expiration, and shall submit reauthorization of such unincorporated area to the voters if the
commission determines that its circumstances have not materially changed since it was
approved.
78.090. 1. [Candidates to be voted for at all general municipal elections at which a
mayor and councilmen are to be elected under the provisions of sections 78.010 to 78.400
shall be nominated by a primary election, except as provided in this section, and no other

HB 3013 105
names shall be placed upon the general ballot except those selected in the manner herein
prescribed. The primary election for such nomination shall be held on the first Tuesday after
the first Monday in February preceding the municipal election.
2. (1) In lieu of conducting a primary election under this section, any city organized
under sections 78.010 to 78.400 may, by order or ordinance, provide for the elimination of the
primary election and the conduct of elections for mayor and councilman as provided in this
subsection.
(2)] Any person desiring to become a candidate for mayor or councilman shall file
with the city clerk a signed statement of such candidacy, stating whether such person is a
resident of the city and a qualified voter of the city, that the person desires to be a candidate
for nomination to the office of mayor or councilman to be voted upon at the next municipal
election for such office, that the person is eligible for such office, that the person requests to
be placed on the ballot, and that such person will serve if elected. Such statement shall be
sworn to or affirmed before the city clerk.
[(3)] 2. Under the requirements of section 115.023, the city clerk shall notify the
requisite election authority who shall cause the official ballots to be printed, and the names of
the candidates shall appear on the ballots in the order that their statements of candidacy were
filed with the city clerk. Above the names of the candidates shall appear the words "Vote for
(number to be elected)". The ballot shall also include a warning that voting for more than the
total number of candidates to be elected to any office invalidates the ballot.
78.280. 1. Nominations hereunder shall be made [without the intervention of a
primary election] by filing with the clerk a statement of candidacy accompanied by a petition
signed by voters of the city, equal in number to at least ten percent of the entire vote for all
candidates for the office of mayor at the last preceding municipal election.
2. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Election for the balance or the unexpired term of ______ as ______ for
______.
Vote for one only.
Names of candidates.
78.530. 1. [As an alternative to conducting city elections as provided by sections
78.470 to 78.520, the city council may provide by ordinance for the elimination of the
primary election and the conduct of city elections as provided in this section.
2.] Any person desiring to become a candidate for councilman shall file with the city
clerk a statement of such candidacy in substantially the following form:
State of Missouri, )
) ss.
County of ______ )

HB 3013 106
I, ______, being first duly sworn, say that I reside at ______ street, city
of ______, county of ______, state of Missouri; that I am a qualified
voter therein; that I am a candidate for nomination to the office of
councilman to be voted upon at the [municipal] primary election to be
held on ______ Tuesday of ______, 20______, and am eligible
therefor, and I hereby request that my name be printed upon the official
ballot for such office, and that I will serve as such officer, if elected.
(Signed) _______________________________
_____
Subscribed and sworn to (or affirmed) before me ______ on this _____
_ day of ______, 20______
(Signed) _______________________________
_____
[3.] 2. The city clerk shall thereupon cause the official ballots to be printed, and upon
the ballots the names of the candidates shall appear in the order that their statements of
candidacy were filed with the city clerk, and above the names of the candidates shall appear
the words "Vote for (number to be elected)".
[4.] 3. The ballots shall be in substantially the following form:
Warning: Voting for more than the total number of candidates to be
elected to any office will invalidate this ballot.
OFFICIAL BALLOT
Candidates for councilmen of ______ at general election.
FOR COUNCILMEN
Vote for (number to be elected)
(cid:0)______(Name of candidate)______
(cid:0)______(Name of candidate)______
(cid:0)______(Name of candidate)______
78.573. 1. The council may, by ordinance, adopt procedures for the initiative and
referendum as provided in this section and section 78.575.
2. Any proposal to adopt an ordinance except an ordinance appropriating money,
emergency ordinances and ordinances for the levying of taxes may be submitted to the
council by a petition signed by at least twenty-five percent of the registered voters. The
signatures, verification, authentication, inspection, certification, amendment and submission
of the petition shall be the same as that provided in section 78.270.
3. When a petition to adopt an ordinance is signed by at least twenty-five percent of
the registered voters, the council shall pass the ordinance without alteration, within twenty

HB 3013 107
days of the clerk's certification of the petition, or submit it for a vote at the next [municipal or
state] primary [or general] election. If a majority of the voters voting on the proposed
ordinance vote in favor thereof, it shall thereupon become a valid and binding ordinance of
the city.
4. If a petition protesting an ordinance, signed by at least twenty-five percent of the
registered voters of the city, is presented to the council, the council shall reconsider such
ordinance and, if it is not entirely repealed, submit the ordinance to the voters as provided by
subsection 3 of this section. Such ordinance shall not remain in effect after the election unless
a majority of the voters voting on the same shall vote in favor thereof. The petition shall be
submitted, verified and certified in accordance with the provisions of section 78.270.
88.251. Each franchise or contract provided for in sections 71.530, 77.210, 78.190,
78.630, and sections 88.613, 88.770, and 88.773 shall remain on file with the city clerk for
public inspection at least thirty days before the final passage or adoption thereof. The
effective date of such franchise or contract shall be the earliest date upon which one of the
following events occurs: the bill approving the franchise or contract is signed by the mayor or
person exercising the duties of the mayor's office; the board of aldermen overrides the
mayor's veto; or the conclusion of the next meeting of the board of aldermen when the mayor
has neither signed nor vetoed the bill. Every such franchise or contract provided for above
shall be subject to approval or disapproval of the voters of such city whenever twenty-five
percent of the voters of such city, as appears from the number of voters who voted for mayor
at the last preceding municipal election, file with the city clerk, within thirty days after the
passing of the franchise or contract, a petition, in the following form, calling for the
submission of the question of approval or disapproval of the grant of the franchise or contract
to the voters of such city at [a special election or at a regular municipal] the primary
election:
To the city clerk of ______
We, the undersigned, hereby request the appropriate election authority
to submit the grant of the following franchise or contract to the electors
of ______ at a [special election or at a regular municipal] primary
election.
(State nature of franchise or contract.)

Upon receipt of such a petition by the city clerk, it shall be the duty of the city clerk to
determine whether the petition has presented the question in the form required by this section
and whether the petition has been executed in compliance with the terms of subsection 4 of
section 115.019. If the petition satisfies the requirements of this section and subsection 4 of
section 115.019, the city clerk shall cause the appropriate election authority to give notice of

HB 3013 108
an election and to submit the question of approval or disapproval of the grant of the franchise
or contract to the voters at [a special election, or at a regular municipal election] the primary
election. Not later than the tenth Tuesday prior to an election, the city clerk shall send to the
appropriate election authority a certified copy of the legal notice to be published. The legal
notice shall include the particular question to be voted on at such election, the date and time
of the election and a sample ballot. The appropriate election authority shall cause legal notice
of such election to be published as required in chapter 115. The ballots used when voting
upon such franchise or contract shall contain, but not be limited to, the following language:
Shall the city of ______ (name of city) enter into the contract to _____
_ (State nature of proposed contract or franchise)?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the voters voting on that issue vote against such franchise or contract, the
same shall no longer be effective on the date the election authority certifies the election
results. If a majority of the qualified voters voting on such proposed franchise or contract
shall vote in favor thereof, such franchise or contract shall continue to be an effective, valid
and binding franchise or contract of the city and shall remain in full force and effect and
cannot be repealed or amended. Nothing contained herein shall be interpreted to prohibit the
granting of a franchise by the use of the right of initiative petition.
94.577. 1. The governing body of any municipality except those located in whole or
in part within any first class county having a charter form of government and not containing
any part of a city with a population of four hundred thousand or more and adjacent to a city
not within a county for that part of the municipality located within such first class county is
hereby authorized to impose, by ordinance or order, a one-eighth, one-fourth, three-eighths,
or one-half of one percent sales tax on all retail sales made in such municipality which are
subject to taxation under the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of
funding capital improvements, including the operation and maintenance of capital
improvements, which may be funded by issuing bonds which will be retired by the
revenues received from the sales tax authorized by this section or the retirement of debt under
previously authorized bonded indebtedness. A municipality located in a charter county may
impose a sales tax on all retail sales for capital improvements as provided in section 94.890.
The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed
by law; but no ordinance imposing a sales tax under the provisions of this section shall be
effective unless the governing body of the municipality submits to the voters of the

HB 3013 109
municipality, at a [municipal or state general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to
authorize the governing body of the municipality to impose such tax and, if such tax is to be
used to retire bonds authorized under this section, to authorize such bonds and their
retirement by such tax, or to authorize the retirement of debt under previously authorized
bonded indebtedness.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to:
(1) If the proposal submitted involves only authorization to impose the tax authorized
by this section, the following language:
Shall the municipality of ______ (municipality's name) impose a sales
tax of ______ (insert amount) for the purpose of funding capital
improvements which may include the retirement of debt under
previously authorized bonded indebtedness?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO"; or
(2) If the proposal submitted involves authorization to issue bonds and repay such
bonds with revenues from the tax authorized by this section, the following language:
Shall the municipality of ______ (municipality's name) issue bonds in
the amount ______ of ______ (insert amount) to fund capital
improvements and impose a sales tax of ______ (insert amount) to
repay bonds?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, including when the proposal authorizes the reduction of debt under
previously authorized bonded indebtedness under subdivision (1) of this subsection, then the
ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in effect, except that any proposal
submitted under subdivision (2) of this subsection to issue bonds and impose a sales tax to
retire such bonds must be approved by the constitutionally required percentage of the voters
voting thereon to become effective. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters
voting are opposed to the proposal, then the governing body of the municipality shall have no
power to issue any bonds or impose the sales tax authorized in this section unless and until the
governing body of the municipality shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize

HB 3013 110
the governing body of the municipality to issue any bonds or impose the sales tax authorized
by this section, and such proposal is approved by the requisite majority of the qualified voters
voting thereon; however, in no event shall a proposal pursuant to this section be submitted to
the voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the last proposal pursuant to this
section, except that any municipality with a population of greater than four hundred thousand
and located within more than one county may submit a proposal pursuant to this section to the
voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the last proposal submitted pursuant to this
section if submitted to the voters on or before November 6, 2001.
3. All revenue received by a municipality from the tax authorized under the
provisions of this section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for
capital improvements, including the operation and maintenance of capital improvements, for
so long as the tax shall remain in effect. Once the tax authorized by this section is abolished
or is terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the special trust fund required by this
subsection shall be used solely for the maintenance of the capital improvements made with
revenues raised by the tax authorized by this section. Any funds in the special trust fund
required by this subsection which are not needed for current expenditures may be invested by
the governing body in accordance with applicable laws relating to the investment of other
municipal funds. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to taxes authorized by
this section which have not been imposed to retire bonds issued pursuant to this section.
4. All revenue received by a municipality which issues bonds under this section and
imposes the tax authorized by this section to retire such bonds shall be deposited in a special
trust fund and shall be used solely to retire such bonds, except to the extent that such funds are
required for the operation and maintenance of capital improvements. Once all of such bonds
have been retired, all funds remaining in the special trust fund required by this subsection
shall be used solely for the maintenance of the capital improvements made with the revenue
received as a result of the issuance of such bonds. Any funds in the special trust fund required
by this subsection which are not needed to meet current obligations under the bonds issued
under this section may be invested by the governing body in accordance with applicable laws
relating to the investment of other municipal funds. The provisions of this subsection shall
apply only to taxes authorized by this section which have been imposed to retire bonds issued
under this section.
5. After the effective date of any tax imposed under the provisions of this section, the
director of revenue shall perform all functions incident to the administration, collection,
enforcement, and operation of the tax in the same manner as provided in sections 94.500 to
94.550, and the director of revenue shall collect in addition to the sales tax for the state of
Missouri the additional tax authorized under the authority of this section. The tax imposed
pursuant to this section and the tax imposed under the sales tax law of the state of Missouri

HB 3013 111
shall be collected together and reported upon such forms and under such administrative rules
and regulations as may be prescribed by the director of revenue. Except as modified in this
section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to the tax imposed under this
section.
6. No tax imposed pursuant to this section for the purpose of retiring bonds issued
under this section may be terminated until all of such bonds have been retired.
7. In any city not within a county, no tax shall be imposed pursuant to this section for
the purpose of funding in whole or in part the construction, operation or maintenance of a
sports stadium, field house, indoor or outdoor recreational facility, center, playing field,
parking facility or anything incidental or necessary to a complex suitable for any type of
100 professional sport or recreation, either upon, above or below the ground.
101 8. Any tax imposed under this section in any home rule city with more than four
102 hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county solely for public transit
103 purposes shall not be considered economic activity taxes as such term is defined under
104 sections 99.805 and 99.918, and tax revenues derived from such tax shall not be subject to
105 allocation under the provisions of subsection 3 of section 99.845 or subsection 4 of section
106 99.957.
107 9. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from the
108 amounts in the trust fund and credited to any municipality for erroneous payments and
109 overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
110 such municipalities. If any municipality abolishes the tax, the municipality shall notify the
111 director of revenue of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal
112 and the director of revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of
113 two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or
114 overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
115 such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in
116 such municipality, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the
117 municipality and close the account of that municipality. The director of revenue shall notify
118 each municipality of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from
119 receipts due the municipality.
120 10. If any city abolishes the tax authorized under subsections 1 to 9 of this section, the
121 repeal of such tax shall become effective December thirty-first of the calendar year in which
122 such abolishment was approved. Each city shall notify the director of revenue at least ninety
123 days prior to the effective date of the expiration of the sales tax authorized by this section and
124 the director of revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two
125 percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or
126 overpayment of such tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit

HB 3013 112
127 of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the date of expiration of the tax authorized
128 by this section in such city, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the
129 city and close the account of that city. The director of revenue shall notify each city of each
130 instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the city.
131 11. Any home rule city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located
132 in more than one county is hereby authorized to impose, in lieu of the tax authorized under
133 subsection 1 of this section, by ordinance or order, a one-eighth, one-fourth, three-eighths, or
134 one-half of one percent sales tax on all retail sales made in such municipality which are
135 subject to taxation under the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of
136 providing revenues for public safety activities, including operations and capital
137 improvements, which may be funded by issuing bonds which will be retired by the
138 revenues received from the sales tax authorized by this section or the retirement of debt under
139 previously authorized bonded indebtedness. The tax authorized by this section shall be in
140 addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law; but no ordinance imposing a sales tax
141 under the provisions of this section shall be effective unless the governing body of the
142 municipality submits to the voters of the municipality, at a [municipal or state general,]
143 primary [or special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the municipality
144 to impose such tax and, if such tax is to be used to retire bonds authorized under this section,
145 to authorize such bonds and their retirement by such tax, or to authorize the retirement of debt
146 under previously authorized bonded indebtedness.
147 12. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to:
148 (1) If the proposal submitted involves only authorization to impose the tax authorized
149 by this section, the following language:
150 Shall the municipality of ______ (municipality's name) impose a sales
151 tax of ______ (insert amount) for the purpose of providing revenues for
152 public safety activities, including operations and capital improvements,
153 which may include the retirement of debt under previously authorized
154 bonded indebtedness?
155 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
156 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
157 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
158 opposite "NO"; or
159 (2) If the proposal submitted involves authorization to issue bonds and repay such
160 bonds with revenues from the tax authorized by this section, the following language:
161 Shall the municipality of ______ (municipality's name) issue bonds in
162 the amount of ______ (insert amount) for the purpose of providing
163 revenues for public safety activities, including operations and capital

HB 3013 113
164 improvements, and impose a sales tax of ______ (insert amount) to
165 repay bonds?
166 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
167 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
168 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
169 opposite "NO".
170
171 The ballot may include descriptions of specific uses to which the revenues from the tax will
172 be applied.
173
174 If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
175 favor of the proposal, including when the proposal authorizes the reduction of debt under
176 previously authorized bonded indebtedness under subdivision (1) of this subsection, then the
177 ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in effect, except that any proposal
178 submitted under subdivision (2) of this subsection to issue bonds and impose a sales tax to
179 retire such bonds must be approved by the constitutionally required percentage of the voters
180 voting thereon to become effective. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters
181 voting are opposed to the proposal, then the governing body of the municipality shall have no
182 power to issue any bonds or impose the sales tax authorized in this section unless and until the
183 governing body of the municipality shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize
184 the governing body of the municipality to issue any bonds or impose the sales tax authorized
185 by subsection 11 of this section, and such proposal is approved by the requisite majority of the
186 qualified voters voting thereon.
187 13. All revenue received by a municipality from the tax authorized under the
188 provisions of subsection 11 of this section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall
189 be used solely for public safety activities for so long as the tax shall remain in effect. Once
190 the tax authorized by this section is abolished or is terminated by any means, all funds
191 remaining in the special trust fund required by this subsection shall be used solely for the
192 public safety activities authorized in subsection 11 of this section. Any funds in the special
193 trust fund required by this subsection which are not needed for current expenditures may be
194 invested by the governing body in accordance with applicable laws relating to the investment
195 of other municipal funds. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to taxes
196 authorized by this subsection which have not been imposed to retire bonds issued pursuant to
197 this subsection.
198 14. All revenue received by a municipality which issues bonds under subsection 11 of
199 this section and imposes the tax authorized by this section to retire such bonds shall be

HB 3013 114
200 deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely to retire such bonds, except to the
201 extent that such funds are required for the operation of the public safety department. Once all
202 of such bonds have been retired, all funds remaining in the special trust fund required by this
203 subsection shall be used solely for public safety activities. Any funds in the special trust fund
204 required by this subsection which are not needed to meet current obligations under the bonds
205 issued under this section may be invested by the governing body in accordance with
206 applicable laws relating to the investment of other municipal funds. The provisions of this
207 subsection shall apply only to taxes authorized by subsection 11 of this section which have
208 been imposed to retire bonds issued under this section.
209 15. After the effective date of any tax imposed under the provisions of subsection 11
210 of this section, the director of revenue shall perform all functions incident to the
211 administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of the tax in the same manner as
212 provided in sections 94.500 to 94.550, and the director of revenue shall collect in addition to
213 the sales tax for the state of Missouri the additional tax authorized under the authority of this
214 section. The tax imposed pursuant to this section and the tax imposed under the sales tax law
215 of the state of Missouri shall be collected together and reported upon such forms and under
216 such administrative rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the director of revenue.
217 Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to
218 the tax imposed under this section.
219 16. No tax imposed pursuant to subsection 11 of this section for the purpose of
220 retiring bonds issued under this section may be terminated until all of such bonds have been
221 retired.
94.579. 1. The governing body of any home rule city with more than one hundred
fifty-one thousand five hundred but fewer than one hundred fifty-one thousand six hundred
inhabitants is hereby authorized to impose, by order or ordinance, a sales tax on all retail sales
made within the city which are subject to sales tax under chapter 144. The tax authorized in
this section shall not exceed one percent, and shall be imposed solely for the purpose of
providing revenues for the operation of public safety departments, including police and fire
departments, and for pension programs, and health care for employees and pensioners of the
public safety departments. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to all other
sales taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
The order or ordinance shall not become effective unless the governing body of the city
submits to the voters residing within the city at a [state general,] primary[, or special] election
a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to impose a tax under this section. If
the tax authorized in this section is not approved by the voters, then the city shall have an
additional year during which to meet its required contribution payment beyond the time
period described in section 105.683. If the city meets its required contribution payment in

HB 3013 115
this time, then, notwithstanding the provisions of section 105.683 to the contrary, the
delinquency shall not constitute a lien on the funds of the political subdivision, the board of
such plan shall not be authorized to compel payment by application for writ of mandamus,
and the state treasurer and the director of the department of revenue shall not withhold
twenty-five percent of the certified contribution deficiency from the total moneys due the
political subdivision from the state. The one-year extension shall only be available to the city
on a one-time basis.
2. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) impose a sales tax at a rate of
______ (up to one) percent, solely for the purpose of providing
revenues for the operation of public safety departments of the city?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter immediately following notification to the department of revenue. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
3. All revenue collected under this section by the director of the department of
revenue on behalf of any city, except for one percent for the cost of collection which shall be
deposited in the state's general revenue fund, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which
is hereby created and shall be known as the "Public Safety Protection Sales Tax Fund", and
shall be used solely for the designated purposes. Moneys in the fund shall not be deemed to
be state funds, and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The director may
make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund and credited to the city for erroneous
payments and overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited
to the credit of such city. Any funds in the special trust fund which are not needed for current
expenditures shall be invested in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest
and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund. The director shall keep
accurate records of the amounts in the fund, and such records shall be open to the inspection
of the officers of such city and to the public. Not later than the tenth day of each month, the

HB 3013 116
director shall distribute all moneys deposited in the fund during the preceding month to the
city. Such funds shall be deposited with the treasurer of the city, and all expenditures of
moneys from the fund shall be by an appropriation ordinance enacted by the governing body
of the city.
4. On or after the effective date of the tax, the director of revenue shall be responsible
for the administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of the tax, and sections 32.085
and 32.087 shall apply. In order to permit sellers required to collect and report the sales tax to
collect the amount required to be reported and remitted, but not to change the requirements of
reporting or remitting the tax, or to serve as a levy of the tax, and in order to avoid fractions of
pennies, the governing body of the city may authorize the use of a bracket system similar to
that authorized in section 144.285, and notwithstanding the provisions of that section, this
new bracket system shall be used where this tax is imposed and shall apply to all taxable
transactions. Beginning with the effective date of the tax, every retailer in the city shall add
the sales tax to the sale price, and this tax shall be a debt of the purchaser to the retailer until
paid, and shall be recoverable at law in the same manner as the purchase price. For purposes
of this section, all retail sales shall be deemed to be consummated at the place of business of
the retailer.
5. All applicable provisions in sections 144.010 to 144.525 governing the state sales
tax, and section 32.057, the uniform confidentiality provision, shall apply to the collection of
the tax, and all exemptions granted to agencies of government, organizations, and persons
under sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to the imposition and
collection of the tax. The same sales tax permit, exemption certificate, and retail certificate
required by sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the administration and collection of the state sales
tax shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and no additional permit or exemption
certificate or retail certificate shall be required; except that, the director of revenue may
prescribe a form of exemption certificate for an exemption from the tax. All discounts
allowed the retailer under the state sales tax for the collection of and for payment of taxes are
hereby allowed and made applicable to the tax. The penalties for violations provided in
section 32.057 and sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to violations of
this section. If any person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required to be paid
under this section, or in the event a determination has been made against the person for the tax
and penalties under this section, the limitation for bringing suit for the collection of the
delinquent tax and penalties shall be the same as that provided in sections 144.010 to 144.525.
6. The governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized in this
section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for
elections for the city] at the primary election. The ballot of submission shall be in
substantially the following form:

HB 3013 117
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) repeal the sales tax imposed
at a rate of ______ (up to one) percent for the purpose of providing
revenues for the operation of public safety departments of the city?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
100 year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
101 qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this
102 section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the
103 qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the
104 question.
105 7. The governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized in this
106 section shall submit the question of continuation of the tax to the voters every five years from
107 the date of its inception on a date available for elections for the city. The ballot of submission
108 shall be in substantially the following form:
109 Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) continue collecting a sales
110 tax imposed at a rate of ______ (up to one) percent for the purpose of
111 providing revenues for the operation of public safety departments of
112 the city?
113 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
114 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
115 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
116 opposite "NO".
117
118 If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
119 opposed to continuation, repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the
120 calendar year in which such continuation was failed to be approved. If a majority of the votes
121 cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of continuation, then
122 the sales tax authorized in this section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted
123 under this section to the qualified voters and continuation fails to be approved by a majority
124 of the qualified voters voting on the question.

HB 3013 118
125 8. Whenever the governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized
126 in this section receives a petition, signed by a number of registered voters of the city equal to
127 at least two percent of the number of registered voters of the city voting in the last
128 gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the sales tax imposed under this
129 section, the governing body shall submit to the voters of the city a proposal to repeal the tax.
130 If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
131 favor of the repeal, the repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
132 year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
133 qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this
134 section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the
135 qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the
136 question.
137 9. If the tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the special
138 trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes, and the city shall
139 notify the director of the department of revenue of the action at least ninety days before the
140 effective date of the repeal and the director may order retention in the trust fund, for a period
141 of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover
142 possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts
143 deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of
144 abolition of the tax in such city, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the city
145 and close the account of that city. The director shall notify each city of each instance of any
146 amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the city.
94.581. 1. The governing body of any home rule city with more than eighty-four
thousand five hundred but fewer than eighty-four thousand six hundred inhabitants is hereby
authorized to impose, by ordinance or order, a sales tax in the amount of up to one percent on
all retail sales made in such city which are subject to taxation under the provisions of sections
144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of capital improvements for public safety for such city,
including but not limited to expenditures for new construction and equipment, repair and
maintenance of buildings and equipment, and for financing such capital improvements for
public safety. The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to any and all other sales
taxes allowed by law, except that no ordinance or order imposing a sales tax pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall be effective unless the governing body of the city submits to
the voters of the city, at a [county or state general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to
authorize the governing body of the city to impose a tax.
2. If the proposal submitted involves only authorization to impose the tax authorized
by this section, the ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the
following language:

HB 3013 119
Shall the city of ______ (city's name) impose a citywide sales tax of __
____ (insert amount) for the purpose of capital improvements for
public safety of the city?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal submitted pursuant to this subsection, then the ordinance or order and
any amendments thereto shall be in effect on the first day of the second calendar quarter after
the director of revenue receives notification of adoption of the local sales tax. If a proposal
receives less than the required majority, then the governing body of the city shall have no
power to impose the sales tax herein authorized unless and until the governing body of the
city shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to
impose the sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by the required
majority of the qualified voters voting thereon. However, in no event shall a proposal
pursuant to this section be submitted to the voters sooner than twelve months from the date of
the last proposal pursuant to this section.
3. All revenue received by a city from the tax authorized under the provisions of this
section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for capital
improvements for public safety for such city for so long as the tax shall remain in effect.
4. Once the tax authorized by this section is abolished or is terminated by any means,
all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall be used solely for capital improvements for
public safety for the city. Any funds in such special trust fund which are not needed for
current expenditures may be invested by the governing body in accordance with applicable
laws relating to the investment of other city funds.
5. All sales taxes collected by the director of the department of revenue under this
section on behalf of any city, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited
in the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in
section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be
known as the "City Capital Improvements for Public Safety Sales Tax Trust Fund". The
moneys in the trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled
with any funds of the state. The provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary notwithstanding,
money in this fund shall not be transferred and placed to the credit of the general revenue
fund. The director of the department of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount of

HB 3013 120
money in the trust and which was collected in each city imposing a sales tax pursuant to this
section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of the city and the public.
Not later than the tenth day of each month the director of the department of revenue shall
distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the city which
levied the tax; such funds shall be deposited with the city treasurer of each such city, and all
expenditures of funds arising from the trust fund shall be by an appropriation act to be enacted
by the governing body of each such city. Expenditures may be made from the fund for any
functions authorized in the ordinance or order adopted by the governing body submitting the
tax to the voters.
6. The director of the department of revenue may make refunds from the amounts in
the trust fund and credited to any city for erroneous payments and overpayments made, and
may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such cities. If any city
abolishes the tax, the city shall notify the director of the department of revenue of the action at
least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal and the director of the department of
revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the
amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the
tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts.
After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in such city, the
director of the department of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the city and
close the account of that city. The director of the department of revenue shall notify each city
of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the city.
7. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
94.585. 1. The governing body of any city of the third classification with more than
ten thousand eight hundred but fewer than ten thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located
in more than one county may impose, by order or ordinance, a sales tax on all retail sales
made within the city which are subject to sales tax under chapter 144. The tax authorized in
this section shall not exceed one percent, and shall be imposed solely for the purpose of
funding the construction, maintenance, operation, and equipping of a community center and
retiring any bonds issued for such purposes. The tax authorized in this section shall be in
addition to all other sales taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all other
charges and taxes.
2. No such order or ordinance adopted under this section shall become effective
unless the governing body of the city submits to the voters residing within the city at a [state
general,] primary[, or special] election a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city
to impose a tax and issue bonds under this section. Such a proposal may include only the

HB 3013 121
proposal to impose a sales tax or a proposal to issue bonds and to impose a sales tax to retire
such bonds.
3. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to the following
language:
(1) If the proposal submitted involves only authorization to impose the tax authorized
by this section, the following language:
Shall the municipality of ______ (municipality's name) impose a sales tax of ______
(insert amount) for a period of twenty-five years for the purpose of funding the construction,
maintenance, operation, and equipping of a community center which may include the
retirement of debt under previously authorized bonded indebtedness?
(2) If the proposal submitted involves authorization to issue bonds and repay such
bonds with revenues from the tax authorized by this section, the following language:
Shall the municipality of ______ (municipality's name) issue bonds in the amount ___
___ of ______ (insert amount) for a period of twenty-five years to fund construction,
maintenance, operation, and equipping of a community center and impose a sales tax of ____
__ (insert amount) to repay bonds?

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives notification of adoption of the local
sales tax, except that any proposal submitted to issue bonds shall be approved by the
constitutionally required percentage of the voters voting thereon to become effective. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved by the
requisite majority of the qualified voters voting on the question. In no event shall a proposal
under this section be submitted to the voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the
last proposal under this section.
4. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
5. All revenue collected under this section by the director of the department of
revenue on behalf of any city, except for one percent for the cost of collection which shall be
deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as
provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created
and shall be known as the "City Community Center Sales Tax Trust Fund", and shall be used
solely for the designated purposes. Moneys in the fund shall not be deemed to be state funds,
and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The director may make refunds

HB 3013 122
from the amounts in the fund and credited to the city for erroneous payments and
overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such city. Any funds in the special fund which are not needed for meeting current obligations
under any bond issued under this section or for current expenditures shall be invested in the
same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund.
6. The governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized in this
section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for
elections for the city] at the primary election. Except as provided in subsection 9 of this
section, if a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon
are in favor of the repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the
calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the
question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax
authorized in this section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this
section to the qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question.
7. Whenever the governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized
in this section receives a petition, signed by a number of registered voters of the city equal to
at least ten percent of the number of registered voters of the city voting in the last
gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the sales tax imposed under this
section, the governing body shall submit to the voters of the city a proposal to repeal the tax.
Except as provided in subsection 9 of this section, if a majority of the votes cast on the
question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal, the repeal shall
become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such repeal was
approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this section shall remain
effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and the
repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
8. If the tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the special
trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes, and the city shall
notify the director of the department of revenue of the action at least ninety days before the
effective date of the repeal and the director may order retention in the trust fund, for a period
of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover
possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts
deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of
abolition of the tax in such city, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the city

HB 3013 123
and close the account of that city. The director shall notify each city of each instance of any
amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the city.
9. No sales tax imposed under this section shall be terminated until all of any bonds
issued under this section have been retired.
10. The sales tax imposed under this section shall be imposed for a period of twenty-
five years, and may be extended upon the approval of the voters of the city in the same
manner in which the sales tax was adopted.
11. The city shall establish a board consisting of seven members, one of which shall
be the mayor of the city, to administer the provisions of this section with such powers and
duties which shall be delegated by the governing body of the city.
12. No bonds issued under this section shall be refinanced for a term longer than the
number of years remaining on the original terms of the bonds being refinanced without the
approval of the voters of the city. Any proposal to refinance such bonds submitted to the
100 voters shall include the number of years the bonds will be refinanced and the number of years
101 the sales tax will be extended to repay such refinanced bonds.
94.705. 1. Any city may by a majority vote of its governing body impose a sales tax
for transportation purposes enumerated in sections 94.700 to 94.755, and issue bonds for
transportation purposes which shall be retired by the revenues received from the sales tax
authorized by this section. The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to any and
all other sales taxes allowed by law. No ordinance imposing a sales tax pursuant to the
provisions of this section shall become effective unless the council or other governing body
submits to the voters of the city, at a [city or state general,] primary[, or special] election, a
proposal to authorize the council or other governing body of the city to impose such a sales
tax and, if such tax is to be used to retire bonds authorized pursuant to this section, to
authorize such bonds and their retirement by such tax; except that no vote shall be required in
any city that imposed and collected such tax under sections 94.600 to 94.655, before January
5, 1984. The ballot of the submission shall contain, but is not limited to, the following
language:
(1) If the proposal submitted involves only authorization to impose the tax authorized
by this section, the following language:
Shall the city of ______ (city's name) impose a sales tax of ______
(insert amount) for transportation purposes?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO";

HB 3013 124
(2) If the proposal submitted involves authorization to issue bonds and repay such
bonds with revenues from the tax authorized by this section, the following language:
Shall the city of ______ (city's name) issue bonds in the amount of ___
___ (insert amount) for transportation purposes and impose a sales tax
of ______ (insert amount) to repay such bonds?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal, provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection,
by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the ordinance and any
amendments thereto shall be in effect. If the four-sevenths majority of the votes, as required
by the Missouri Constitution, Article VI, Section 26, cast on the proposal, provided in
subdivision (2) of this subsection to issue bonds and impose a sales tax to retire such bonds,
by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the ordinance and any
amendments thereto shall be in effect. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal, as
provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection, by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the proposal, then the council or other governing body of the city shall have no
power to impose the tax authorized in subdivision (1) of this subsection unless and until the
council or other governing body of the city submits another proposal to authorize the council
or other governing body of the city to impose the tax and such proposal is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting thereon. If more than three-sevenths of the votes cast
by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the proposal, as provided in subdivision
(2) of this subsection to issue bonds and impose a sales tax to retire such bonds, then the
council or other governing body of the city shall have no power to issue any bonds or to
impose the tax authorized in subdivision (2) of this subsection unless and until the council or
other governing body of the city submits another proposal to authorize the council or other
governing body of the city to issue such bonds or impose the tax to retire such bonds and such
proposal is approved by four-sevenths of the qualified voters voting thereon.
2. No incorporated municipality located wholly or partially within any first class
county operating under a charter form of government and having a population of over nine
hundred thousand inhabitants shall impose such a sales tax for that part of the city, town or
village that is located within such first class county, in the event such a first class county
imposes a sales tax under the provisions of sections 94.600 to 94.655.
3. The sales tax may be imposed at a rate not to exceed one-half of one percent on the
receipts from the sale at retail of all tangible personal property or taxable services at retail

HB 3013 125
within any city adopting such tax, if such property and services are subject to taxation by the
state of Missouri under the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525.
4. If the boundaries of a city in which such sales tax has been imposed shall thereafter
be changed or altered, the city clerk shall forward to the director of revenue by United States
registered mail or certified mail a certified copy of the ordinance adding or detaching territory
from the city. The ordinance shall reflect the effective date thereof, and shall be accompanied
by a map of the city clearly showing the territory added thereto or detached therefrom. Upon
receipt of the ordinance and map, the tax imposed by sections 94.700 to 94.755 shall be
effective in the added territory or abolished in the detached territory on the effective date of
the change of the city boundary.
5. No tax imposed pursuant to this section for the purpose of retiring bonds issued
pursuant to this section may be terminated until all of such bonds have been retired.
94.830. 1. The governing body of any third class city in any county of the third
classification which contains a state university whose primary mission is engineering studies
and technical research may impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the
transient guests of hotels or motels situated in the city, which shall be more than two percent
but not more than five percent per occupied room per night, except that such tax shall not
become effective unless the governing body of the city submits to the voters of the city at a
[state general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of
the city to impose a tax under the provisions of this section. The tax authorized by this
section shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping room and shall be in addition to any
and all taxes imposed by law, and the proceeds of such tax shall be used by the city solely for
funding a convention and visitors bureau which shall be a general not-for-profit organization
with whom the city has contracted, and which is established for the purpose of promoting the
city as a convention, visitor and tourist center. Such tax shall be stated separately from all
other charges and taxes.
2. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ (city) levy a tax of ______ percent on each sleeping
room occupied and rented by transient guests of hotels and motels
located in the city, where the proceeds of which shall be expended for
promotion of tourism?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the calendar
quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question,

HB 3013 126
then the governing body for the city shall have no power to impose the tax authorized by this
section unless and until the governing body of the city again submits the question to the
qualified voters of the city and such question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question.
3. On and after the effective date of any tax authorized under the provisions of this
section, the city which levied the tax may adopt one of the two following provisions for the
collection and administration of the tax:
(1) The city which levied the tax may adopt rules and regulations for the internal
collection of such tax by the city officers usually responsible for collection and administration
of city taxes; or
(2) The city may enter into an agreement with the director of revenue of the state of
Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in this section. In the event any city
enters into an agreement with the director of revenue of the state of Missouri for the collection
of the tax authorized in this section, the director of revenue shall perform all functions
incident to the administration, collection, enforcement and operation of such tax, and the
director of revenue shall collect the additional tax authorized under the provisions of this
section. The tax authorized under the provisions of this section shall be collected and
reported upon such forms and under such administrative rules and regulations as may be
prescribed by the director of revenue, and the director of revenue shall retain not less than one
percent nor more than three percent for cost of collection.
4. If a tax is imposed by a city under this section, the city may collect a penalty of one
percent and interest not to exceed two percent per month on unpaid taxes which shall be
considered delinquent thirty days after the last day of each quarter.
94.831. 1. The governing body of any city of the fourth classification with more than
four thousand eight hundred but less than four thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located
in any county of the third classification without a township form of government and with
more than fourteen thousand nine hundred but less than fifteen thousand inhabitants may
impose, by order or ordinance, a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the
transient guests of hotels or motels situated in the city or a portion thereof. The tax shall be
not more than five percent per occupied room per night, and shall be imposed solely for the
purpose of promoting tourism. The order or ordinance shall not become effective unless the
governing body of the city submits to the voters of the city at a [state general or] primary
election a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to impose a tax under this
section. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping
room and all other taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all other charges
and taxes.

HB 3013 127
2. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) impose a tax on the charges
for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels and motels
situated in ______ (name of city) at a rate of ______ (insert rate of
percent) percent, solely for the purpose of promoting tourism?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives notice of the adoption of the tax. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
3. Any tax imposed under this section shall be administered, collected, enforced, and
operated by the governing body of the city adopting the tax. All revenue generated by the tax
shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for the designated purposes.
If the tax is repealed, all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall continue to be used
solely for the designated purposes. Any funds in the special trust fund which are not needed
for current expenditures may be invested in the same manner as other funds are invested.
Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
4. The governing body of any city that has adopted the tax authorized in this section
may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for elections
for the city] at the primary election. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the
following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) repeal the tax imposed at a
rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for the purpose of
promoting tourism?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are in favor of repeal, that repeal shall become
effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If
a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the repeal, then the tax authorized in this section shall remain effective until the question is
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters, and the repeal is approved by a majority
of the qualified voters voting on the question.

HB 3013 128
5. Whenever the governing body of any city that has adopted the tax authorized in
this section receives a petition, signed by ten percent of the registered voters of the city voting
in the last gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the tax imposed under this
section, the governing body shall submit to the voters of the city a proposal to repeal the tax.
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax shall remain effective
until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and the repeal is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
6. As used in this section, "transient guests" means a person or persons who occupy a
room or rooms in a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
94.832. 1. The governing body of any city of the third classification with more than
four thousand seven hundred but fewer than four thousand eight hundred inhabitants and
located in any county of the first classification with more than one hundred eighty-four
thousand but fewer than one hundred eighty-eight thousand inhabitants may impose, by order
or ordinance, a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels
or motels situated in the city or a portion thereof. The tax shall be not more than five percent
per occupied room per night, and shall be imposed solely for the purpose of funding tourism
and infrastructure improvements. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to the
charge for the sleeping room and all other taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated separately
from all other charges and taxes.
2. No such order or ordinance shall become effective unless the governing body of
the city submits to the voters of the city at a [state general,] primary[, or special] election a
proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to impose a tax under this section. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of
the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second calendar
quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question,
then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted under this
section to the qualified voters of the city and such question is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting on the question.
3. All revenue generated by the tax shall be collected by the city collector of revenue,
shall be deposited in a special trust fund, and shall be used solely for the designated purposes.
If the tax is repealed, all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall continue to be used
solely for the designated purposes. Any funds in the special trust fund that are not needed for
current expenditures may be invested by the governing body in accordance with applicable

HB 3013 129
laws relating to the investment of other city funds. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund.
4. The governing body of any city that has adopted the tax authorized in this section
may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for elections
for the city] at the primary election. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are in
favor of the repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax authorized in this
section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the
qualified voters of the city, and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question.
5. Whenever the governing body of any city that has adopted the tax authorized in
this section receives a petition, signed by a number of registered voters of the city equal to at
least ten percent of the number of registered voters of the city voting in the last gubernatorial
election, calling for an election to repeal the tax imposed under this section, the governing
body shall submit to the voters of the city a proposal to repeal the tax. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal, that
repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such
repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax shall remain effective until the question
is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of the city and the repeal is approved
by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
6. As used in this section, "transient guests" means a person or persons who occupy a
room or rooms in a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
94.836. 1. The governing body of any city of the fourth classification with more than
six hundred but less than seven hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the second
classification with more than nineteen thousand seven hundred but less than nineteen
thousand eight hundred inhabitants or any city of the fourth classification with more than two
thousand two hundred but less than two thousand three hundred inhabitants and located in any
county of the third classification without a township form of government and with more than
twenty thousand but less than twenty thousand one hundred inhabitants may impose a tax on
the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in
the city or a portion thereof, which shall be not more than five percent per occupied room per
night, except that such tax shall not become effective unless the governing body of the city
submits to the voters of the city at a [state general or] primary election a proposal to authorize
the governing body of the city to impose a tax under this section. The tax authorized in this

HB 3013 130
section shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping room and all other taxes imposed by
law, and shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
2. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) impose a tax on the charges
for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels and motels
situated in ______ (name of city) at a rate of ______ (insert rate of
percent) percent for tourism purposes, including infrastructure
improvements?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority
of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted
under this section to the qualified voters of the city and such question is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters of the city voting on the question.
3. At least sixty-five percent of the revenue generated by the tax authorized in this
section shall be used by the city solely for tourism purposes, and not more than thirty-five
percent of the revenue generated may be used for infrastructure improvements. All revenue
generated by the tax shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for the
designated purposes. If the tax is repealed, all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall
continue to be used solely for the designated purposes. Any funds in the special trust fund
which are not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the governing body in
accordance with applicable laws relating to the investment of other city funds.
4. The governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized in this
section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for
elections for the city] at the primary election. The ballot of submission shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) repeal the sales tax imposed
at a rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for tourism
purposes?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are in favor of repeal, that repeal shall become
effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If

HB 3013 131
a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this section shall remain effective until the
question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of the city, and the repeal is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
5. Whenever the governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized
in this section receives a petition, signed by ten percent of the registered voters of the city
voting in the last gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the sales tax imposed
under this section, the governing body shall submit to the voters of the city a proposal to
repeal the tax. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first
of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the
question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax shall
remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of
the city and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
6. As used in this section, "transient guests" means a person or persons who occupy a
room or rooms in a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
94.837. 1. The governing body of any city of the fourth classification with more than
two thousand five hundred but fewer than two thousand six hundred inhabitants and located
in any county of the third classification without a township form of government and with
more than ten thousand four hundred but fewer than ten thousand five hundred inhabitants,
the governing body of any special charter city, and the governing body of any city of the
fourth classification with more than one thousand two hundred but fewer than one thousand
three hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the third classification without a
township form of government and with more than four thousand three hundred but fewer than
four thousand four hundred inhabitants may impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping
rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in the city or a portion thereof,
which shall not be more than five percent per occupied room per night, except that such tax
shall not become effective unless the governing body of the city submits to the voters of the
city at a [state general or] primary election a proposal to authorize the governing body of the
city to impose a tax under this section. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition
to the charge for the sleeping room and all other taxes imposed by law, and the proceeds of
such tax shall be used by the city solely for the promotion of tourism. Such tax shall be stated
separately from all other charges and taxes.
2. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) impose a tax on the charges
for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels and motels

HB 3013 132
situated in ______ (name of city) at a rate of ______ (insert rate of
percent) percent for the sole purpose of promoting tourism?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority
of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
question, then the tax authorized by this section shall not become effective unless and until
the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of the city and such
question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the city voting on the question.
3. As used in this section, "transient guests" means a person or persons who occupy a
room or rooms in a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
94.838. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Food", all articles commonly used for food or drink, including alcoholic
beverages, the provisions of chapter 311 notwithstanding;
(2) "Food establishment", any cafe, cafeteria, lunchroom, or restaurant which sells
food at retail;
(3) "Municipality", any city with more than one hundred sixty-five but fewer than one
hundred eighty-five inhabitants and located in a county with more than eleven thousand but
fewer than twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
four thousand but fewer than five thousand inhabitants;
(4) "Transient guest", a person or persons who occupy a room or rooms in a hotel or
motel for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
2. (1) The governing body of any municipality may impose, by order or ordinance:
(a) A tax, not to exceed six percent per room per night, on the charges for all sleeping
rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or motels situated in the municipality or a portion
thereof; and
(b) A tax, not to exceed two percent, on the gross receipts derived from the retail sales
of food by every person operating a food establishment in the municipality.
(2) The taxes shall be imposed for the purposes of funding the construction,
maintenance, and operation of capital improvements, emergency services, and public safety.
The order or ordinance shall not become effective unless the governing body of the
municipality submits to the voters of the municipality at a [state general or] primary election a
proposal to authorize the governing body of the municipality to impose taxes under this
section. The taxes authorized in this section shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping

HB 3013 133
room, the retail sales of food at a food establishment, and all other taxes imposed by law, and
shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
3. The ballot of submission for the taxes authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the municipality) impose a tax
on the charges for all retail sales of food at a food establishment
situated in ______ (name of municipality) at a rate of ______
(insert rate of percent) percent, and for all sleeping rooms paid
by the transient guests of hotels and motels situated in ______
(name of municipality) at a rate of ______ (insert rate of percent)
percent, for the purposes of funding the construction,
maintenance, and operation of capital improvements, emergency
services, and public safety?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the taxes shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives notice of the adoption of the taxes. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the question, then the taxes shall not become effective unless and until the question is
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
4. Any tax on the retail sales of food imposed under this section shall be administered,
collected, enforced, and operated as required in section 32.087, and any transient guest tax
imposed under this section shall be administered, collected, enforced, and operated by the
municipality imposing the tax. All revenue generated by the tax shall be deposited in a
special trust fund and shall be used solely for the designated purposes. If the tax is repealed,
all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated
purposes. Any funds in the special trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures
may be invested in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys
earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
5. Once the initial bonds, if any, have been satisfied, then the governing body of any
municipality that has adopted the taxes authorized in this section may submit the question of
repeal of the taxes to the voters [on any date available for elections for the municipality] at
the primary election. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the municipality) repeal the
taxes imposed at the rates of ______ (insert rate of percent) and _

HB 3013 134
_____ (insert rate of percent) percent for the purposes of funding
the construction, maintenance, and operation of capital
improvements, emergency services, and public safety?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are in favor of repeal, that repeal shall become
effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If
a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the repeal, then the tax authorized in this section shall remain effective until the question is
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters, and the repeal is approved by a majority
of the qualified voters voting on the question.
6. Once the initial bonds, if any, have been satisfied, then, whenever the governing
body of any municipality that has adopted the taxes authorized in this section receives a
petition, signed by ten percent of the registered voters of the municipality voting in the last
gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the taxes imposed under this section,
the governing body shall submit to the voters of the municipality a proposal to repeal the
taxes. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
in favor of the repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the
calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the
question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax shall
remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and
the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
94.840. 1. The governing body of any city of the fourth classification with more than
thirty thousand three hundred but fewer than thirty thousand seven hundred inhabitants may
impose a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels or
motels situated in the city or a portion thereof, which shall not be more than five percent per
occupied room per night, except that such tax shall not become effective unless the governing
body of the city submits to the voters of the city at a [state general,] primary[, or special]
election a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to impose a tax under this
section. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to the charge for the sleeping
room and all other taxes imposed by law, and the proceeds of such tax shall be used by the
city for the promotion, operation, and development of tourism and convention facilities. Such
tax shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
2. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:

HB 3013 135
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) impose a tax on the charges
for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests of hotels and motels
situated in ______ (name of city) at a rate of ______ (insert rate of
percent) percent for the purpose of the promotion, operation, and
development of tourism and convention facilities?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority
of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
question, then the tax authorized by this section shall not become effective unless and until
the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of the city and such
question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the city voting on the question.
3. As used in this section, "transient guests" means a person or persons who occupy a
room or rooms in a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
94.875. All taxes authorized and collected under sections 94.870 to 94.881 shall be
deposited by the political subdivision in a special trust fund to be known as the "Tourism Tax
Trust Fund". The moneys in such tourism tax trust fund shall not be commingled with any
other funds of the political subdivision except as specifically provided in this section. The
taxes collected shall be used, upon appropriation by the political subdivision, solely for the
purpose of constructing, maintaining, or operating convention and tourism facilities, and at
least twenty-five percent of such taxes collected shall be used for tourism marketing and
promotional purposes; except that in any city with a population of less than seven thousand
five hundred inhabitants, forty percent of such taxes collected may be transferred to such
city's general revenue fund and the remaining thirty-five percent may be used for city capital
improvements, pursuant to voter approval. The moneys in the tourism tax trust fund of any
city with a population of at least fifteen thousand located partially but not wholly within a
county of the third classification with a population of at least thirty-nine thousand inhabitants
shall be used solely for tourism marketing and promotional purposes. The tax authorized by
section 94.870 shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, but no
ordinance or order imposing a tax under section 94.870 shall be effective unless the governing
body of the political subdivision submits to the voters of the political subdivision at a
[municipal or state general,] primary[, or special] election a proposal to authorize the
governing body of the political subdivision to impose such tax.

HB 3013 136
94.900. 1. (1) The governing body of the following cities may impose a tax as
provided in this section:
(a) Any city of the third classification with more than ten thousand eight hundred but
less than ten thousand nine hundred inhabitants located at least partly within a county of the
first classification with more than one hundred eighty-four thousand but less than one
hundred eighty-eight thousand inhabitants;
(b) Any city of the fourth classification with more than four thousand five hundred
but fewer than five thousand inhabitants;
(c) Any city of the fourth classification with more than eight thousand nine hundred
but fewer than nine thousand inhabitants;
(d) Any home rule city with more than forty-eight thousand but fewer than forty-nine
thousand inhabitants;
(e) Any home rule city with more than seventy-three thousand but fewer than
seventy-five thousand inhabitants;
(f) Any city of the fourth classification with more than thirteen thousand five hundred
but fewer than sixteen thousand inhabitants;
(g) Any city of the fourth classification with more than seven thousand but fewer than
eight thousand inhabitants;
(h) Any city of the fourth classification with more than four thousand but fewer than
four thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the first classification
with more than one hundred fifty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants;
(i) Any city of the third classification with more than thirteen thousand but fewer than
fifteen thousand inhabitants and located in any county of the third classification without a
township form of government and with more than thirty-three thousand but fewer than thirty-
seven thousand inhabitants;
(j) Any city of the fourth classification with more than three thousand but fewer than
three thousand three hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than
twenty thousand inhabitants and that is not the county seat of such county;
(k) Any city with more than ten thousand but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants
and partially located in a county with more than two hundred thirty thousand but fewer than
two hundred sixty thousand inhabitants;
(l) Any city with more than four thousand nine hundred but fewer than five thousand
six hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than thirty thousand but fewer than
thirty-five thousand inhabitants;

HB 3013 137
(m) Any city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen
thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than twenty-two
thousand but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants;
(n) Any village with more than four hundred thirty but fewer than four hundred eighty
inhabitants and partially located in a county with more than forty thousand but fewer than
fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two thousand but fewer than
six thousand inhabitants;
(o) Any city with more than sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county;
(p) Any city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen
thousand inhabitants and located in a county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer
than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than nine hundred but
fewer than one thousand four hundred inhabitants;
(q) Any city with more than fifty-one thousand but fewer than fifty-eight thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county;
(r) Any city with more than eight thousand but fewer than nine thousand inhabitants
and that is the county seat of a county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than
twenty-two thousand inhabitants; or
(s) Any city with more than one hundred sixty-five but fewer than one hundred
eighty-five inhabitants and located in a county with more than eleven thousand but fewer than
twelve thousand five hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four
thousand but fewer than five thousand inhabitants; or
(t) Any city with more than two thousand one hundred fifty but fewer than two
thousand four hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than seven hundred
thousand but fewer than eight hundred thousand inhabitants.
(2) The governing body of any city listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection is
hereby authorized to impose, by ordinance or order, a sales tax in the amount of up to one-half
of one percent on all retail sales made in such city which are subject to taxation under the
provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of improving the public safety for
such city, which shall be limited to expenditures on equipment, salaries and benefits, and
facilities for police, fire and emergency medical providers. The tax authorized by this section
shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no ordinance or
order imposing a sales tax pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be effective unless
the governing body of the city submits to the voters of the city, at a [county or state general,]
primary [or special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to impose
a tax.

HB 3013 138
2. If the proposal submitted involves only authorization to impose the tax authorized
by this section, the ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the
following language:
Shall the city of _________ (city's name) impose a citywide sales
tax of _________ (insert amount) for the purpose of improving
the public safety of the city?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal submitted pursuant to this subsection, then the ordinance or order and
any amendments thereto shall be in effect on the first day of the second calendar quarter after
the director of revenue receives notification of adoption of the local sales tax. If a proposal
receives less than the required majority, then the governing body of the city shall have no
power to impose the sales tax herein authorized unless and until the governing body of the
city shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to
impose the sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by the required
majority of the qualified voters voting thereon. However, in no event shall a proposal
pursuant to this section be submitted to the voters sooner than twelve months from the date of
the last proposal pursuant to this section.
3. All revenue received by a city from the tax authorized under the provisions of this
section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for improving the
public safety for such city for so long as the tax shall remain in effect.
4. Once the tax authorized by this section is abolished or is terminated by any means,
all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall be used solely for improving the public
safety for the city. Any funds in such special trust fund which are not needed for current
100 expenditures may be invested by the governing body in accordance with applicable laws
101 relating to the investment of other city funds.
102 5. All sales taxes collected by the director of the department of revenue under this
103 section on behalf of any city, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited
104 in the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in
105 section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be
106 known as the "City Public Safety Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the trust fund shall
107 not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The
108 provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary notwithstanding, money in this fund shall not be

HB 3013 139
109 transferred and placed to the credit of the general revenue fund. The director of the
110 department of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount of money in the trust and
111 which was collected in each city imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section, and the records
112 shall be open to the inspection of officers of the city and the public. Not later than the tenth
113 day of each month the director of the department of revenue shall distribute all moneys
114 deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the city which levied the tax; such
115 funds shall be deposited with the city treasurer of each such city, and all expenditures of funds
116 arising from the trust fund shall be by an appropriation act to be enacted by the governing
117 body of each such city. Expenditures may be made from the fund for any functions
118 authorized in the ordinance or order adopted by the governing body submitting the tax to the
119 voters.
120 6. The director of the department of revenue may make refunds from the amounts in
121 the trust fund and credited to any city for erroneous payments and overpayments made, and
122 may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such cities. If any city
123 abolishes the tax, the city shall notify the director of the department of revenue of the action at
124 least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal and the director of the department of
125 revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the
126 amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the
127 tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts.
128 After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in such city, the
129 director of the department of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the city and
130 close the account of that city. The director of the department of revenue shall notify each city
131 of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the city.
132 7. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
133 shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
134 8. If any city in subsection 1 of this section enacts the tax authorized in this section,
135 the city shall budget an amount to public safety that is no less than the amount budgeted in the
136 year immediately preceding the enactment of the tax. The revenue from the tax shall
137 supplement and not replace amounts budgeted by the city.
94.902. 1. The governing bodies of the following cities may impose a tax as provided
in this section:
(1) Any city of the third classification with more than twenty-six thousand three
hundred but less than twenty-six thousand seven hundred inhabitants;
(2) Any city of the fourth classification with more than thirty thousand three hundred
but fewer than thirty thousand seven hundred inhabitants;
(3) Any city of the fourth classification with more than twenty-four thousand eight
hundred but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants;

HB 3013 140
(4) Any special charter city with more than twenty-nine thousand but fewer than
thirty-two thousand inhabitants;
(5) Any city of the third classification with more than four thousand but fewer than
four thousand five hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the first classification
with more than two hundred thousand but fewer than two hundred sixty thousand inhabitants;
(6) Any city of the fourth classification with more than nine thousand five hundred
but fewer than ten thousand eight hundred inhabitants;
(7) Any city of the fourth classification with more than five hundred eighty but fewer
than six hundred fifty inhabitants;
(8) Any city of the fourth classification with more than two thousand seven hundred
but fewer than three thousand inhabitants and located in any county of the first classification
with more than eighty-three thousand but fewer than ninety-two thousand inhabitants;
(9) Any city of the fourth classification with more than two thousand four hundred
but fewer than two thousand seven hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the third
classification without a township form of government and with more than ten thousand but
fewer than twelve thousand inhabitants;
(10) Any city with more than one thousand sixty but fewer than one thousand one
hundred seventy inhabitants and located in a county with more than nineteen thousand but
fewer than twenty-two thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than one
thousand but fewer than two thousand two hundred twenty inhabitants;
(11) Any city with more than four hundred eighty but fewer than five hundred forty
inhabitants and located in a county with more than thirty thousand but fewer than thirty-five
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two hundred but fewer than nine
hundred inhabitants; or
(12) Any city with more than nine thousand but fewer than ten thousand inhabitants
and that is the county seat of a county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than
twenty-two thousand inhabitants.
2. The governing body of any city listed in subsection 1 of this section may impose,
by order or ordinance, a sales tax on all retail sales made in the city which are subject to
taxation under chapter 144. The tax authorized in this section may be imposed in an amount
of up to one-half of one percent. The tax shall be imposed solely for the purpose of
improving the public safety for such city, including but not limited to expenditures on
equipment; city employee salaries and benefits; and facilities for police, fire and emergency
medical providers. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to all other sales
taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes. The
order or ordinance imposing a sales tax under this section shall not become effective unless
the governing body of the city submits to the voters residing within the city, at a [county or

HB 3013 141
state general,] primary[, or special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the
city to impose a tax under this section.
3. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall the city of_________ (city's name) impose a citywide sales
tax at a rate of_________ (insert rate of percent) percent for the
purpose of improving the public safety of the city?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X"
in the box opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments to the order or
ordinance shall become effective on the first day of the second calendar quarter after the
director of revenue receives notice of the adoption of the sales tax. If a majority of the votes
cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the proposal, then
the tax shall not become effective unless the proposal is resubmitted under this section to the
qualified voters and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on
the proposal. However, in no event shall a proposal under this section be submitted to the
voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the last proposal under this section.
4. Any sales tax imposed under this section shall be administered, collected, enforced,
and operated as required in section 32.087. All sales taxes collected by the director of the
department of revenue under this section on behalf of any city, less one percent for cost of
collection which shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment of
premiums for surety bonds as provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust
fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury, to be known as the "City Public Safety
Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds
and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The provisions of section 33.080 to
the contrary notwithstanding, money in this fund shall not be transferred and placed to the
credit of the general revenue fund. The director shall keep accurate records of the amount of
money in the trust fund and which was collected in each city imposing a sales tax under this
section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of the city and the public.
Not later than the tenth day of each month the director shall distribute all moneys deposited in
the trust fund during the preceding month to the city which levied the tax. Such funds shall be
deposited with the city treasurer of each such city, and all expenditures of funds arising from
the trust fund shall be by an appropriation act to be enacted by the governing body of each

HB 3013 142
such city. Expenditures may be made from the fund for any functions authorized in the
ordinance or order adopted by the governing body submitting the tax to the voters. If the tax
is repealed, all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall continue to be used solely for
the designated purposes. Any funds in the special trust fund which are not needed for current
expenditures shall be invested in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest
and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
5. The director of the department of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make
refunds from the amounts in the trust fund and credited to any city for erroneous payments
and overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the
credit of such cities. If any city abolishes the tax, the city shall notify the director of the
action at least ninety days before the effective date of the repeal, and the director may order
retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the amount collected
after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem
dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has
elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in such city, the director shall remit the
balance in the account to the city and close the account of that city. The director shall notify
each city of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due
100 the city.
101 6. The governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized in this
102 section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for
103 elections for the city] at the primary election. The ballot of submission shall be in
104 substantially the following form:
105 Shall_________ (insert the name of the city) repeal the sales tax
106 imposed at a rate of_________ (insert rate of percent) percent for
107 the purpose of improving the public safety of the city?
108 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
109
110 If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are in favor of repeal, that repeal shall become
111 effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If
112 a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
113 to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this section shall remain effective until the
114 question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters, and the repeal is approved
115 by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
116 7. Whenever the governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized
117 in this section receives a petition, signed by ten percent of the registered voters of the city
118 voting in the last gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the sales tax imposed
119 under this section, the governing body shall submit to the voters of the city a proposal to

HB 3013 143
120 repeal the tax. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
121 thereon are in favor of the repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first
122 of the calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the
123 question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax shall
124 remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and
125 the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
126 8. Any sales tax imposed under this section by a city described under subdivision (6)
127 of subsection 1 of this section that is in effect as of December 31, 2038, shall automatically
128 expire. No city described under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of this section shall collect a
129 sales tax pursuant to this section on or after January 1, 2039. Subsection 7 of this section
130 shall not apply to a sales tax imposed under this section by a city described under subdivision
131 (6) of subsection 1 of this section.
132 9. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
133 shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
94.903. 1. The governing body of any city of the fourth classification with more than
nine thousand five hundred but fewer than ten thousand eight hundred inhabitants may
impose, by order or ordinance, a sales tax on all retail sales made in the city that are subject to
taxation under chapter 144. The tax authorized under this section may be imposed in an
amount of up to one-half of one percent and shall be imposed solely for the purpose of
improving the public safety for such city including, but not limited to, expenditures on
equipment, city public safety employee salaries and benefits, and facilities for police, fire, and
emergency medical providers. The tax authorized under this section shall be in addition to all
other sales taxes imposed by law and shall be stated separately from all other charges and
taxes. The order or ordinance imposing a sales tax under this section shall not become
effective unless the governing body of the city submits to the voters residing within the city,
at a [county or state general,] primary[, or special] election, a proposal to authorize the
governing body of the city to impose a tax under this section.
2. The ballot language for the tax authorized under this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall the city of _________(insert name of city) impose a citywide
sales tax at a rate of _________(insert rate) percent for the purpose of
improving the public safety of the city?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the order or ordinance and any amendments to the order or
ordinance shall become effective on the first day of the second calendar quarter after the

HB 3013 144
director of revenue receives notice of the adoption of the sales tax. If a majority of the votes
cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the proposal, then
the tax shall not become effective unless the proposal is resubmitted under this section to the
qualified voters and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on
the proposal. However, in no event shall a proposal under this section be resubmitted to the
voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the first proposal under this section. If the
resubmitted proposal receives less than the required majority, then the governing body of the
city shall have no power to impose the sales tax herein authorized, and the authorization
under this section is terminated.
3. Any sales tax imposed under this section shall be administered, collected, enforced,
and operated as required under section 32.087. All sales taxes collected by the director of
revenue under this section on behalf of any city, less one percent for cost of collection, which
shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety
bonds, as provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is
hereby created in the state treasury, to be known as the "City Public Safety Sales Tax Trust
Fund". The moneys in the trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be
commingled with any funds of the state. The provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary
notwithstanding, moneys in this fund shall not be transferred and placed to the credit of the
general revenue fund. The director shall keep accurate records of the amount of moneys in
the trust fund and the amount that was collected in each city imposing a sales tax under this
section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of the city and the public.
No later than the tenth day of each month, the director shall distribute all moneys deposited in
the trust fund during the preceding month to the city which levied the tax. Such funds shall be
deposited with the city treasurer of each such city, and all expenditures of funds arising from
the trust fund shall be by an appropriation act to be enacted by the governing body of each
such city. Expenditures may be made from the fund for any functions authorized in the
ordinance or order adopted by the governing body submitting the tax to the voters. If the tax
is repealed, all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall continue to be used solely for
the designated purposes. Any funds in the special trust fund that are not needed for current
expenditures shall be invested in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest
and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
4. The director of revenue may make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund and
credited to any city for erroneous payments and overpayments made and may redeem
dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such cities. If any city repeals the tax,
the city shall notify the director of the action at least ninety days before the effective date of
the repeal, and the director may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of
two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or

HB 3013 145
overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in
such city, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the city and close the account
of that city. The director shall notify each city of each instance of any amount refunded or
any check redeemed from receipts due to the city.
5. The governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized under this
section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for
elections for the city] at the primary election. The ballot language shall be in substantially
the following form:
Shall the city of _________(insert name of city) repeal the sales tax
imposed at a rate of _________(insert rate) percent for the purpose of
improving the public safety of the city?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized under
this section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted and approved under this
section.
6. The governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized under this
section shall submit the question of the continuation of the tax to the voters twenty-five years
from the date of its inception and every twenty-five years thereafter on a date available for
elections for the city. The ballot language shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall _________(insert name of city) continue collecting a sales tax
imposed at a rate of _________(insert rate) percent for the purpose of
providing revenues for the operation of public safety departments of
the city?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to continuation, the repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the
calendar year in which such continuation failed to be approved. If a majority of the votes cast
on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of continuation, then the
sales tax authorized under this section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted
under this section to the qualified voters and continuation fails to be approved by a majority
of the qualified voters voting on the question.

HB 3013 146
7. Except as modified under this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
94.950. 1. As used in this section, "museum" means museums operating or to be built
in the city and that are registered with the United States Internal Revenue Service as a 501(c)
(3) corporation, or an organization that is registered with the United States Internal Revenue
Service as a 501(c)(3) corporation and that develops, promotes, or operates historical
locations or preservation sites.
2. The governing body of any home rule city with more than forty-five thousand five
hundred but fewer than forty-five thousand nine hundred inhabitants and partially located in
any county of the first classification with more than one hundred four thousand six hundred
but fewer than one hundred four thousand seven hundred inhabitants may impose, by order or
ordinance, a sales tax on all retail sales made within the city which are subject to sales tax
under chapter 144. The tax authorized in this section shall not exceed one-half of one percent,
and shall be imposed solely for the purpose of funding the operation, construction, or
renovation of historical locations and museums to promote tourism. The tax authorized in
this section shall be in addition to all other sales taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated
separately from all other charges and taxes. The order or ordinance shall not become
effective unless the governing body of the city submits to the voters residing within the city at
a [state general,] primary[, or special] election a proposal to authorize the governing body of
the city to impose a tax under this section.
3. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) impose a sales tax at a rate of
______ (insert rate of percent) percent, solely for the purpose of
funding the operation, construction, or renovation of historical
locations and museums to promote tourism?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter immediately following notification to the department of revenue. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is

HB 3013 147
resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
4. All revenue collected under this section by the director of the department of
revenue on behalf of any city, except for one percent for the cost of collection which shall be
deposited in the state's general revenue fund, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which
is hereby created and shall be known as the "Local Option Museum Sales Tax Trust Fund",
and shall be used solely for the designated purposes. Moneys in the fund shall not be deemed
to be state funds, and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The director may
make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund and credited to the city for erroneous
payments and overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited
to the credit of such city. Any funds in the trust fund which are not needed for current
expenditures shall be invested in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest
and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund. Not later than the tenth
day of each month, the director shall distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund during
the preceding month to the city that levied the sales tax.
5. On or after the effective date of the tax, the director of revenue shall be responsible
for the administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of the tax, and sections 32.085
and 32.087 shall apply. In order to permit sellers required to collect and report the sales tax to
collect the amount required to be reported and remitted, but not to change the requirements of
reporting or remitting the tax, or to serve as a levy of the tax, and in order to avoid fractions of
pennies, the governing body of the city may authorize the use of a bracket system similar to
that authorized in section 144.285, and notwithstanding the provisions of that section, this
new bracket system shall be used where this tax is imposed and shall apply to all taxable
transactions. Beginning with the effective date of the tax, every retailer in the city shall add
the sales tax to the sale price, and this tax shall be a debt of the purchaser to the retailer until
paid, and shall be recoverable at law in the same manner as the purchase price. For purposes
of this section, all retail sales shall be deemed to be consummated at the place of business of
the retailer.
6. All applicable provisions in sections 144.010 to 144.525 governing the state sales
tax, and section 32.057, the uniform confidentiality provision, shall apply to the collection of
the tax, and all exemptions granted to agencies of government, organizations, and persons
under sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to the imposition and
collection of the tax. The same sales tax permit, exemption certificate, and retail certificate
required by sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the administration and collection of the state sales
tax shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and no additional permit or exemption
certificate or retail certificate shall be required; except that, the director of revenue may
prescribe a form of exemption certificate for an exemption from the tax. All discounts

HB 3013 148
allowed the retailer under the state sales tax for the collection of and for payment of taxes are
hereby allowed and made applicable to the tax. The penalties for violations provided in
section 32.057 and sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to violations of
this section. If any person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required to be paid
under this section, or in the event a determination has been made against the person for the tax
and penalty under this section, the limitation for bringing suit for the collection of the
delinquent tax and penalties shall be the same as that provided in sections 144.010 to 144.525.
7. The governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized in this
section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for
elections for the city] at the primary election. The ballot of submission shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city) repeal the sales tax imposed
at a rate of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for the purpose of
funding the operation, construction, or renovation of historical
locations and museums to promote tourism?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this
section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the
qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the
question.
8. Whenever the governing body of any city that has adopted the sales tax authorized
100 in this section receives a petition, signed by a number of registered voters of the city equal to
101 at least two percent of the number of registered voters of the city voting in the last
102 gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the sales tax imposed under this
103 section, the governing body shall submit to the voters of the city a proposal to repeal the tax.
104 If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
105 favor of the repeal, the repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
106 year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
107 qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this
108 section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the

HB 3013 149
109 qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the
110 question.
111 9. If the tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the trust
112 fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes, and the city shall notify the
113 director of the department of revenue of the action at least thirty days before the effective date
114 of the repeal and the director may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of
115 two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or
116 overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
117 such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in
118 such city, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the city and close the account
119 of that city. The director shall notify each city of each instance of any amount refunded or
120 any check redeemed from receipts due the city.
94.1011. 1. The governing body of any city of the third classification with more than
three thousand five hundred but fewer than three thousand six hundred inhabitants may
impose, by order or ordinance, a tax on the charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the
transient guests of hotels or motels situated in the city or a portion thereof. The tax shall be
not more than three percent per occupied room per night, and shall be imposed solely for the
purpose of funding the construction, maintenance, and repair of a multipurpose conference
and convention center. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to the charge for
the sleeping room and all other taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all
other charges and taxes.
2. No such order or ordinance shall become effective unless the governing body of
the city submits to the voters of the city at a [state general,] primary[, or special] election a
proposal to authorize the governing body of the city to impose a tax under this section. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of
the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second calendar
quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was held. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question,
then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted under this
section to the qualified voters of the city and such question is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting on the question.
3. All revenue generated by the tax shall be collected by the city collector of revenue,
shall be deposited in a special trust fund, and shall be used solely for the designated purposes.
If the tax is repealed, all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall continue to be used
solely for the designated purposes. Any funds in the special trust fund that are not needed for
current expenditures may be invested by the governing body in accordance with applicable

HB 3013 150
laws relating to the investment of other city funds. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund.
4. The governing body of any city that has adopted the tax authorized in this section
may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for elections
for the city] at the primary election. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal are in
favor of the repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax authorized in this
section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the
qualified voters of the city, and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question.
5. Whenever the governing body of any city that has adopted the tax authorized in
this section receives a petition, signed by a number of registered voters of the city equal to at
least two percent of the number of registered voters of the city voting in the last gubernatorial
election, calling for an election to repeal the tax imposed under this section, the governing
body shall submit to the voters of the city a proposal to repeal the tax. If a majority of the
votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal, that
repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such
repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the tax shall remain effective until the question
is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters of the city and the repeal is approved
by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
6. As used in this section, "transient guests" means a person or persons who occupy a
room or rooms in a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter.
100.120. The question of issuing general obligation bonds under a plan to finance a
project which has been approved by the governing body of the municipality shall be
submitted [within one year from the] at the next primary election following the date of
approval by the governing body. If the question of issuing general obligation bonds is
submitted and does not pass, the question shall not be submitted to the voters until the
governing body determines that the question may be submitted.
115.121. 1. The general election day shall be the first Tuesday after the first Monday
in November of even-numbered years.
2. The primary election day shall be the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August
of even-numbered years.
3. The election day for the election of political subdivision and special district officers
shall be the [first Tuesday after the first Monday in April each year, and shall be known as the
general municipal election day] same as the primary election day.

HB 3013 151
115.123. 1. All public elections shall be held on Tuesday. Except as provided in
subsection 2 of this section, and section 247.180, all public elections shall be held on the
general election day, the primary election day, [the general municipal election day,] the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in November, or on another day expressly provided by city or
county charter, and in nonprimary years on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August.
[Bond elections may be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in February but no
other issue shall be included on the ballot for such election.]
2. The following elections shall be exempt from the provisions of subsection 1 of this
section:
(1) Bond elections necessitated by fire, vandalism or natural disaster;
(2) Elections for which ownership of real property is required by law for voting;
(3) Special elections to fill vacancies and to decide tie votes or election contests; and
(4) Tax elections necessitated by a financial hardship due to a five percent or greater
decline in per-pupil state revenue to a school district from the previous year.
3. Nothing in this section prohibits a charter city or county from having its primary
election in March if the charter provided for a March primary before August 28, 1999.
4. [Nothing in this section shall prohibit elections held pursuant to section 65.600, but
no other issues shall be on the March ballot except pursuant to this chapter.]
Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, the general election for political
subdivision elections shall occur on the same day as the primary election as described as
section 115.121.
137.1040. 1. In addition to other levies authorized by law, the county commission in
counties not adopting an alternative form of government and the proper administrative body
in counties adopting an alternative form of government, or the governing body of any city,
town, or village, in their discretion may levy an additional tax, not to exceed one quarter of
one cent on each one hundred dollars assessed valuation, on all taxable real property located
within such city, town, village, or county, all of such tax to be collected and allocated to the
city, town, village, or county treasury, where it shall be known and designated as the
"Cemetery Maintenance Trust Fund" to be used for the upkeep and maintenance of cemeteries
located within such city, town, village, or county.
2. To the extent necessary to comply with Article X, Section 22(a) of the Missouri
Constitution, for any city, town, village, or county with a tax levy at or above the limitations
provided under Article X, Section 11(b), no ordinance adopted under this section shall
become effective unless the county commission or proper administrative body of the county,
or governing body of the city, town, or village submits to the voters of the city, town, village,
or county at a [state general,] primary[, or special] election a proposal to authorize the
imposition of a tax under this section. The tax authorized under this section shall be levied

HB 3013 152
and collected in the same manner as other real property taxes are levied and collected within
the city, town, village, or county. Such tax shall be in addition to all other taxes imposed on
real property, and shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes. Such tax shall
not become effective unless the county commission or proper administrative body of the
county or governing body of the city, town, or village, by order or ordinance, submits to the
voters of the county a proposal to authorize the city, town, village, or county to impose a tax
under this section on any day available for such city, town, village, or county to hold elections
[or at a special election called for that purpose].
3. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the city, town, village, or county)
impose a tax on all real property situated in ______ (name of the city,
town, village, or county) at a rate of ______ (insert rate not to exceed
one quarter of one cent per one hundred dollars assessed valuation) for
the sole purpose of providing funds for the maintenance, upkeep, and
preservation of city, town, village, or county cemeteries?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter immediately following notification to the city, town, village, or county
collector. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon
are opposed to the question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and until the
question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
4. The tax imposed under this section shall be known as the "Cemetery Maintenance
Tax". Each city, town, village, or county imposing a tax under this section shall establish
separate trust funds to be known as the "Cemetery Maintenance Trust Fund". The city, town,
village, or county treasurer shall deposit the revenue derived from the tax imposed under this
section for cemetery purposes in the city, town, village, or county cemetery maintenance trust
fund. The proceeds of such tax shall be appropriated by the county commission or
appropriate administrative body, or the governing body of the city, town, or village
exclusively for the maintenance, upkeep, and preservation of cemeteries located within the
jurisdiction of such commission or body.
5. All applicable provisions in this chapter relating to property tax shall apply to the
collection of any tax imposed under this section.

HB 3013 153
144.757. 1. As used in sections 144.757 to 144.761, "taxing jurisdiction" shall
include any county, municipality, or any other political subdivision authorized to impose a
sales tax under section 94.850, 94.890, 190.040, 190.305, 190.335, 190.455, or 321.552 or
any other statute authorizing the imposition of a sales tax for emergency services.
2. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any taxing
jurisdiction may, by a majority vote of its governing body, impose a local use tax if a local
sales tax is imposed as defined in section 32.085 or if a sales tax is imposed under section
94.850 , 94.890, 190.040, 190.305, 190.335, 190.455, or 321.552 or any other statute
authorizing the imposition of a sales tax for emergency services.
(2) Such local use tax shall be imposed on the same property and services upon which
the local sales tax or sales tax is imposed at a rate equal to the rate of the corresponding local
sales tax or sales tax imposed by such taxing jurisdiction.
(3) No such use tax shall be effective unless the governing body of the taxing
jurisdiction submits to the voters thereof at a [municipal, county, or state general,] primary[,
or special] election a proposal to authorize the governing body to impose a local use tax
pursuant to sections 144.757 to 144.761.
(4) The ballot of submission for a local use tax corresponding to a local sales tax, as
defined in section 32.085, or a sales tax under section 94.850 or 94.890 shall contain
substantially the following language:
Shall the ______ (county or municipality's name) impose a local
use tax at the same rate as the total local sales tax rate, provided
that if the local sales tax rate is reduced or raised by voter
approval, the local use tax rate shall also be reduced or raised by
the same action?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "NO".
(5) The ballot of submission for a local use tax corresponding to a sales tax imposed
under section 190.040, 190.305, 190.335, 190.455, or 321.552 or any other statute authorizing
the imposition of a sales tax for emergency services shall contain substantially the following
language:
"Shall the ______ (insert taxing jurisdiction's name) impose a
local use tax at the same rate as the _______ (insert name of the
corresponding sales tax), provided that if the _______ (insert
name of the corresponding sales tax) rate is reduced or raised by

HB 3013 154
voter approval, the local use tax rate shall also be reduced or
raised by the same action?"

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in
effect on the first day of the calendar quarter which begins at least forty-five days after the
director of revenue receives notice of adoption of the local use tax. If a majority of the votes
cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the governing body of the
taxing jurisdiction shall have no power to impose the local use tax as herein authorized unless
and until the governing body of the taxing jurisdiction shall again have submitted another
proposal to authorize the governing body of the taxing jurisdiction to impose the local use tax
and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
3. The local use tax may be imposed at the same rate as any sales tax listed in
subsection 1 of this section then currently in effect in the county or municipality upon all
transactions which are subject to the taxes imposed pursuant to sections 144.600 to 144.745
within the county or municipality adopting such tax; provided, however, that if any local sales
tax is repealed or the rate thereof is reduced or raised by voter approval, the local use tax rate
shall also be deemed to be repealed, reduced, or raised by the same action repealing, reducing,
or raising such sales tax. A county or municipality collecting a local use tax corresponding to
a sales tax imposed for an emergency service shall disburse a proportional share of such local
use tax to such emergency service agency or department.
4. For purposes of sections 144.757 to 144.761, the use tax may be referred to or
described as the equivalent of a sales tax on purchases made from out-of-state sellers by in-
state buyers and on certain intrabusiness transactions. Such a description shall not change the
classification, form or subject of the use tax or the manner in which it is collected. The use
tax shall not be described as a new tax or as not a new tax and shall not be advertised or
promoted in a manner in violation of section 115.646.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a local use tax
corresponding to a sales tax imposed under section 190.040, 190.305, 190.335, 190.455, or
321.552 or any other statute authorizing the imposition of a sales tax for emergency services
shall be collected, deposited, distributed, refunded, repealed, or otherwise administered as
provided in the authorizing statute for the corresponding sales tax.
162.191. 1. Within sixty days after receipt of approval by the state board of education
of the reorganization plan or part thereof, the county clerk shall submit the question in each
proposed school district wholly within the county or which has been designated by the state
board of education as belonging to the county. The notices of the election shall be signed by

HB 3013 155
the presiding commissioner of the county commission and the county clerk. The cost shall be
paid from the incidental fund. The election shall occur on the primary election day.
2. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ school district (and the ______ school district) be reorganized as a
district?
3. A majority affirmative vote in each district to be affected is required for adoption
of the proposed seven-director district. If the plan is not adopted, no subsequent plan
involving any part of the same area may be submitted sooner than one year following the date
of the submission of the question at which the plan was defeated.
162.223. 1. When the voters in any two or more adjacent districts without limitation
as to size or enrollment desire to consolidate and form a new district, a petition asking for an
election upon the question of consolidation shall be filed with the boards of education of the
affected districts; provided, however, that such petition shall be signed by ten percent of those
in each district who voted for school directors at the last election in which such directors were
elected, or one hundred voters, whichever is the higher number.
2. As an alternative to the procedure in subsection 1 of this section, two or more
adjacent districts may, by a majority vote of each board of education, call for an election upon
the question of consolidation.
3. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ school district and the ______ school district (and the ______ school
district) form a new district with a tax rate ceiling of ______ per one hundred dollars of
assessed valuation? If this proposition is approved, the adjusted operating levy of the new
school district is estimated to be ______ (amount) per one hundred dollars of assessed
valuation.
4. The board of directors of each affected district shall cause the question to be
included on the ballot to be submitted to the voters in each such district at the next primary
election day. A plat of the proposed new district shall be published and posted with the
notices of election.
5. The results of the voting on the proposal in each district affected shall be certified
to the state commissioner of education by the secretary of each board of education of each
district or by such other person or body charged with conducting such elections and, should
the majority of the votes cast in each affected district be in favor of the proposal, the state
commissioner shall declare the new district formed as of July first following the submission
of the question.
6. If the commissioner of education declares, before the closing date for filing for the
election of board members on the [municipal] primary election date, that the new district is
to be formed as of July first, no candidates shall be certified by the districts involved in the

HB 3013 156
consolidation and the board members whose terms would otherwise have expired on that date
shall remain as board members until July first. In consolidation cases where there is
insufficient time from the date the commissioner of education declares that the new district
shall be formed as of July first and July first to hold an election of board members, seven
board members from the boards of the consolidating districts shall be drawn by lot to serve
until the next election at which the new board of education can be elected. The number of
board members selected from one district shall not exceed the quotient resulting from seven
divided by the number of districts consolidating rounded down to the nearest whole number
plus one. The commissioner of education or a designee shall supervise the drawing, by lot, of
the board members which shall be approved by the state board of education.
182.015. 1. In addition to the provisions of section 182.010, the county commission
of any county of the state may establish by its order a county library district without a petition
or submission to the voters as provided in section 182.010, provided such district conforms
otherwise to the provisions of that section and does not include any part of a regional library
system established pursuant to other provisions of this chapter. In the event a district is so
established, the county commission shall propose an annual rate of taxation within the
limitations prescribed by section 182.010, which proposal shall be submitted to a vote of the
people in the same manner as though the district were formed under the provisions of that
section.
2. Where the county library district of any county is not operating a library within
such county, the county commission may divide the county library district into subdistricts.
In the event the subdistricts are established, the county commission shall propose an annual
rate of taxation, which proposal shall be submitted to a vote of the people residing in the
subdistrict in the same manner as provided for in section 182.010. If a majority of the votes
cast on the question are for the tax as submitted, the tax shall be levied and collected on
property within the subdistrict in the same manner as other county library taxes are levied and
collected pursuant to section 182.020. Such funds shall be used to provide library services in
the subdistrict of the county library district.
3. Where a tax has not been approved by the voters within a five-year period from the
establishment of a library district, such library district shall be dissolved.
4. (1) The boundaries of any subdistrict established under this section in any county
may be expanded as provided in this subsection. Whenever not less than ten percent of
registered voters residing in an area in such county adjacent to an existing subdistrict desire to
be annexed into the subdistrict, such registered voters shall file a petition with the governing
body of the county requesting, subject to the official approval of the existing county library
board, the expansion of the subdistrict. The petition shall contain the following information:
(a) The name and residence of each petitioner; and

HB 3013 157
(b) A specific description of the proposed subdistrict boundaries, including a map
illustrating the boundaries.
(2) Upon the filing of a petition under this subsection, subject to the official approval
of the existing county library board, the governing body of the county may, by resolution,
approve the expansion of the subdistrict. Any resolution to expand such subdistrict adopted
by the governing body of the county shall contain the following information:
(a) A description of the proposed boundaries of the subdistrict;
(b) The time and place of a hearing to be held to consider expansion of the subdistrict;
and
(c) The rate of tax to be imposed in the area of expansion and voted on within the
proposed subdistrict, if any.

Following the hearing required in this subsection, if the existing library board approves the
expansion, and if the governing body of the county determines that expansion is in the best
interest of the current subdistrict, then the governing body may, by order or ordinance,
provide for the expansion of the subdistrict and for any imposition of the existing subdistrict
tax rate within the area of expansion. The order or ordinance shall not become effective
unless the governing body of the county submits to the voters residing within the proposed
subdistrict, at a [state general,] primary[, or special] election, a proposal to authorize the
governing body of the county to expand the boundaries of the subdistrict and, if necessary, to
impose the existing subdistrict tax rate within the area of expansion. If a majority of the votes
cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon and residing in the existing
subdistrict and a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon and residing in the area proposed to be annexed into the subdistrict are in favor of the
question, then the expansion of the subdistrict and the imposition of the tax within the area of
expansion shall become effective on the first day of the second calendar quarter immediately
following the vote. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
voting thereon in either the existing subdistrict or in the area proposed to be annexed into the
subdistrict are opposed to the question, then the expansion of the subdistrict and the
imposition of the tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted
under this subsection to the qualified voters and such question is approved by the required
majorities of the qualified voters voting on the question under this subsection.
(3) The governing body of any county that has expanded subdistrict boundaries or
imposed a tax increase authorized in this subsection may submit the question of repeal of the
expansion of boundaries and the accompanying imposition of the tax in the area of expansion
to the voters of the subdistrict [on any date available for elections for the county] at the
primary election.

HB 3013 158

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of repeal, that repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar
year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the expansion of boundaries
and the imposition of the tax as authorized in this subsection shall remain effective until the
question is resubmitted under this subsection to the qualified voters and the repeal is approved
by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
(4) Whenever the governing body of any county that has expanded subdistrict
boundaries or imposed a tax as authorized in this subsection receives a petition, signed by ten
percent of the registered voters of the library subdistrict, calling for an election to repeal the
expansion of boundaries and the accompanying imposition of the tax in the area of expansion
under this subsection, the governing body shall submit to the voters of the subdistrict a
proposal to repeal the expansion and the accompanying imposition of the tax. If a majority of
the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal,
the repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such
repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the expansion of boundaries and the imposition
of the tax as authorized in this subsection shall remain effective until the question is
resubmitted under this subsection to the qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a
majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
182.105. 1. The county library board in any county library district may provide for
the purchase of ground and for the erection of public library buildings, and for the
improvement of existing buildings, and may provide for the payment of the same by the issue
of bonds or otherwise, subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in this section.
2. No bonds shall be issued in an amount in excess of five percent of the value of
taxable, tangible property in the county library district, as shown by the last completed
assessment for state and county purposes, nor shall such indebtedness be incurred unless it
has been approved by the vote of the constitutionally required percentage of the voters of the
county library district voting on the question at a [municipal] primary election.
3. Before incurring any indebtedness as authorized in this section, the county library
board shall provide for the collection of an annual tax on all taxable, tangible property in the
county library district sufficient to pay the interest and principal of the indebtedness as they
shall fall due and to retire the same within twenty years from the date contracted.
4. If, upon the returns from the election, which shall be certified to the county
commission, it appears that the question to incur or increase such indebtedness has been
assented to by the constitutionally required percentage of the voters voting on the question,

HB 3013 159
the county commission shall enter of record a brief recital of the returns and shall declare that
the county library board may issue bonds of the county library district in a total amount not in
excess of that authorized by the voters. The bonds shall be issued in denominations of not
less than one hundred dollars, or some multiple thereof, payable in not more than twenty
years from the date they bear, bearing interest from such date at a rate not exceeding the rate
per annum authorized by law. All bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the county library
board, attested by the signature of the secretary, and each bond shall have impressed thereon
the corporate seal of the county library district.
182.703. Urban public library districts may be created, upon the favorable vote of a
majority of the residents of the nine director school district voting at an election held [on any
permissible] at the primaryelection date. The decision as to whether the issue of creation of
a new urban public library district will be placed on the ballot must be made by a majority
vote of the nine member board of directors of the urban school district. The boundaries of
any new urban public library district shall coincide with the respective nine director urban
school district. Upon creation of any such district, the new district shall be designated as
successor to any public library system operated within such boundaries immediately
preceding the date of the election, and shall be entitled to levy a property tax at the same rate
as had been authorized pursuant to section 137.030 for operation of the public library by the
nine director urban school district immediately prior to creation of the new urban public
library district. Effective the first calendar year after the election resulting in creation of the
urban public library district, the nine director urban school district serving the same
boundaries shall no longer be authorized to levy a tax for public library purposes. The
alteration of the boundaries of a nine director urban school district shall not affect the
boundaries of any urban public library district created pursuant to sections 182.701 to
182.723.
182.802. 1. (1) Any public library district located in any of the following counties
may impose a tax as provided in this section:
(a) At least partially within any county of the third classification without a township
form of government and with more than forty thousand eight hundred but fewer than forty
thousand nine hundred inhabitants;
(b) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than thirteen thousand five hundred but fewer than thirteen thousand six hundred
inhabitants;
(c) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than thirteen thousand two hundred but fewer than thirteen thousand three hundred
inhabitants;

HB 3013 160
(d) Any county of the third classification with a township form of government and
with more than twenty-nine thousand seven hundred but fewer than twenty-nine thousand
eight hundred inhabitants;
(e) Any county of the second classification with more than nineteen thousand seven
hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand eight hundred inhabitants;
(f) Any county of the third classification with a township form of government and
with more than thirty-three thousand one hundred but fewer than thirty-three thousand two
hundred inhabitants;
(g) Any county of the third classification without a township form of government and
with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty thousand inhabitants and with a city
of the third classification with more than six thousand but fewer than seven thousand
inhabitants as the county seat;
(h) Any county of the fourth classification with more than twenty thousand but fewer
than thirty thousand inhabitants; or
(i) Any county of the third classification with more than thirteen thousand nine
hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants.
(2) Any public library district listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection may, by a
majority vote of its board of directors, impose a tax not to exceed one-half of one cent on all
retail sales subject to taxation under sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose of funding
the operation and maintenance of public libraries within the boundaries of such library
district. The tax authorized by this subsection shall be in addition to all other taxes allowed
by law. No tax under this subsection shall become effective unless the board of directors
submits to the voters of the district, at a [county or state general,] primary [or special]
election, a proposal to authorize the tax, and such tax shall become effective only after the
majority of the voters voting on such tax approve such tax.
2. In the event the district seeks to impose a sales tax under this subsection, the
question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall a ______ cent sales tax be levied on all retail sales within the
district for the purpose of providing funding for ______ library
district?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the tax shall become effective. If a majority of the votes cast by
the qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the board of directors shall have
no power to impose the tax unless and until another proposal to authorize the tax is submitted
to the voters of the district and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters

HB 3013 161
voting thereon. The provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087 shall apply to any tax approved
under this subsection.
3. As used in this section, "qualified voters" or "voters" means any individuals
residing within the district who are eligible to be registered voters and who have registered to
vote under chapter 115, or, if no individuals are eligible and registered to vote reside within
the proposed district, all of the owners of real property located within the proposed district
who have unanimously petitioned for or consented to the adoption of an ordinance by the
governing body imposing a tax authorized in this section. If the owner of the property within
the proposed district is a political subdivision or corporation of the state, the governing body
of such political subdivision or corporation shall be considered the owner for purposes of this
section.
4. For purposes of this section the term "public library district" shall mean any city
library district, county library district, city-county library district, municipal library district,
consolidated library district, or urban library district.
190.050. 1. After the ambulance district has been declared organized, the declaring
county commission, except in counties of the second class having more than one hundred five
thousand inhabitants located adjacent to a county of the first class having a charter form of
government which has a population of over nine hundred thousand inhabitants, shall divide
the district into six election districts as equal in population as possible, and shall by lot
number the districts from one to six inclusive. The county commission shall cause an election
to be held in the ambulance district [within ninety days] at the next primary election after
the order establishing the ambulance district to elect ambulance district directors. Each voter
shall vote for one director from the ambulance election district in which the voter resides.
The directors elected from districts one and four shall serve for a term of one year, the
directors elected from districts two and five shall serve for a term of two years, and the
directors from districts three and six shall serve for a term of three years; thereafter, the terms
of all directors shall be three years. All directors shall serve the term to which they were
elected or appointed, and until their successors are elected and qualified, except in cases of
resignation or disqualification. The county commission shall reapportion the ambulance
districts within sixty days after the population of the county is reported to the governor for
each decennial census of the United States. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the
number of candidates for the office of director is no greater than the number of directors to be
elected, no election shall be held, and the candidates shall assume the responsibilities of their
offices at the same time and in the same manner as if they have been elected.
2. In all counties of the second class having more than one hundred five thousand
inhabitants located adjacent to a county of the first class having a charter form of government
which has a population of over nine hundred thousand inhabitants, the voters shall vote for six

HB 3013 162
directors elected at large from within the district for a term of three years. Those directors
holding office in any district in such a county on August 13, 1976, shall continue to hold
office until the expiration of their terms, and their successors shall be elected from the district
at large for a term of three years. In any district formed in such counties after August 13,
1976, the governing body of the county shall cause an election to be held in that district
[within ninety days] at the next primary election after the order establishing the ambulance
district to elect ambulance district directors. Each voter shall vote for six directors. The two
candidates receiving the highest number of votes at such election shall be elected for a term of
three years, the two candidates receiving the third and fourth highest number of votes shall be
elected for a term of two years, the two candidates receiving the fifth and sixth highest
number of votes shall be elected for a term of one year; thereafter, the term of all directors
shall be three years.
3. A candidate for director of the ambulance district shall, at the time of filing, be a
citizen of the United States, a qualified voter of the election district as provided in subsection
1 of this section, a resident of the district for two years next preceding the election, and shall
be at least twenty-four years of age. In an established district which is located within the
jurisdiction of more than one election authority, the candidate shall file his or her declaration
of candidacy with the secretary of the board. In all other districts, a candidate shall file a
declaration of candidacy with the county clerk of the county in which he or she resides. A
candidate shall file a statement under oath that he or she possesses the required qualifications.
No candidate's name shall be printed on any official ballot unless the candidate has filed a
written declaration of candidacy pursuant to subsection 5 of section 115.127. [If the time
between the county commission's call for a special election and the date of the election is not
sufficient to allow compliance with subsection 5 of section 115.127, the county commission
shall, at the time it calls the special election, set the closing date for filing declarations of
candidacy.]
190.335. 1. In lieu of the tax levy authorized under section 190.305 for emergency
telephone services, the county commission of any county may impose a county sales tax for
the provision of central dispatching of fire protection, including law enforcement agencies,
emergency ambulance service or any other emergency services, including emergency
telephone services, which shall be collectively referred to herein as "emergency services", and
which may also include the purchase and maintenance of communications and emergency
equipment, including the operational costs associated therein, in accordance with the
provisions of this section.
2. Such county commission may, by a majority vote of its members, submit to the
voters of the county, at a [public] primary election, a proposal to authorize the county
commission to impose a tax under the provisions of this section. If the residents of the county

HB 3013 163
present a petition signed by a number of residents equal to ten percent of those in the county
who voted in the most recent gubernatorial election, then the commission shall submit such a
proposal to the voters of the county.
3. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the county of ______ (insert name of county) impose a county
sales tax of ______ (insert rate of percent) percent for the purpose of
providing central dispatching of fire protection, emergency ambulance
service, including emergency telephone services, and other emergency
services?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance shall be in effect as provided herein. If a majority of
the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the county
commission shall have no power to impose the tax authorized by this section unless and until
the county commission shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the county
commission to impose the tax under the provisions of this section, and such proposal is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
4. The sales tax may be imposed at a rate not to exceed one percent on the receipts
from the sale at retail of all tangible personal property or taxable services at retail within any
county adopting such tax, if such property and services are subject to taxation by the state of
Missouri under the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525. The sales tax shall not be
collected prior to thirty-six months before operation of the central dispatching of emergency
services.
5. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
6. Any tax imposed pursuant to section 190.305 shall terminate at the end of the tax
year in which the tax imposed pursuant to this section for emergency services is certified by
the board to be fully operational. Any revenues collected from the tax authorized under
section 190.305 shall be credited for the purposes for which they were intended.
7. At least once each calendar year, the board shall establish a tax rate, not to exceed
the amount authorized, that together with any surplus revenues carried forward will produce
sufficient revenues to fund the expenditures authorized by this act. Amounts collected in
excess of that necessary within a given year shall be carried forward to subsequent years. The
board shall make its determination of such tax rate each year no later than September first and
shall fix the new rate which shall be collected as provided in this act. Immediately upon

HB 3013 164
making its determination and fixing the rate, the board shall publish in its minutes the new
rate, and it shall notify every retailer by mail of the new rate.
8. Immediately upon the affirmative vote of voters of such a county on the ballot
proposal to establish a county sales tax pursuant to the provisions of this section, the county
commission shall appoint the initial members of a board to administer the funds and oversee
the provision of emergency services in the county. Beginning with the general election in
1994, all board members shall be elected according to this section and other applicable laws
of this state. At the time of the appointment of the initial members of the board, the
commission shall relinquish and no longer exercise the duties prescribed in this chapter with
regard to the provision of emergency services and such duties shall be exercised by the board.
9. The initial board shall consist of seven members appointed without regard to
political affiliation, who shall be selected from, and who shall represent, the fire protection
districts, ambulance districts, sheriff's department, municipalities, any other emergency
services and the general public. This initial board shall serve until its successor board is duly
elected and installed in office. The commission shall ensure geographic representation of the
county by appointing no more than four members from each district of the county
commission.
10. Beginning in 1994, three members shall be elected from each district of the
county commission and one member shall be elected at large, such member to be the
chairman of the board. Of those first elected, four members from districts of the county
commission shall be elected for terms of two years and two members from districts of the
county commission and the member at large shall be elected for terms of four years. In 1996,
and thereafter, all terms of office shall be four years; provided that, if a board established
under this section consolidates with a board established under this section, section 190.327, or
section 190.328, under the provisions of section 190.470, the term of office for the existing
board members shall end on the thirtieth day following the appointment of the initial board of
directors for the consolidated district. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if there is
no candidate for an open position on the board, then no election shall be held for that position
and it shall be considered vacant, to be filled pursuant to the provisions of section 190.339,
and, if there is only one candidate for each open position, no election shall be held and the
candidate or candidates shall assume office at the same time and in the same manner as if
elected.
11. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 8 to 10 of this section to the
contrary, in any county of the first classification with more than two hundred forty thousand
three hundred but fewer than two hundred forty thousand four hundred inhabitants or in any
county of the third classification with a township form of government and with more than
twenty-eight thousand but fewer than thirty-one thousand inhabitants or in any county of the

HB 3013 165
third classification without a township form of government and with more than thirty-seven
thousand but fewer than forty-one thousand inhabitants and with a city of the fourth
classification with more than four thousand five hundred but fewer than five thousand
inhabitants as the county seat, any emergency telephone service 911 board appointed by the
county under section 190.309 which is in existence on the date the voters approve a sales tax
under this section shall continue to exist and shall have the powers set forth under section
190.339. Such boards which existed prior to August 25, 2010, shall not be considered a body
corporate and a political subdivision of the state for any purpose, unless and until an order is
entered upon an unanimous vote of the commissioners of the county in which such board is
established reclassifying such board as a corporate body and political subdivision of the state.
The order shall approve the transfer of the assets and liabilities related to the operation of the
emergency telephone service 911 system to the new entity created by the reclassification of
the board.
12. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 8 to 10 of this section to the
contrary, in any county of the second classification with more than fifty-four thousand two
100 hundred but fewer than fifty-four thousand three hundred inhabitants or any county of the first
101 classification with more than fifty thousand but fewer than seventy thousand inhabitants that
102 has approved a sales tax under this section, the county commission shall appoint the members
103 of the board to administer the funds and oversee the provision of emergency services in the
104 county.
105 (2) The board shall consist of seven members appointed without regard to political
106 affiliation. Except as provided in subdivision (4) of this subsection, each member shall be
107 one of the following:
108 (a) The head of any of the county's fire protection districts, or a designee;
109 (b) The head of any of the county's ambulance districts, or a designee;
110 (c) The county sheriff, or a designee;
111 (d) The head of any of the police departments in the county, or a designee; and
112 (e) The head of any of the county's emergency management organizations, or a
113 designee.
114 (3) Upon the appointment of the board under this subsection, the board shall have the
115 power provided in section 190.339 and shall exercise all powers and duties exercised by the
116 county commission under this chapter, and the commission shall relinquish all powers and
117 duties relating to the provision of emergency services under this chapter to the board.
118 (4) In any county of the first classification with more than fifty thousand but fewer
119 than seventy thousand inhabitants, each of the entities listed in subdivision (2) of this
120 subsection shall be represented on the board by at least one member.

HB 3013 166
121 (5) In any county with more than fifty thousand but fewer than seventy thousand
122 inhabitants and with a county seat with more than two thousand one hundred but fewer than
123 two thousand four hundred inhabitants, the entities listed in subdivision (2) of this subsection
124 shall be represented by one member, and two members shall be residents of the county not
125 affiliated with any of the entities listed in subdivision (2) of this subsection and shall be
126 known as public members.
127 13. Any county that has authorized a tax levy under this section prior to January 1,
128 2012, and such levy is reduced automatically after approval of such levy, shall not submit to
129 the voters of the county for approval any proposal authorized under this section that is greater
130 than the amount at the time of reduction.
131 14. A purchase that provides prepaid wireless telecommunications service, as such
132 term is defined in section 190.460, is specifically exempted from the tax imposed under this
133 section or section 190.292 if such county did not prohibit the prepaid wireless emergency
134 telephone service charge as allowed in subsection 6 of section 190.460 or votes to impose the
135 prepaid wireless emergency telephone service charge as allowed under subsection 7 of section
136 190.460.
190.455. 1. Except as provided under subsection 10 of this section, in lieu of the tax
levy authorized under section 190.305 or 190.325, or the sales tax imposed under section
190.292 or 190.335, the governing body of any county, city not within a county, or home rule
city with more than fifteen thousand but fewer than seventeen thousand inhabitants and
partially located in any county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than thirty-seven thousand but fewer than forty-one thousand
inhabitants may impose, by order or ordinance, a monthly fee on subscribers of any
communications service that has been enabled to contact 911. The monthly fee authorized in
this section shall not exceed one dollar and shall be assessed to the subscriber of the
communications service, regardless of technology, based upon the number of active telephone
numbers, or their functional equivalents or successors, assigned by the provider and capable
of simultaneously contacting the public safety answering point; provided that, for multiline
telephone systems and for facilities provisioned with capacity greater than a voice-capable
grade channel or its equivalent, regardless of technology, the charge shall be assessed on the
number of voice-capable grade channels as provisioned by the provider that allow
simultaneous contact with the public safety answering point. Only one fee may be
assessed per active telephone number, or its functional equivalent or successor, used to
provide a communications service. No fee imposed under this section shall be imposed on
more than one hundred voice-grade channels or their equivalent per person per location.
Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the monthly fee shall not be
assessed on the provision of broadband internet access service. The fee shall be imposed

HB 3013 167
solely for the purpose of funding 911 service in such county or city. The monthly fee
authorized in this section shall be limited to one fee per device. The fee authorized in this
section shall be in addition to all other taxes and fees imposed by law and may be stated
separately from all other charges and taxes. The fee shall be the liability of the subscriber, not
the provider, except that the provider shall be liable to remit all fees that the provider collects
under this section.
2. No such order or ordinance adopted under this section shall become effective
unless the governing body of the county or city submits to the voters residing within the
county or city at a [state general,] primary[, or special] election a proposal to authorize the
governing body to impose a fee under this section. The question submitted shall be in
substantially the following form:
"Shall _________ (insert name of county or city) impose a
monthly fee of _________ (insert amount) on a subscriber of any
communications service that has been enabled to contact 911 for
the purpose of funding 911 service in the _________ (county or
city)?".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, the fee shall become effective on the first day of the second calendar
quarter after the director of revenue receives notification of adoption of the fee. If a majority
of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the
question, the fee shall not become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted under
this section to the qualified voters and such question is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting on the question.
3. Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, the governing body
of a county with a charter form of government and with more than six hundred thousand but
fewer than seven hundred thousand inhabitants shall put the question set forth in subsection 2
of this section before the voters of the county no later than the general election in 2020.
4. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087 and
subsection 7 of section 144.190 shall apply to the fee imposed under this section.
5. All revenue collected under this section by the director of the department of
revenue on behalf of the county or city, except for two percent to be withheld by the provider
for the cost of administering the collection and remittance of the fee, and one percent for the
cost of collection which shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund, shall be
deposited in the Missouri 911 service trust fund created under section 190.420. The director
of the department of revenue shall remit such funds to the county or city on a monthly basis.
The governing body of any such county or city shall control such funds remitted to the county

HB 3013 168
or city unless the county or city has established an elected board for the purpose of
administering such funds. In the event that any county or city has established a board under
any other provision of state law for the purpose of administering funds for 911 service, such
existing board may continue to perform such functions after the county or city has adopted the
monthly fee under this section.
6. Nothing in this section imposes any obligation upon a provider of a
communications service to take any legal action to enforce the collection of the tax
imposed in this section. The tax shall be collected in compliance, as applicable, with the
federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. Sections 116 to 124, as amended.
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, proprietary information
submitted under this section shall only be subject to subpoena or lawful court order.
Information collected under this section shall only be released or published in aggregate
amounts that do not identify or allow identification of numbers of subscribers or revenues
attributable to an individual communications service provider.
8. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, in no event shall any
communications service provider, its officers, employees, assigns, agents, vendors, or anyone
acting on behalf of such persons, be liable for any form of civil damages or criminal liability
that directly or indirectly results from, or is caused by:
(1) An act or omission in the development, design, installation, operation,
maintenance, performance, or provision of service to a public safety answering point or to
subscribers that use such service, whether providing such service is required by law or is
voluntary; or
(2) The release of subscriber information to any governmental entity under this
section unless such act, release of subscriber information, or omission constitutes gross
negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct.

Nothing in this section is intended to void or otherwise override any contractual obligation
pertaining to equipment or services sold to a public safety answering point by a
communications service provider. No cause of action shall lie in any court of law against
any provider of communications service, commercial mobile service, or other
communications-related service, or its officers, employees, assignees, agents, vendors, or
anyone acting on behalf of such persons, for providing call location information concerning
the user of any such service in an emergency situation to a law enforcement official or agency
in order to respond to a call for emergency service by a subscriber, customer, or user of such
service or for providing caller location information or doing a ping locate in an emergency
situation that involves danger of death or serious physical injury to any person where

HB 3013 169
disclosure of communications relating to the emergency is required without delay, whether
such provision of information is required by law or voluntary.
9. The fee imposed under this section shall not be imposed on customers who pay for
service prospectively, including customers of prepaid wireless telecommunications service.
10. The fee imposed under this section shall not be imposed in conjunction with any
100 tax imposed under section 190.292, 190.305, 190.325, or 190.335. No county or city shall
101 simultaneously impose more than one tax authorized in this section or section 190.292,
102 190.305, 190.325, or 190.335. No fee imposed under this section shall be imposed on more
103 than one hundred exchange access facilities or their equivalent per person per location. The
104 fee imposed under this section shall not be imposed in conjunction with any tax imposed for
105 central dispatching of emergency services in any home rule city with more than four hundred
106 thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county or any county containing a portion
107 of such city, and such city or counties shall not simultaneously impose more than one tax or
108 fee for central dispatching of emergency services; provided however, if any such county
109 approves the fee authorized under this section, collection of such fee shall be in lieu of any tax
110 authorized for central dispatching of emergency services in the county and any portion of the
111 city within the county.
112 11. No county or legally authorized entity shall submit a proposal to the voters of the
113 county under this section or section 190.335 until either:
114 (1) All providers of emergency telephone service as defined in section 190.300 and
115 public safety answering point operations within the county are consolidated into one public
116 agency as defined in section 190.300 that provides emergency telephone service for the
117 county, or such providers and the public safety answering point have entered into a shared
118 services agreement for such services;
119 (2) The county develops a plan for consolidation of emergency telephone service, as
120 defined in section 190.300, and public safety answering point operations within the county
121 are consolidated into one public agency, as defined in section 190.300, that provides
122 emergency telephone service for the county; or
123 (3) The county emergency services board, as defined in section 190.290, develops a
124 plan for consolidation of emergency telephone service, as defined in section 190.300, and
125 public safety answering point operations within the county that includes either consolidation
126 or entering into a shared services agreement for such services, which shall be implemented on
127 approval of the fee by the voters.
128 12. Any plan developed under subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection 11 of this section
129 shall be filed with the Missouri 911 service board under subsection 4 of section 650.330. Any
130 plan that is filed under this subsection shall provide for the establishment of a joint emergency
131 communications board as described in section 70.260 unless a joint emergency

HB 3013 170
132 communication board or emergency services board for the area in question has been
133 previously established. The director of the department of revenue shall not remit any funds as
134 provided under this section until the department receives notification from the Missouri 911
135 service board that the county has filed a plan that is ready for implementation. If, after one
136 year following the enactment of the fee described in subsection 1 of this section, the county
137 has not complied with the plan that the county submitted under subdivision (2) or (3) of
138 subsection 11 of this section, but the county has substantially complied with the plan, the
139 Missouri 911 service board may grant the county an extension of up to six months to comply
140 with its plan. Not more than one extension may be granted to a county. The authority to
141 impose the fee granted to the county in subsection 1 of this section shall be null and void if
142 after one year following the enactment of the fee described in subsection 1 of this section the
143 county has not complied with the plan and has not been granted an extension by the Missouri
144 911 service board, or if the six-month extension expires and the county has not complied with
145 the plan.
146 13. Each county that does not have a public agency, as defined in section 190.300,
147 that provides emergency telephone service as defined in section 190.300 for the county shall
148 either:
149 (1) Enter into a shared-services agreement for providing emergency telephone
150 services with a public agency that provides emergency telephone service, if such an
151 agreement is feasible; or
152 (2) Form with one or more counties an emergency telephone services district in
153 conjunction with any county with a public agency that provides emergency telephone service
154 within the county. If such a district is formed under this subdivision, the governing body of
155 such district shall be the county commissioners of each county within the district, and each
156 county within such district shall submit to the voters of the county a proposal to impose the
157 fee under this section.
158 14. A county operating joint or shared emergency telephone service, as defined in
159 section 190.300, may submit to the voters of the county a proposal to impose the fee to
160 support joint operations and further consolidation under this section.
161 15. All 911 fees shall be imposed as provided in the Mobile Telecommunications
162 Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. Sections 116 to 124, as amended.
163 16. Nothing in subsections 11, 12, 13, and 14 of this section shall apply to a county
164 with a charter form of government where all public safety answering points within the county
165 utilize a common 911 communication service as implemented by the appropriate local and
166 county agencies prior to August 28, 2018.
167 17. Any home rule city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located
168 in more than one county and any county in which it is located shall establish an agreement

HB 3013 171
169 regarding the allocation of anticipated revenue created upon passage of a ballot proposition
170 submitted to the voters as provided for in sections 190.292, 190.305, 190.325, 190.335, and
171 190.455, as well as revenue provided based upon section 190.460 and the divided costs
172 related to regional 911 services. The allocation and actual expenses of the regional 911
173 service shall be determined based upon the percentage of residents of each county who also
174 reside in the home rule city. The agreement between the counties and the home rule city may
175 either be between the individual counties and the home rule city or jointly between all
176 entities. The agreement to divide costs and revenue as required in this section shall not take
177 effect until the passage of a ballot proposition as provided for in section 190.292, 190.305,
178 190.325, 190.335, or 190.455. The population shall be determined based upon the most
179 recent decennial census. This subsection shall not apply to a county of the first classification
180 without a charter form of government and with less than five percent of its population living
181 in any home rule city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more
182 than one county.
204.602. 1. Proceedings for the new formation of a reorganized common sewer
district under sections 204.600 to 204.640 shall be substantially as follows: a petition in
duplicate describing the proposed boundaries of the reorganized district sought to be formed,
accompanied by a plat of the proposed district, shall first be filed with each county
commission having jurisdiction in the geographic area the proposed district is situated. Such
petition shall be ruled on by each county commission having jurisdiction within thirty days
from the date of hearing the petition. If the petition for the reorganized district is rejected by
any county commission having jurisdiction, no further action on the proposed district shall
take place before the county commission which rejected the petition or the circuit court of that
county in the county which rejected the petition. If approved by each county commission
having jurisdiction, a petition in duplicate describing the proposed boundaries of the
reorganized district sought to be formed, accompanied by a plat of the proposed district, shall
be filed with the clerk of the circuit court of the county wherein the proposed district is
situated or with the clerk of the circuit court of the county having the largest acreage proposed
to be included in the proposed district, in the event that the proposed district embraces lands
in more than one county. Such petition, in addition to such boundary description, shall set
forth an estimate of the number of customers of the proposed district, the necessity for the
formation of the district, the probable cost of acquiring or constructing sanitary sewer
improvements [with] within the district, if appropriate, an approximation of the assessed
valuation of taxable property within the district, whether the board of trustees shall be elected
or appointed by the county commission, and such other information as may be useful to the
court in determining whether or not the petition should be granted and a decree of
incorporation entered. Such petition shall be accompanied by a cash deposit of fifty dollars as

HB 3013 172
an advancement of the costs of the proceeding. The petition shall be signed by not less than
fifty voters or property owners within the proposed district and shall request the incorporation
of the territory therein described into a reorganized common sewer district. The petition shall
be verified by at least one of the signers.
2. Upon filing, the petition shall be presented to the circuit court, and such court shall
fix a date for a hearing on such petition, as provided in this section. The clerk of the court
shall give notice of the petition filing in some newspaper of general circulation in the county
in which the proceedings are pending. If the district extends into any other county, such
notice also shall be published in some newspaper of general circulation in such other county.
The notice shall contain a description of the proposed boundary lines of the district and the
general purposes of the petition. The notice shall set forth the date fixed for the hearing on
the petition, which shall not be less than fifteen nor more than twenty-one days after the date
of the last publication of the notice, and shall be on some regular judicial day of the court that
the petition is pending. Such notice shall be signed by the clerk of the circuit court and shall
be published in three successive issues of a weekly newspaper or in a daily paper once a week
for three consecutive weeks.
3. The court, for good cause shown, may continue the case or the hearing from time to
time until final disposition.
4. Exceptions to the formation of a district, or to the boundaries outlined in the
petition for incorporation, may be made by any voter or property owner within the proposed
districts, provided that such exceptions are filed not less than five days prior to the date set for
the hearing on the petition. Such exceptions shall specify the grounds upon which the
exceptions are being made. If any such exceptions are filed, the court shall take them into
consideration in passing upon the petition and also shall consider the evidence in support of
the petition and in support of the exceptions made. Should the court find that the petition
should be granted but that changes should be made in the boundary lines, it shall make such
changes in the boundary lines as set forth in the petition as the court may deem proper and
enter its decree of incorporation, with such boundaries as changed. No public sewer district
shall be formed under this chapter, chapter 249, section 247.035, or any sewer district created
and organized under constitutional authority, the boundaries of which shall encroach upon the
corporate boundaries of any sewer district then existing or upon the certificated boundaries
then existing of any sewer corporation providing service under a certificate of convenience
and necessity granted by the public service commission. Nor shall any public sewer district
extend wastewater collection and treatment services within the boundaries of another district
without a written cooperative agreement between such districts or within the certificated
boundaries then existing of any sewer corporation providing service under a certificate of
convenience and necessity granted by the public service commission without a written

HB 3013 173
cooperative agreement between the public sewer district and the certificated sewer
corporation.
5. Should the court find that it would not be in the public interest to form such a
district, the petition shall be dismissed at the cost of the petitioners. If the court should find in
favor of the formation of such district, the court shall enter its decree of incorporation, setting
forth the boundaries of the proposed district as determined by the court under the hearing.
The decree shall further contain an appointment of five voters from the district to constitute
the first board of trustees of the district. The court shall designate such trustees to staggered
terms from one to five years such that one director is appointed or elected each year. The
trustees appointed by the court shall serve for the terms designated and until their successors
have been appointed or elected as provided in section 204.610. The decree shall further
designate the name of the district by which it shall officially be known.
6. The decree of incorporation shall not become final and conclusive until it is
submitted to the voters residing within the boundaries described in such decree and until it is
assented to by a majority of the voters as provided in subsection 9 of this section or by two-
thirds of the voters of the district voting on the proposition at the primary election. The
decree shall provide for the submission of the question and shall fix the date of submission.
The returns shall be certified by the election authority to the circuit court having jurisdiction
in the case, and the court shall enter its order canvassing the returns and declaring the result of
such election.
7. If a majority of the voters of the district voting on such proposition approve of the
proposition, then the court shall, in such order declaring the result of the election, enter a
further order declaring the decree of incorporation to be final and conclusive. In the event,
however, that the court should find that the question had not been assented to by the majority
required in this section, the court shall enter a further order declaring such decree of
incorporation to be void. No appeal shall be permitted from any such decree of incorporation
nor from any of the aforesaid orders. In the event that the court declares the decree of
incorporation to be final, the clerk of the circuit court shall file certified copies of such decree
of incorporation and of such final order with the secretary of state of the state of Missouri,
with the recorder of deeds of the county or counties in which the district is situated, and with
the clerk of the county commission of the county or counties in which the district is situated.
8. The costs incurred in the formation of the district shall be taxed to the district, if the
district is incorporated; otherwise the costs shall be paid by the petitioners.
9. If petitioners seeking formation of a reorganized common sewer district specify in
their petition that the district to be organized shall be organized without authority to issue
general obligation bonds, then the decree relating to the formation of the district shall recite
that the district shall not have authority to issue general obligation bonds. The vote required

HB 3013 174
for such a decree of incorporation to become final and conclusive shall be a simple majority
of the voters of the district.
100 10. Once a reorganized sewer district is established, the boundaries of the reorganized
101 sewer district may be extended or enlarged from time to time upon the filing, with the clerk of
102 the circuit court having jurisdiction, of a petition by either:
103 (1) The board of trustees of the reorganized sewer district and five or more voters or
104 landowners within the territory proposed to be added to the district; or
105 (2) The board of trustees and a majority of the landowners within the territory that is
106 proposed to be added to the reorganized sewer district.
107
108 If the petition is filed by a majority of the voters or landowners within the territory proposed
109 to be added to the reorganized sewer district, the publication of notice shall not be required,
110 provided notice is posted in three public places within such territory at least seven days before
111 the date of the hearing, and provided that there is sworn testimony by at least five landowners
112 in such territory, or a majority of the landowners if the total landowners in the area are fewer
113 than ten. Otherwise the procedures for notice substantially shall follow the procedures in
114 subsection 2 of this section for formation. Territory proposed to be added to the reorganized
115 sewer district may be either contiguous or reasonably close to the boundaries of the existing
116 district, provided that it shall not include any territory within the corporate boundaries of any
117 sewer district then existing or within the certificated boundaries then existing of any sewer
118 corporation providing service under a certificate of convenience and necessity granted by the
119 public service commission. Upon the entry of a final judgment declaring the court's decree of
120 territory proposed to be added to the reorganized sewer district to be final and conclusive, the
121 court shall modify or rearrange the boundary lines of the reorganized sewer district as may be
122 necessary or advisable. The costs incurred in the enlargement or extension of the district shall
123 be taxed to the district, if the district is enlarged or extended. Otherwise, such costs shall be
124 paid by the petitioners. However, no costs shall be taxed to the trustees of the district.
125 11. Should any landowner who owns real estate that is not within the certificated
126 boundaries of any sewer corporation providing service under a certificate of convenience and
127 necessity granted by the public service commission or within another sewer district organized
128 under this chapter or chapters 247 or 249 or under the Missouri Constitution, but that is
129 contiguous or reasonably close to the existing boundaries of the reorganized sewer district,
130 desire to have such real estate incorporated in the district, the landowner shall first petition the
131 board of trustees for its approval. If such approval is granted, the secretary of the board shall
132 endorse a certificate of the board's approval of the petition. The petition so endorsed shall be
133 filed with the clerk of the circuit court in which the reorganized sewer district is incorporated.
134 It then shall be the duty of the court to amend the boundaries of such district by a decree

HB 3013 175
135 incorporating the real estate. A certified copy of this amended decree including the real estate
136 in the district then shall be filed in the office of the recorder, in the office of the county clerk
137 of the county in which the real estate is located, and in the office of the secretary of state. The
138 costs of this proceeding shall be borne by the petitioning property owner.
139 12. The board of trustees of any reorganized common sewer district may petition the
140 circuit court of the county containing the majority of the acreage in the district for an
141 amended decree of incorporation to allow that district to engage in the construction,
142 maintenance, and operation of water supply and distribution facilities that serve ten or more
143 separate properties located wholly within the district, are not served by another political
144 subdivision, or are not located within the certificated area of a water corporation as defined in
145 chapter 386, or within a public water supply district as defined in chapter 247, and the
146 operation and maintenance of all such existing water supply facilities. The petition shall be
147 filed by the board of trustees, and all proceedings shall be in substantially the same manner as
148 in action for initial formation of a reorganized common sewer district, except that no vote of
149 the residents of the district shall be required. All applicable provisions of this chapter shall
150 apply to the construction, operation, and maintenance of water supply facilities in the same
151 manner as they apply to like functions relating to sewer treatment facilities.
205.202. 1. The governing body of any hospital district established under sections
205.160 to 205.379 in any county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than thirteen thousand five hundred but fewer than thirteen
thousand six hundred inhabitants may, by resolution, abolish the property tax levied in such
district under this chapter and impose a sales tax on all retail sales made within the district
which are subject to sales tax under chapter 144. The tax authorized in this section shall be
not more than one percent, and shall be imposed solely for the purpose of funding the hospital
district. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to all other sales taxes imposed
by law, and shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
2. No such resolution adopted under this section shall become effective unless the
governing body of the hospital district submits to the voters residing within the district at a
[state general,] primary[, or special] election a proposal to authorize the governing body of
the district to impose a tax under this section. If a majority of the votes cast on the question
by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the question, then the tax shall become
effective on the first day of the second calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives
notification of adoption of the local sales tax. If a majority of the votes cast on the question
by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question, then the tax shall not
become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted under this section to the
qualified voters and such question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on
the question.

HB 3013 176
3. All revenue collected under this section by the director of the department of
revenue on behalf of the hospital district, except for one percent for the cost of collection
which shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund, shall be deposited in a special
trust fund, which is hereby created and shall be known as the "Hospital District Sales Tax
Fund", and shall be used solely for the designated purposes. Moneys in the fund shall not be
deemed to be state funds, and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The
director may make refunds from the amounts in the fund and credited to the district for
erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts
deposited to the credit of such district. Any funds in the special fund which are not needed for
current expenditures shall be invested in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
4. The governing body of any hospital district that has adopted the sales tax
authorized in this section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any
date available for elections for the district] at the primary election. If a majority of the votes
cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal, that
repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such
repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this section shall
remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and
the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
5. Whenever the governing body of any hospital district that has adopted the sales tax
authorized in this section receives a petition, signed by a number of registered voters of the
district equal to at least ten percent of the number of registered voters of the district voting in
the last gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the sales tax imposed under
this section, the governing body shall submit to the voters of the district a proposal to repeal
the tax. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon
are in favor of the repeal, the repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the
calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the
question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax
authorized in this section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this
section to the qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question.
6. If the tax is repealed or terminated by any means other than by a dissolution of a
hospital district as described in subsection 7 of this section, all funds remaining in the special
trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes, and the hospital district
shall notify the director of the department of revenue of the action at least ninety days before
the effective date of the repeal and the director may order retention in the trust fund, for a

HB 3013 177
period of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover
possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts
deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of
abolition of the tax in such district, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the
district and close the account of that district. The director shall notify each district of each
instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the district.
7. Upon the dissolution of a hospital district levying a sales tax pursuant to this
section, the sales tax shall be automatically repealed and all funds remaining in the special
trust fund shall be distributed as follows:
(1) Twenty-five percent shall be distributed to the county public health center
established pursuant to sections 205.010 to 205.150; and
(2) Seventy-five percent shall be distributed to a federally qualified health center, as
defined in 42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)(1) and (2), located in the county.
205.205. 1. The governing body of any hospital district established under sections
205.160 to 205.379 in any county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than ten thousand six hundred but fewer than ten thousand seven
hundred inhabitants or any county of the third classification without a township form of
government and with more than eleven thousand seven hundred fifty but fewer than eleven
thousand eight hundred fifty inhabitants may, by resolution, abolish the property tax
authorized in such district under this chapter and impose a sales tax on all retail sales made
within the district which are subject to sales tax under chapter 144 and all sales of metered
water services, electricity, electrical current and natural, artificial or propane gas, wood, coal,
or home heating oil for domestic use only as provided under section 144.032. The tax
authorized in this section shall be not more than one percent, and shall be imposed solely for
the purpose of funding the hospital district. The tax authorized in this section shall be in
addition to all other sales taxes imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all other
charges and taxes.
2. No such resolution adopted under this section shall become effective unless the
governing body of the hospital district submits to the voters residing within the district at a
[state general,] primary[, or special] election a proposal to authorize the governing body of
the district to impose a tax under this section. If a majority of the votes cast on the question
by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the question, then the tax shall become
effective on the first day of the second calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives
notification of adoption of the local sales tax. If a majority of the votes cast on the question
by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question, then the tax shall not
become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted under this section to the

HB 3013 178
qualified voters and such question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on
the question.
3. All revenue collected under this section by the director of the department of
revenue on behalf of the hospital district, except for one percent for the cost of collection
which shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund, shall be deposited in a special
trust fund, which is hereby created and shall be known as the "Hospital District Sales Tax
Fund", and shall be used solely for the designated purposes. Moneys in the fund shall not be
deemed to be state funds, and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The
director may make refunds from the amounts in the fund and credited to the district for
erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts
deposited to the credit of such district. Any funds in the special fund which are not needed for
current expenditures shall be invested in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
4. The governing body of any hospital district that has adopted the sales tax
authorized in this section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any
date available for elections for the district] at the primary election. If a majority of the votes
cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal, that
repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the calendar year in which such
repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax authorized in this section shall
remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and
the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
5. Whenever the governing body of any hospital district that has adopted the sales tax
authorized in this section receives a petition, signed by a number of registered voters of the
district equal to at least ten percent of the number of registered voters of the district voting in
the last gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the sales tax imposed under
this section, the governing body shall submit to the voters of the district a proposal to repeal
the tax. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon
are in favor of the repeal, the repeal shall become effective on December thirty-first of the
calendar year in which such repeal was approved. If a majority of the votes cast on the
question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the sales tax
authorized in this section shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this
section to the qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question.
6. If the tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the special
trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes, and the hospital district
shall notify the director of the department of revenue of the action at least ninety days before

HB 3013 179
the effective date of the repeal and the director may order retention in the trust fund, for a
period of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover
possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts
deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of
abolition of the tax in such district, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the
district and close the account of that district. The director shall notify each district of each
instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the district.
205.563. 1. The governing body of any city of the fourth classification with more
than two hundred but fewer than three hundred inhabitants and located in any county of the
second classification with more than forty-eight thousand two hundred but fewer than forty-
eight thousand three hundred inhabitants may impose, by order or ordinance, an annual real
property tax to fund the construction, operation, and maintenance of a community health
center. The tax authorized in this section shall not exceed thirty-five cents per year on each
one hundred dollars of assessed valuation on all taxable real property within the city. Any
such city may enter into an agreement or agreements with taxing jurisdictions located at least
partially within the incorporated limits of such city to levy the tax authorized under this
section upon real property located within the jurisdiction of such district, but outside the
incorporated limits of such city, provided that any taxing jurisdiction desiring to levy such tax
shall first receive voter approval of such measure in the manner and form contained in this
section. The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to all other property taxes
imposed by law, and shall be stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
2. No order or ordinance adopted under this section shall become effective unless the
governing body of the city submits to the voters residing within such city at a [state general,]
primary[, or special] election a proposal to authorize the city to impose a tax under this
section.
3. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the city of ______ and ______ district (if applicable) be
authorized to impose a tax on owners of real property in an amount
equal to ______ (insert amount not to exceed thirty-five cents) per one
hundred dollars assessed valuation for the purpose of constructing,
operating, and maintaining a community health center?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".


HB 3013 180
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall become effective in the tax year immediately
following its approval. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters
voting thereon are opposed to the question, then the tax shall not become effective unless and
until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
4. The tax authorized under this section shall be levied and collected in the same
manner as other real property taxes are levied and collected within the city.
5. The governing body of any city that has imposed a real property tax under this
section may submit the question of repeal of the tax to the voters [on any date available for
elections for the city] at the primary election. If a majority of the votes cast on the question
by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of repeal, that repeal shall become effective
on the first day of the tax year immediately following its approval. If a majority of the votes
cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the repeal, then the
tax shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified
voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
6. Whenever the governing body of any city that has imposed a real property tax
under this section receives a petition, signed by a number of registered voters of the city equal
to at least two percent of the number of registered voters of the city voting in the last
gubernatorial election, calling for an election to repeal the tax, the governing body shall
submit to the voters of such city a proposal to repeal the tax. If a majority of the votes cast on
the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the repeal, the repeal shall
become effective on the first day of the tax year immediately following its approval. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed
to the repeal, then the tax shall remain effective until the question is resubmitted under this
section to the qualified voters and the repeal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question.
7. If the real property tax authorized under this section is repealed or terminated by
any means, all funds collected under the tax shall continue to be used solely for the designated
purposes.
205.979. 1. The board of trustees may request that the governing body of the county
or counties request the election officials of any county or city not within a county containing
all or part of such service area to submit to the qualified voters of such county, or city not
within a county, at a [general,] primary[, or special] election the proposition contained in
subsection 3 of this section. Such election officials shall give legal notice at least sixty days
prior to such [general,] primary[, or special] election in at least two newspapers that such
proposition shall be submitted at any [general,] primary[, or special] election held for

HB 3013 181
submission of the proposal. A request by the board of trustees for a proposition to be
submitted to the voters as set out in this section shall be considered a request of the county, or
city not within a county, for purposes of section 115.063.
2. The tax may not be levied to exceed forty cents per each one hundred dollars
assessed valuation therefor.
3. The ballot to be used for voting on the proposition shall be substantially in the
following form:
OFFICIAL BALLOT
(Check the one for which you wish to vote.)
Shall (name of county) establish a community mental health fund to
establish, improve (and) (or) maintain a community mental health
service, and for which the (county) shall levy a tax of (insert exact
amount to be voted upon) cents per each one hundred dollars assessed
valuation therefor?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
4. The election shall be conducted and the vote canvassed in the same manner as
other county elections.
206.090. 1. After the hospital district has been declared organized, the declaring
county commission shall divide the district into six election districts as equal in population as
possible, and shall by lot number the districts from one to six inclusive. The county
commission shall cause an election to be held in the hospital district [within ninety days] at
the next primary election after the order establishing the hospital district to elect hospital
district directors. Each voter shall vote for six directors, one from each district, except in any
county of the third classification without a township form of government and with more than
ten thousand six hundred but fewer than ten thousand seven hundred inhabitants, each voter
shall vote for one director from the hospital election district in which the voter resides.
Directors shall serve a term of six years or a lesser term of years as may be established by the
county commission. If directors are to serve a term of six years, the initial term of the director
elected from district number one shall serve a term of one year, the director elected from
district number two shall serve a term of two years, the director elected from district number
three shall serve a term of three years, the director elected from district number four shall
serve a term of four years, the director elected from district number five shall serve a term of
five years, and the director elected from district number six shall serve a term of six years;
thereafter, the terms of all directors shall be six years. If the county commission chooses to
establish a term of office of less than six years, the initial election of directors shall be done in
a manner established by the county commission. All directors shall serve until their
successors are elected and qualified. Any vacancy shall be filled by the remaining members

HB 3013 182
of the board of directors who shall appoint a person to serve as director until the next
[municipal] primary election.
2. Candidates for director of the hospital district shall be citizens of the United States,
voters of the hospital district who have resided within the state for one year next preceding the
election and who are at least thirty years of age. All candidates shall file their declaration of
candidacy with the county commission calling the election for the organizational election, and
for subsequent elections, with the secretary of the board of directors of the district.
3. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, if the number of candidates for office
of director is no greater than the number of directors to be elected, no election shall be held,
and the candidates shall assume the responsibilities of their offices at the same time and in the
same manner as if they had been elected.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 1 to 3 of this section, after the
formation of the hospital district, the hospital board of directors, by a majority vote of the
directors with the consent of a majority of the county commission on an order of record, may
abolish the six hospital districts' election districts and cause the hospital district directors to be
elected from the hospital district at large. Upon opting to elect the hospital district directors at
large, the then-serving hospital district directors shall continue to serve the remainder of their
terms and any vacancies on the board, after the date of such option, shall be filled by an
election conducted at large in the district.
210.860. 1. The governing body of any county or city not within a county may, after
voter approval pursuant to this section, levy a tax not to exceed twenty-five cents on each one
hundred dollars of assessed valuation on taxable property in the county for the purpose of
providing counseling, family support, and temporary residential services to persons eighteen
years of age or less and those services described in section 210.861. The question shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the county or city not within a county at a [county or state
general,] primary[or special] election upon the motion of the governing body of the county or
city not within a county or upon the petition of eight percent of the qualified voters of the
county determined on the basis of the number of votes cast for governor in such county or city
not within a county at the last gubernatorial election held prior to the filing of the petition.
The election officials of the county or city not within a county shall give legal notice as
provided in chapter 115. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall ______ County (City) be authorized to levy a tax of ______ cents
on each one hundred dollars of assessed valuation on taxable property
in the county (city) for the purpose of establishing a community
children's services fund for purposes of providing funds for counseling
and related services to children and youth in the county (city) eighteen

HB 3013 183
years of age or less and services which will promote healthy lifestyles
among children and youth and strengthen families?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the question, then the tax shall be levied and collected as otherwise provided by law.
If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon are
opposed to the question, then the tax shall not be levied unless and until the question is again
submitted to the qualified voters of the county or city not within a county and a majority of
such voters are in favor of such a tax, and not otherwise.
2. All revenues generated by the tax prescribed in this section shall be deposited in
the county treasury or, in a city not within a county, to the board established by law to
administer such fund to the credit of a special "Community Children's Services Fund" to
accomplish the purposes set out herein and shall be used for no other purpose. Such fund
shall be administered by and expended only upon approval by a board of directors,
established pursuant to section 210.861.
221.407. 1. The commission of any regional jail district may impose, by order, a
sales tax in the amount of up to one percent on all retail sales made in such region which are
subject to taxation pursuant to the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the purpose
of providing jail services, facilities, and equipment for such region. The tax authorized by
this section shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no
order imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section shall be effective unless the commission
submits to the voters of the district, [on any election date authorized in chapter 115] at the
primary election, a proposal to authorize the commission to impose a tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the _______ (District name) regional jail district impose a
region-wide sales tax of ______ (insert amount) for the purpose
of providing jail services, facilities, and equipment for the
region?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "NO".


HB 3013 184
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters of the district voting
thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the order and any amendment to such order shall be
in effect on the first day of the second quarter immediately following the election approving
the proposal. If the proposal receives less than the required majority, the commission shall
have no power to impose the sales tax authorized pursuant to this section unless and until the
commission shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the commission to
impose the sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by the majority
of the qualified voters of the district voting on such proposal.
3. In the case of a county attempting to join an existing district that levies a sales tax
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, such joining with the district shall not become
effective until the approval of the voters to levy the district sales tax in the county attempting
to join the district has been obtained. The election shall be called by the county commission
of the county attempting to join the district, and the district shall by ordinance or order
provide that the sales tax shall be levied in the joining county, subject to approval of the
county voters as herein provided. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be
limited to, the following language:
Shall the _______ (District name) extend its regional jail district
sales tax of ______ (insert amount) to the boundaries of _______
(name of joining county) for the purpose of providing jail
services, facilities, and equipment for the region?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters of the county attempting
to join the district voting thereon are in favor of the proposal, then the tax shall be in effect on
the first day of the second quarter immediately following the election approving the proposal,
the county shall have been deemed to have joined the district pursuant to a rewritten
agreement as provided in subsection 3 of section 221.400, and the order of the commission
levying the tax shall also become effective as to the joining county on said date. If the
proposal receives less than the required majority, the district shall have no power to impose
the sales tax authorized pursuant to this section, and the county attempting to join the district
shall not be permitted to do so, unless and until the county commission of the county
attempting to join the district shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the
imposition of the sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by the

HB 3013 185
majority of the qualified voters of the county attempting to join the district voting on such
proposal.
4. All revenue received by a district from the tax authorized pursuant to this section
shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for providing jail services,
facilities, and equipment for such district for so long as the tax shall remain in effect.
5. Once the tax authorized by this section is abolished or terminated by any means, all
funds remaining in the special trust fund shall be used solely for providing jail services,
facilities, and equipment for the district. Any funds in such special trust fund which are not
needed for current expenditures may be invested by the commission in accordance with
applicable laws relating to the investment of other county funds.
6. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue pursuant to this section on
behalf of any district, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited in the
state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in
section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be
known as the "Regional Jail District Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the regional jail
district sales tax trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled
with any funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount
of money in the trust fund which was collected in each district imposing a sales tax pursuant
to this section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of each member
county and the public. Not later than the tenth day of each month the director of revenue shall
distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the district
which levied the tax. Such funds shall be deposited with the treasurer of each such district,
and all expenditures of funds arising from the regional jail district sales tax trust fund shall be
paid pursuant to an appropriation adopted by the commission and shall be approved by the
commission. Expenditures may be made from the fund for any of the district's authorized
purposes.
7. The director of revenue may make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund and
credited to any district for erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem
dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such districts. If any district abolishes
the tax, the commission shall notify the director of revenue of the action at least ninety days
prior to the effective date of the repeal, and the director of revenue may order retention in the
trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of
such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored
checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after
the effective date of abolition of the tax in such district, the director of revenue shall remit the
balance in the account to the district and close the account of that district. The director of

HB 3013 186
revenue shall notify each district in each instance of any amount refunded or any check
redeemed from receipts due the district.
8. Except as provided in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
233.040. 1. The mayor and members of the city council of any city or town within
any special road district thus organized, together with the members of the county commission
of the county in which said district is located, at a meeting to be held in the meeting place of
the county commission, at which meeting the presiding commissioner of the county
commission shall preside and the county clerk shall act as clerk, within two weeks after the
voters within the territory of such proposed district shall adopt the provisions of sections
233.010 to 233.165, shall, by order of record to be kept by the county clerk, appoint a board
of commissioners composed of three persons, designating one to serve for three years, one for
two years and one for one year, and in February every year thereafter one special road district
commissioner shall be appointed as above specified, to serve for three years. However,
beginning in 1994, the commissioner whose appointment will expire in February, 1994, shall
serve until the first Tuesday in April of that year at which time a commissioner shall be
elected to hold office for three years and until a successor is elected, commissioned, and
qualified. Those commissioners whose terms expire in 1995 or 1996 shall serve until the first
Tuesday in April in 1995 or 1996, respectively, at which time a commissioner shall be elected
to hold office for three years and until a successor is elected, commissioned, and qualified to
replace each commissioner. All subsequent commissioners shall be elected at the
[appropriate] primary election [held on the first Tuesday in April] for three-year terms.
An appointee shall be eligible to file for election as commissioner. The nominations and
elections shall be governed by the provisions of law relating to the nomination and election of
persons on a nonpartisan basis at such elections. All such commissioners shall be resident
taxpayers of the district, and shall serve until their successors are appointed or elected and
qualified, with vacancies to be filled by the county commission. Resignations shall be to the
county clerk. Removal from the district shall create a vacancy.
2. Such commissioners, before entering upon the discharge of their duties, shall take
oath of office, to be administered by the clerk of the county commission.
233.180. 1. At the term of the county commission in which such order is made, or at
any subsequent term thereafter, the county commission shall appoint three commissioners of
the special road district, who shall be voters of the district and owners of land within the
district, who shall hold their office until the second Tuesday in April thereafter. The voters of
the district shall elect three commissioners of the special road district, one of whom shall
serve one year, one for two years and one for three years, and on [municipal] primary

HB 3013 187
election days each year thereafter they shall elect a commissioner of the special road district
to take the place of the one whose term is about to expire, who shall serve three years.
2. No person shall be elected or appointed commissioner of the special road district
who is not a voter of the district or a registered voter from the county in which the district is
located and an owner of land in the district. Any vacancy caused by resignation, death,
removal from the district of a commissioner of the special road district or sale of all land
owned by the commissioner in the district shall be filled for the unexpired term by
appointment by the remaining commissioners of the special road district. All commissioners
of the special road district shall qualify by taking, subscribing and filing with the county clerk
the oath prescribed by the constitution of this state, and that they will faithfully, honestly and
impartially discharge their duties as commissioners of the special road district according to
law.
3. If for any reason the board of commissioners of the special road district herein
mentioned shall fail to fill a vacancy or vacancies caused by the expiration of the term of any
one or more of the commissioners of the special road district, then the county commission is
hereby authorized and required to appoint a person to fill the vacancy. In the event that two
consecutive elections pass without any candidates for a special road district commissioner in
[municipal] primaryelections, then the county commission is hereby authorized and required
to appoint commissioners of the special road district for three-year terms thereafter with no
further elections being held.
233.330. 1. At the term of the county commission in which such order is made, or at
any subsequent term thereafter, the county commission shall appoint three special road
district commissioners, who shall be voters of the district who shall hold their office until the
second Tuesday in April thereafter. The voters of the district, at an hour and place to be fixed
by said commissioners, shall elect three special road district commissioners, one of whom
shall serve one year, one for two years, and one for three years, and on [municipal] primary
election days each year thereafter they shall elect a special road district commissioner to take
the place of the one whose term is about to expire, who shall serve three years.
2. No person shall be elected or appointed commissioner who is not a voter of the
district. Any vacancy caused by resignation, death, removal from the district of a special road
district commissioner or sale of all land owned by him in the district shall be filled for the
unexpired term by appointment by the remaining special road district commissioners of the
district. All special road district commissioners shall qualify by taking, subscribing and filing
with the county clerk the oath prescribed by the constitution of this state, and that they will
faithfully, honestly and impartially discharge their duties as commissioners according to law.
3. If for any reason the board of commissioners herein mentioned shall fail to call an
annual election to fill a vacancy or vacancies caused by the expiration of the term of any one

HB 3013 188
or more of the special road district commissioners, then the county commission is hereby
authorized and required to call an election to fill said vacancy.
233.505. 1. At the meeting of the county commission in which such order is made, or
at any subsequent meeting thereafter, the county commission shall appoint three special road
subdistrict commissioners, who shall be voters of the subdistrict who shall hold their office
until the second Tuesday in April thereafter. The voters of the subdistrict, at an hour and
place to be fixed by the commissioners, shall elect three special road subdistrict
commissioners, one of whom shall serve one year, one for two years, and one for three
years, and on [municipal] primaryelection days each year thereafter they shall elect a special
road subdistrict commissioner to take the place of the one whose term is about to expire, who
shall serve for three years.
2. No person shall be elected or appointed as a commissioner who is not a voter of the
subdistrict. Any vacancy caused by resignation, death, removal from the subdistrict of a
special road subdistrict commissioner or sale of all land owned by him in the subdistrict shall
be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the remaining special road subdistrict
commissioners of the subdistrict. All special road subdistrict commissioners shall qualify by
taking, subscribing and filing with the county clerk the oath prescribed by the constitution of
this state, and that they will faithfully, honestly and impartially discharge their duties as
commissioners according to law.
3. If for any reason the board of commissioners shall fail to call an annual election to
fill a vacancy or vacancies caused by the expiration of the term of any one or more of the
special road subdistrict commissioners, then the county commission is hereby authorized and
required to call an election to fill such vacancy.
233.510. 1. The commissioners of any special road subdistrict may levy, if four-
sevenths of the voters of the subdistrict voting thereon approve, a tax on all taxable property
in the subdistrict, the proceeds of which to be used for the support of the subdistrict, including
the payment of bonds issued under section 233.513. The proposition to levy the tax
authorized by this section may be submitted by the commissioners at the next annual election
of the members of the commission or at any regularly scheduled primary [or general] election
[or at a special election called for the purpose]. A separate ballot containing the question
shall read as follows:
Shall the commissioners of the ______ Special Road Subdistrict be
authorized to levy a tax of ______ cents on the one hundred dollars
assessed valuation to provide funds for the support of the subdistrict?
(cid:0)FOR THE PROPOSITION
(cid:0)AGAINST THE PROPOSITION
(Place an X in the square opposite the one for which you wish to vote.)

HB 3013 189

If four-sevenths of the qualified voters casting votes thereon be in favor of the question, the
commissioners shall levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of this section, but if four-
sevenths of the voters casting votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by this
section, no such tax shall be levied.
2. Any tax authorized pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be levied and
collected as provided by law for the levy and collection of taxes for special road districts.
Taxes authorized pursuant to this section shall be deposited with the county treasurer, who
shall disburse the moneys only to the president or vice president of the subdistrict upon
warrants signed by such officer and attested by the secretary of the subdistrict.
234.130. 1. Any such city may increase its indebtedness by issuing and selling its
bonds for funds for use in making a purchase or purchases by authority of this law and paying
expenses of holding an election as by this section authorized and other expenses preliminary
or incidental to the issuance and sale of such bonds. Such increase of indebtedness shall not
cause the indebtedness of the city to exceed the constitutional limit. The council, trustees, or
other proper authorities of the city, shall order an election to be held, and an election shall be
held, as by this section provided, for the purpose of testing the sense of the voters of the city
on the proposition to so increase indebtedness and the constitutionally required percentage of
those voting at such election favor the increase of indebtedness.
2. Such council, trustees, or other proper authorities, shall give, or cause to be given,
at least three weeks' notice of such election in a newspaper published in such city, or if there
be no such newspaper, then by posting up ten printed or written handbills in ten different
public places in such city. If there are one or more daily newspapers published in the city,
which are qualified to publish public advertisements and orders of publication as provided by
law, such notice shall be published in at least one of such newspapers. If the notice is
published in a newspaper as provided in this section, such publication shall be made at least
once in each of the three weeks, the last publication to be within two weeks of the date of
such election.
3. Such election shall be held and judges thereof appointed as in case of other
elections in such city, except that the board of election commissioners of the city, if there be
such a board, or other proper authorities having charge of such election shall provide at least
two voting places in each ward of the municipality conducting such election, if there be more
than one ward, and for that purpose they may combine as many election precincts in each
ward as in their opinion may be proper. The judges and clerks of the precinct in which a
voting place is located shall act as the judges and clerks of such election for such combined
precinct. Except as provided in this section, such election shall be conducted in the same

HB 3013 190
manner and by the same election commissioners, if there be such election commissioners,
judges and clerks and other officers and employees as other elections are conducted.
4. Such election may be held at the [same time as any other election of the city,
whether general or special,] primary election, in which event the voting precincts, judges,
clerks and the booths used shall be the same as at such other election, but not the same ballots
or ballot boxes.
235.210. 1. The boundaries of any district organized under the provisions of this law
may be changed in the manner prescribed in this section and in section 235.220, but any
change of boundaries of the district shall not impair or affect its organization or its rights in or
to property, or any of its rights or privileges whatsoever; or shall it affect or impair or
discharge any contract, obligation, lien or charge for or upon which it might be liable or
chargeable had the change of boundaries not been made.
2. A petition for annexation of real property in an area contiguous with a street light
maintenance district organized under this chapter and not located within any municipality or
another street light maintenance district shall be signed by property owners who own not less
than ten percent of the parcels of property within the area proposed for annexation. The
petition shall be filed with the county clerk in which the district is situated and shall be
addressed to the county commission. A hearing shall be held regarding the proposed
annexation petition as soon as reasonably possible. If the county commission finds at the
hearing that the petition is in compliance with the provisions of this section, they shall order
the question to be submitted to the voters within the proposed area of annexation and within
the district at a [municipal,] primary[, or general] election.
3. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (description of area) be annexed to the ______ street light
maintenance district?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".
4. If a majority of the votes cast on the question in the district and in the area
described in the petition, respectively, are in favor of the annexation, the county commission
shall by order declare the area annexed and shall describe the altered boundaries of the
district. A copy of the order of the commission shall be filed within the county recorder. If a
majority of the votes cast on the question in the district and in the area described in the
petition, respectively, are not in favor of the annexation, such area shall not be declared
annexed. No such question shall be resubmitted to the voters sooner than twelve months from
the date of submission of the last question.

HB 3013 191
238.208. 1. The owners of property adjacent to a transportation district formed under
the Missouri transportation development district act may petition the court by unanimous
petition to add their property to the district. If the property owners within the transportation
development district unanimously approve of the addition of property, the adjacent properties
in the petition shall be added to the district. Any property added under this section shall be
subject to all projects, taxes, and special assessments in effect as of the date of the court order
adding the property to the district. The owners of the added property shall be allowed to vote
at the next primary election scheduled for the district to fill vacancies on the board and on
any other question submitted to them by the board under this chapter. The owners of property
added under this section shall have one vote per acre in the same manner as provided in
subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 238.220.
2. The owners of all of the property located in a transportation development district
formed under this chapter may, by unanimous petition filed with the board of directors of the
district, remove any property from the district, so long as such removal will not materially
affect any obligations of the district.
238.216. 1. Except as otherwise provided in section 238.220 with respect to the
election of directors, in order to call any election required or allowed under sections 238.200
to 238.275, the circuit court shall:
(1) Order the county clerk to cause the questions to appear on the ballot on the next
regularly scheduled [general,] primary [or special] election day, which date shall be the same
in each county or portion of a county included within and voting upon the proposed district;
(2) If the election is to be a mail-in election, specify a date on which ballots for the
election shall be mailed, which date shall be a Tuesday, and shall be not earlier than the eighth
Tuesday from the issuance of the order, and shall not be on the same day as an election
conducted under the provisions of chapter 115; or
(3) If all the owners of property in the district joined in the petition for formation of
the district, such owners may cast their ballot by unanimous verified petition approving any
measure submitted to them as voters pursuant to this chapter. Each owner shall receive one
vote per acre owned. Fractional votes shall be allowed. The verified petition shall be filed
with the circuit court clerk. The filing of a unanimous petition shall constitute an election
under sections 238.200 to 238.275 and the results of said election shall be entered pursuant to
subsection 6 of this section.
2. Application for a ballot shall be conducted as follows:
(1) Only qualified voters shall be entitled to apply for a ballot;
(2) Such persons shall apply with the clerk of the circuit court in which the petition
was filed;
(3) Each person applying shall provide:

HB 3013 192
(a) Such person's name, address, mailing address, and phone number;
(b) An authorized signature; and
(c) Evidence that such person is entitled to vote. Such evidence shall be:
a. For resident individuals, proof of registration from the election authority;
b. For owners of real property, a tax receipt or deed or other document which
evidences ownership, and identifies the real property by location;
(4) No person shall apply later than the fourth Tuesday before the date for mailing
ballots specified in the circuit court's order.
3. If the election is to be a mail-in election, the circuit court shall mail a ballot to each
qualified voter who applied for a ballot pursuant to subsection 2 of this section along with a
return addressed envelope directed to the circuit court clerk's office with a sworn affidavit on
the reverse side of such envelope for the voter's signature. Such affidavit shall be in the
following form:
I hereby declare under penalties of perjury that I am qualified to vote,
or to affix my authorized signature in the name of an entity which is
entitled to vote, in this election.
Subscribed and sworn to before me this ______ day of ______, 20____
__
_______________
Authorized Signature
_______________ _______________
Printed Name of Voter Signature of notary or other
officer authorized to administer
oaths.
_______________
Mailing Address of Voter (if different)
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of section 238.220, with respect to
the election of directors, each qualified voter shall have one vote, unless the qualified voters
are property owners under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of section 238.202, in which case
they shall receive one vote per acre. Each voter which is not an individual shall determine
how to cast its vote as provided for in its articles of incorporation, articles of organization,
articles of partnership, bylaws, or other document which sets forth an appropriate mechanism
for the determination of the entity's vote. If a voter has no such mechanism, then its vote shall
be cast as determined by a majority of the persons who run the day-to-day affairs of the voter.
Each voted ballot shall be signed with the authorized signature.
5. Mail-in voted ballots shall be returned to the circuit court clerk's office by mail or
hand delivery no later than 5:00 p.m. on the sixth Tuesday after the date for mailing the

HB 3013 193
ballots as set forth in the circuit court's order. The circuit court's clerk shall transmit all voted
ballots to a team of judges of not less than four, with an equal number from each of the two
major political parties. The judges shall be selected by the circuit court from lists compiled
by the election authority. Upon receipt of the voted ballots, the judges shall verify the
authenticity of the ballots, canvass the votes, and certify the results. Certification by the
election judges shall be final and shall be immediately transmitted to the circuit court. Any
qualified voter who voted in such election may contest the result in the same manner as
provided in chapter 115.
6. The results of the election shall be entered upon the records of the circuit court of
the county in which the petition was filed. Also, a certified copy thereof shall be filed with
the county clerk of each county in which a portion of the proposed district lies, who shall
cause the same to be spread upon the records of the county commission.
238.236. 1. This section shall not apply to any tax levied pursuant to section 238.235,
and no tax shall be imposed pursuant to the provisions of this section if a tax has been
imposed by a transportation development district pursuant to section 238.235.
2. In lieu of the taxes allowed pursuant to section 238.235, any transportation
development district which consists of all of one or more entire counties, all of one or more
entire cities, or all of one or more entire counties and one or more entire cities which are
totally outside the boundaries of those counties may by resolution impose a transportation
development district sales tax on all retail sales made in such transportation development
district which are subject to taxation pursuant to the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525
for any transportation development purpose designated by the transportation development
district in its ballot of submission to its qualified voters. No resolution enacted pursuant to
the authority granted by this section shall be effective unless:
(1) The board of directors of the transportation development district submits to the
qualified voters of the transportation development district, at a [state general,] primary[, or
special] election, a proposal to authorize the board of directors of the transportation
development district to impose or increase the levy of an existing tax pursuant to the
provisions of this section; or
(2) The voters approved the question certified by the petition filed pursuant to
subsection 5 of section 238.207.
3. If the transportation development district submits to the qualified voters of the
transportation development district a proposal to authorize the board of directors of the
transportation development district to impose or increase the levy of an existing tax pursuant
to the provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section, the ballot of submission
shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following language:

HB 3013 194
Shall the transportation development district of ______ (transportation
development district's name) impose a transportation development
district-wide sales tax at the rate of ______ (insert amount) for a period
of ______ (insert number) years from the date on which such tax is first
imposed for the purpose of ______ (insert transportation development
purpose)?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the resolution and any amendments thereto shall be in effect. If a
majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the
board of directors of the transportation development district shall have no power to impose
the sales tax authorized by this section unless and until the board of directors of the
transportation development district shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize it
to impose the sales tax pursuant to the provisions of this section and such proposal is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
4. Within ten days after the adoption of any resolution in favor of the adoption of a
transportation development district sales tax which has been approved by the qualified voters
of such transportation development district, the transportation development district shall
forward to the director of revenue, by United States registered mail or certified mail, a
certified copy of the resolution of its board of directors. The resolution shall reflect the
effective date thereof. The sales tax authorized by this section shall become effective on the
first day of the second calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives notice of
adoption of such tax.
5. All revenue received by a transportation development district from the tax
authorized by this section which has been designated for a certain transportation development
purpose shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for such designated
purpose. Upon the expiration of the period of years approved by the qualified voters pursuant
to subsection 3 of this section or if the tax authorized by this section is repealed pursuant to
subsection 12 of this section, all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall continue to be
used solely for such designated transportation development purpose. Any funds in such
special trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the board

HB 3013 195
of directors in accordance with applicable laws relating to the investment of other
transportation development district funds.
6. The sales tax may be imposed at a rate of one-eighth of one percent, one-fourth of
one percent, three-eighths of one percent, one-half of one percent or one percent on the
receipts from the sale at retail of all tangible personal property or taxable services at retail
within the transportation development district adopting such tax, if such property and services
are subject to taxation by the state of Missouri pursuant to the provisions of sections 144.010
to 144.525. Any transportation development district sales tax imposed pursuant to this
section shall be imposed at a rate that shall be uniform throughout the district.
7. The resolution imposing the sales tax pursuant to this section shall impose upon all
sellers a tax for the privilege of engaging in the business of selling tangible personal property
or rendering taxable services at retail to the extent and in the manner provided in sections
144.010 to 144.525 and the rules and regulations of the director of revenue issued pursuant
thereto; except that the rate of the tax shall be the rate imposed by the resolution as the sales
tax. The amount reported and returned to the director of revenue by the seller shall be
computed on the basis of the combined rate of the tax imposed by sections 144.010 to
144.525 and the tax imposed by the resolution as authorized by this section, plus any amounts
imposed pursuant to other provisions of law.
8. On and after the effective date of any tax imposed pursuant to this section, the
director of revenue shall perform all functions incident to the administration, collection,
enforcement, and operation of the tax, and the director of revenue shall collect, in addition to
all other sales taxes imposed by law, the additional tax authorized pursuant to this section.
The tax imposed pursuant to this section and the taxes imposed pursuant to all other laws of
the state of Missouri shall be collected together and reported upon such forms and pursuant to
such administrative rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the director of revenue.
9. All applicable provisions contained in sections 144.010 to 144.525 governing the
state sales tax, sections 32.085 and 32.087 governing local sales taxes, and section 32.057, the
uniform confidentiality provision, shall apply to the collection of the tax imposed by this
section, except as modified in this section.
10. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue pursuant to this section on
behalf of any transportation development district, less one percent for the cost of collection,
which shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for
surety bonds as provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in the state treasury to the
credit of the "Transportation Development District Sales Tax Fund", which is hereby created.
Moneys in the transportation development district sales tax fund shall not be deemed to be
state funds and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. All interest earned upon
the balance in the transportation development district sales tax fund shall be deposited to the

HB 3013 196
credit of the same fund. Any balance in the fund at the end of an appropriation period shall
not be transferred to the general revenue fund and the provisions of section 33.080 shall not
apply to the fund. The director of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount of
100 money which was collected in each transportation development district imposing a sales tax
101 pursuant to this section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of each
102 transportation development district and the general public. Not later than the tenth day of
103 each month, the director of revenue shall distribute all moneys deposited in such fund during
104 the preceding month to the proper transportation development district.
105 11. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from the
106 amounts credited to any transportation development district for erroneous payments and
107 overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
108 such districts. If any transportation development district repeals the tax authorized by this
109 section, the transportation development district shall notify the director of revenue of the
110 action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal and the director of revenue
111 may order retention, for a period of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after
112 receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of such tax and to redeem
113 dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has
114 elapsed after the effective date of repeal of the tax authorized by this section in such
115 transportation development district, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the
116 account to the transportation development district and close the account of that transportation
117 development district. The director of revenue shall notify each transportation development
118 district of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the
119 transportation development district.
120 12. (1) No transportation development district imposing a sales tax pursuant to this
121 section may repeal or amend such sales tax unless such repeal or amendment will not impair
122 the district's ability to repay any liabilities which it has incurred, money which it has
123 borrowed or revenue bonds, notes or other obligations which it has issued or which have been
124 issued by the commission or any local transportation authority to finance any project or
125 projects.
126 (2) Whenever the board of directors of any transportation development district in
127 which a transportation development sales tax has been imposed in the manner provided by
128 this section receives a petition, signed by ten percent of the qualified voters of such
129 transportation development district calling for an election to repeal such transportation
130 development sales tax, the board of directors shall, if such repeal will not impair the district's
131 ability to repay any liabilities which it has incurred, money which it has borrowed or revenue
132 bonds, notes or other obligations which it has issued or which have been issued by the
133 commission or any local transportation authority to finance any project or projects, submit to

HB 3013 197
134 the voters of such transportation development district a proposal to repeal the transportation
135 development sales tax imposed pursuant to the provisions of this section. If a majority of the
136 votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the proposal to
137 repeal the transportation development sales tax, then the resolution imposing the
138 transportation development sales tax, along with any amendments thereto, is repealed. If a
139 majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the proposal to
140 repeal the transportation development sales tax, then the resolution imposing the
141 transportation development sales tax, along with any amendments thereto, shall remain in
142 effect.
238.410. 1. Any county transit authority established pursuant to section 238.400 may
impose a sales tax of up to one percent on all retail sales made in such county which are
subject to taxation under the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525. The tax authorized
by this section shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that
no sales tax imposed under the provisions of this section shall be effective unless the
governing body of the county, on behalf of the transit authority, submits to the voters of the
county, at a county or [state general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to authorize the
transit authority to impose a tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the ______ Transit Authority impose a countywide sales tax of _
_____ (insert amount) in order to provide revenues for the operation of
transportation facilities operated by the transit authority?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the tax shall become effective on the first day of the second
calendar quarter following notification to the department of revenue of adoption of the tax. If
a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the
transit authority shall have no power to impose the sales tax authorized by this section unless
and until another proposal to authorize the transit authority to impose the sales tax authorized
by this section has been submitted and such proposal is approved by a majority of the
qualified voters voting thereon.
3. All revenue received by the transit authority from the tax authorized under the
provisions of this section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely by

HB 3013 198
the transit authority for construction, purchase, lease, maintenance and operation of
transportation facilities located within the county for so long as the tax shall remain in effect.
Any funds in such special trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures may be
invested by the transit authority in accordance with applicable laws relating to the investment
of county funds.
4. No transit authority imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section may repeal or
amend such sales tax unless such repeal or amendment is submitted to and approved by the
voters of the county in the same manner as provided in subsection 1 of this section for
approval of such tax. Whenever the governing body of any county in which a sales tax has
been imposed in the manner provided by this section receives a petition, signed by ten percent
of the registered voters of such county voting in the last gubernatorial election, calling for an
election to repeal such sales tax, the governing body shall submit to the voters of such county
a proposal to repeal the sales tax imposed under the provisions of this section. If a majority of
the votes cast on the proposal by the registered voters voting thereon are in favor of the
proposal to repeal the sales tax, then such sales tax is repealed. If a majority of the votes cast
by the registered voters voting thereon are opposed to the proposal to repeal the sales tax, then
such sales tax shall remain in effect.
5. The sales tax imposed under the provisions of this section shall impose upon all
sellers a tax for the privilege of engaging in the business of selling tangible personal property
or rendering taxable services at retail to the extent and in the manner provided in sections
144.010 to 144.525 and the rules and regulations of the director of revenue issued pursuant
thereto; except that the rate of the tax shall be the rate approved pursuant to this section. The
amount reported and returned to the director of revenue by the seller shall be computed on the
basis of the combined rate of the tax imposed by sections 144.010 to 144.525 and the tax
imposed by this section, plus any amounts imposed under other provisions of law.
6. After the effective date of any tax imposed under the provisions of this section, the
director of revenue shall perform all functions incident to the administration, collection,
enforcement, and operation of the tax, and the director of revenue shall collect in addition to
the sales tax for the state of Missouri the additional tax authorized under the authority of this
section. The tax imposed under this section and the tax imposed under the sales tax law of the
state of Missouri shall be collected together and reported upon such forms and under such
administrative rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the director of revenue. In order
to permit sellers required to collect and report the sales tax to collect the amount required to
be reported and remitted, but not to change the requirements of reporting or remitting tax or to
serve as a levy of the tax, and in order to avoid fractions of pennies, the applicable provisions
of section 144.285 shall apply to all taxable transactions.

HB 3013 199
7. All applicable provisions contained in sections 144.010 to 144.525 governing the
state sales tax and section 32.057, the uniform confidentiality provision, shall apply to the
collection of the tax imposed by this section, except as modified in this section. All
exemptions granted to agencies of government, organizations, persons and to the sale of
certain articles and items of tangible personal property and taxable services under the
provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525 are hereby made applicable to the imposition and
collection of the tax imposed by this section. The same sales tax permit, exemption certificate
and retail certificate required by sections 144.010 to 144.525 for the administration and
collection of the state sales tax shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and no additional
permit or exemption certificate or retail certificate shall be required; except that the director
of revenue may prescribe a form of exemption certificate for an exemption from the tax
imposed by this section. All discounts allowed the retailer under the provisions of the state
sales tax law for the collection of and for payment of taxes under chapter 144 are hereby
allowed and made applicable to any taxes collected under the provisions of this section. The
penalties provided in section 32.057 and sections 144.010 to 144.525 for a violation of those
sections are hereby made applicable to violations of this section.
8. For the purposes of a sales tax imposed pursuant to this section, all retail sales shall
be deemed to be consummated at the place of business of the retailer, except for tangible
personal property sold which is delivered by the retailer or his agent to an out-of-state
destination or to a common carrier for delivery to an out-of-state destination and except for
the sale of motor vehicles, trailers, boats and outboard motors, which is provided for in
subsection 12 of this section. In the event a retailer has more than one place of business in
this state which participates in the sale, the sale shall be deemed to be consummated at the
place of business of the retailer where the initial order for the tangible personal property is
taken, even though the order must be forwarded elsewhere for acceptance, approval of credit,
shipment or billing. A sale by a retailer's employee shall be deemed to be consummated at the
place of business from which he works.
9. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue under this section on behalf of
any transit authority, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited in the
state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in this
section, shall be deposited in the state treasury in a special trust fund, which is hereby created,
to be known as the "County Transit Authority Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the
county transit authority sales tax trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not
be commingled with any funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate
records of the amount of money in the trust fund which was collected in each transit authority
100 imposing a sales tax under this section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of
101 officers of the county and the public. Not later than the tenth day of each month the director

HB 3013 200
102 of revenue shall distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month
103 to the transit authority which levied the tax.
104 10. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from
105 the amounts in the trust fund and credited to any transit authority for erroneous payments and
106 overpayments made, and may authorize the state treasurer to redeem dishonored checks and
107 drafts deposited to the credit of such transit authorities. If any transit authority abolishes the
108 tax, the transit authority shall notify the director of revenue of the action at least ninety days
109 prior to the effective date of the repeal and the director of revenue may order retention in the
110 trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of
111 such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored
112 checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after
113 the effective date of abolition of the tax in such transit authority, the director of revenue shall
114 authorize the state treasurer to remit the balance in the account to the transit authority and
115 close the account of that transit authority. The director of revenue shall notify each transit
116 authority of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due
117 the transit authority. The director of revenue shall annually report on his management of the
118 trust fund and administration of the sales taxes authorized by this section. He shall provide
119 each transit authority imposing the tax authorized by this section with a detailed accounting of
120 the source of all funds received by him for the transit authority.
121 11. The director of revenue and any of his deputies, assistants and employees who
122 shall have any duties or responsibilities in connection with the collection, deposit, transfer,
123 transmittal, disbursement, safekeeping, accounting, or recording of funds which come into the
124 hands of the director of revenue under the provisions of this section shall enter a surety bond
125 or bonds payable to any and all transit authorities in whose behalf such funds have been
126 collected under this section in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars; but the director of
127 revenue may enter into a blanket bond or bonds covering himself and all such deputies,
128 assistants and employees. The cost of the premium or premiums for the surety bond or bonds
129 shall be paid by the director of revenue from the share of the collection retained by the
130 director of revenue for the benefit of the state.
131 12. Sales taxes imposed pursuant to this section and use taxes on the purchase and
132 sale of motor vehicles, trailers, boats, and outboard motors shall not be collected and remitted
133 by the seller, but shall be collected by the director of revenue at the time application is made
134 for a certificate of title, if the address of the applicant is within a county where a sales tax is
135 imposed under this section. The amounts so collected, less the one percent collection cost,
136 shall be deposited in the county transit authority sales tax trust fund. The purchase or sale of
137 motor vehicles, trailers, boats, and outboard motors shall be deemed to be consummated at

HB 3013 201
138 the address of the applicant. As used in this subsection, the term "boat" shall only include
139 motorboats and vessels as the terms "motorboat" and "vessel" are defined in section 306.010.
140 13. In any county where the transit authority sales tax has been imposed, if any
141 person is delinquent in the payment of the amount required to be paid by him under this
142 section or in the event a determination has been made against him for taxes and penalty under
143 this section, the limitation for bringing suit for the collection of the delinquent tax and penalty
144 shall be the same as that provided in sections 144.010 to 144.525. Where the director of
145 revenue has determined that suit must be filed against any person for the collection of
146 delinquent taxes due the state under the state sales tax law, and where such person is also
147 delinquent in payment of taxes under this section, the director of revenue shall notify the
148 transit authority to which delinquent taxes are due under this section by United States
149 registered mail or certified mail at least ten days before turning the case over to the attorney
150 general. The transit authority, acting through its attorney, may join in such suit as a party
151 plaintiff to seek a judgment for the delinquent taxes and penalty due such transit authority. In
152 the event any person fails or refuses to pay the amount of any sales tax due under this section,
153 the director of revenue shall promptly notify the transit authority to which the tax would be
154 due so that appropriate action may be taken by the transit authority.
155 14. Where property is seized by the director of revenue under the provisions of any
156 law authorizing seizure of the property of a taxpayer who is delinquent in payment of the tax
157 imposed by the state sales tax law, and where such taxpayer is also delinquent in payment of
158 any tax imposed by this section, the director of revenue shall permit the transit authority to
159 join in any sale of property to pay the delinquent taxes and penalties due the state and to the
160 transit authority under this section. The proceeds from such sale shall first be applied to all
161 sums due the state, and the remainder, if any, shall be applied to all sums due such transit
162 authority under this section.
163 15. The transit authority created under the provisions of sections 238.400 to 238.412
164 shall notify any and all affected businesses of the change in tax rate caused by the imposition
165 of the tax authorized by sections 238.400 to 238.412.
166 16. In the event that any transit authority in any county with a charter form of
167 government and with more than two hundred fifty thousand but fewer than three hundred fifty
168 thousand inhabitants submits a proposal in any election to increase the sales tax under this
169 section, and such proposal is approved by the voters, the county shall be reimbursed for the
170 costs of submitting such proposal from the funds derived from the tax levied under this
171 section.
247.040. 1. Proceedings for the formation of a public water supply district shall be
substantially as follows: a petition in duplicate describing the proposed boundaries of the
district sought to be formed, accompanied by a plat of the proposed district, shall be filed with

HB 3013 202
the clerk of the circuit court of the county wherein the proposed district is situate, or with the
clerk of the circuit court of the county having the largest acreage proposed to be included in
the proposed district, in the event that the proposed district embraces lands in more than one
county. Such petition, in addition to such boundary description, shall set forth an estimate of
the number of customers of the proposed district, the necessity for the formation of the
district, the probable cost of the improvement, an approximation of the assessed valuation of
taxable property within the district and such other information as may be useful to the court in
determining whether or not the petition should be granted and a decree of incorporation
entered. Such petition shall be accompanied by a cash deposit of fifty dollars as an
advancement of the costs of the proceeding, and the petition shall be signed by not less than
fifty voters or owners of real property within the proposed district and shall pray for the
incorporation of the territory therein described into a public water supply district. The
petition shall be verified by at least one of the signers of the petition, including a statement
confirming that service has been made by certified mail to the city manager or the business
office of any municipality with boundaries located not more than one mile from any boundary
of the proposed district.
2. Upon the filing of the petition, the same shall be presented to the circuit court, and
such court shall fix a date for a hearing on such petition, as herein provided for. Thereupon
the clerk of the court shall give notice of the filing of the petition in some newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the proceedings are pending, and if the district
extends into any other county or counties, such notice shall also be published in some
newspaper of general circulation in such other county or counties. The notice shall contain a
description of the proposed boundary lines of the district and the general purposes of the
petition, and shall set forth the date fixed for the hearing on the petition, which shall not be
less than seven nor more than twenty-one days after the date of the last publication of the
notice and shall be on some regular judicial day of the court wherein the petition is pending.
Such notice shall be signed by the clerk of the circuit court and shall be published in three
successive issues of a weekly newspaper or in a daily newspaper once a week for three
consecutive weeks.
3. The court, for good cause shown, may continue the case or the hearing thereon
from time to time until final disposition thereof.
4. Exceptions to the formation of a district, or to the boundaries outlined in the
petition for the incorporation thereof, may be made by any voter or owner of real property in
the proposed district or by any municipality with boundaries located not more than one mile
from any boundary of the proposed district; provided, such exceptions are filed not less than
five days prior to the date set for the hearing on the petition. Such exceptions shall specify the
grounds upon which the exceptions are being made. If any such exceptions be filed, the court

HB 3013 203
shall take them into consideration in passing upon the petition and shall also consider the
evidence in support of the petition and in support of the exceptions made. Should the court
find that the petition should be granted but that changes should be made in the boundary lines,
it shall make such changes in the boundary lines as set forth in the petition as to the court may
seem meet and proper, and thereupon enter its decree of incorporation, with such boundaries
as changed.
5. Should the court find that it would not be to the public interest to form such a
district, the petition shall be dismissed at the costs of the petitioners. If, however, the court
should find in favor of the formation of such district, the court shall enter its decree of
incorporation, setting forth the boundaries of the proposed district as determined by the court
pursuant to the aforesaid hearing. The decree of incorporation shall also divide the district
into five subdistricts and shall fix their boundary lines, all of which subdistricts shall have
approximately the same area and shall be numbered. The decree shall further contain an
appointment of one voter from each of such subdistricts, to constitute the first board of
directors of the district. No two members of such board so appointed or hereafter elected or
appointed shall reside in the same subdistrict, except as provided in section 247.060. If no
qualified person who lives in the subdistrict is willing to serve on the board, the court may
appoint, or the voters may elect, an otherwise qualified person who lives in the district but not
in the subdistrict. The court shall designate two of such directors so appointed to serve for a
term of two years and one to serve for a term of one year. And the directors thus appointed by
the court shall serve for the terms thus designated and until their successors shall have been
appointed or elected as herein provided. The decree shall further designate the name and
number of the district by which it shall hereafter be officially known.
6. The decree of incorporation shall not become final and conclusive until it shall
have been submitted to the voters residing within the boundaries described in such decree and
until it shall have been assented to by a majority of the voters as provided in subsection 9 of
this section or by two-thirds of the voters of the district voting on the proposition at the
primary election. The decree shall provide for the submission of the question and shall fix
the date thereof. The returns shall be certified by the judges and clerks of election to the
circuit court having jurisdiction in the case and the court shall thereupon enter its order
canvassing the returns and declaring the result of such election.
7. If, upon canvass and declaration, it is found and determined that the question shall
have been assented to by a majority of two-thirds of the voters of the district voting on such
proposition, then the court shall, in such order declaring the result of the election, enter a
further order declaring the decree of incorporation to be final and conclusive. In the event,
however, that the court should find that the question had not been assented to by the majority
above required, the court shall enter a further order declaring such decree of incorporation to

HB 3013 204
be void and of no effect. No appeal shall lie from any such decree of incorporation nor from
any of the aforesaid orders. In the event that the court declares the decree of incorporation to
be final, as herein provided for, the clerk of the circuit court shall file certified copies of such
decree of incorporation and of such final order with the secretary of state of the state of
Missouri, and with the recorder of deeds of the county or counties in which the district is
situate and with the clerk of the county commission of the county or counties in which the
district is situate.
8. The costs incurred in the formation of the district shall be taxed to the district, if the
district be incorporated, otherwise against the petitioners.
9. If petitioners seeking formation of a public water supply district specify in their
petition that the district to be organized shall be organized without authority to issue general
obligation bonds, then the decrees relating to the formation of the district shall recite that the
district shall not have authority to issue general obligation bonds and the vote required for
such a decree of incorporation to become final and conclusive shall be a simple majority of
the voters of the district voting on such proposition.
247.060. 1. The management of the business and affairs of the district is hereby
vested in a board of directors, who shall have all the powers conferred upon the district except
as herein otherwise provided. It shall be composed of five members, each of whom shall be a
voter of the district and shall have resided in said district one whole year immediately prior to
his or her election. A member shall be at least twenty-five years of age and shall not be
delinquent in the payment of taxes at the time of his election. Except as provided in
subsection 2 of this section, the term of office of a member of the board shall be three years.
The remaining members of the board shall appoint a qualified person to fill any vacancy on
the board. If no qualified person who lives in the subdistrict for which there is a vacancy is
willing to serve on the board, the board may appoint an otherwise qualified person who lives
in the district but not in the subdistrict in which the vacancy exists to fill such vacancy.
2. After notification by certified mail that he or she has two consecutive unexcused
absences, any member of the board failing to attend the meetings of the board for three
consecutive regular meetings, unless excused by the board for reasons satisfactory to the
board, shall be deemed to have vacated the seat, and the secretary of the board shall certify
that fact to the board. The vacancy shall be filled as other vacancies occurring in the board.
3. The initial members of the board shall be appointed by the circuit court and one
shall serve until the immediately following first Tuesday after the first Monday in April, two
shall serve until the first Tuesday after the first Monday in April on the second year following
their appointment and the remaining appointees shall serve until the first Tuesday after the
first Monday in April on the third year following their appointment. On the expiration of
such terms and on the expiration of any subsequent term, elections shall be held as otherwise

HB 3013 205
provided by law, and such elections shall be held [in April pursuant to section 247.180] at the
primary election.
4. In 2008, 2009, and 2010, directors elected in such years shall serve from the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in June until the first Tuesday in April of the third year
following the year of their election. All directors elected thereafter shall serve from the first
Tuesday in April until the first Tuesday in April of the third year following the year of their
election.
5. Each member of the board may receive an attendance fee not to exceed one
hundred dollars for attending each regularly called board meeting, or special meeting, but
shall not be paid for attending more than two meetings in any calendar month, except that in a
county of the first classification, a member shall not be paid for attending more than four
meetings in any calendar month. However, no board member shall be paid more than one
attendance fee if such member attends more than one board meeting in a calendar week. In
addition, the president of the board of directors may receive fifty dollars for attending each
regularly or specially called board meeting, but shall not be paid the additional fee for
attending more than two meetings in any calendar month. Each member of the board shall be
reimbursed for his or her actual expenditures in the performance of his or her duties on behalf
of the district.
6. In no event, however, shall a board member receive any attendance fees or
additional compensation authorized in subsection 5 of this section until after such board
member has completed a minimum of six hours training regarding the responsibilities of the
board and its members concerning the basics of water treatment and distribution, budgeting
and rates, water utility planning, the funding of capital improvements, the understanding of
water utility financial statements, the Missouri sunshine law, and this chapter.
7. The circuit court of the county having jurisdiction over the district shall have
jurisdiction over the members of the board of directors to suspend any member from
exercising his or her office, whensoever it appears that he or she has abused his or her trust or
become disqualified; to remove any member upon proof or conviction of gross misconduct or
disqualification for his or her office; or to restrain and prevent any alienation of property of
the district by members, in cases where it is threatened, or there is good reason to apprehend
that it is intended to be made in fraud of the rights and interests of the district.
8. The jurisdiction conferred by this section shall be exercised as in ordinary cases
upon petition, filed by or at the instance of any member of the board, or at the instance of any
ten voters residing in the district who join in the petition, verified by the affidavit of at least
one of them. The petition shall be heard in a summary manner after ten days' notice in
writing to the member or officer complained of. An appeal shall lie from the judgment of the
circuit court as in other causes, and shall be speedily determined; but an appeal does not

HB 3013 206
operate under any condition as a supersedeas of a judgment of suspension or removal from
office.
247.130. 1. Any district organized hereunder shall have power to borrow money for
any of the purposes provided for in sections 247.010 to 247.220, and to issue bonds therefor.
In such event the board of directors shall proceed substantially as follows: The board shall
adopt a resolution, reciting the necessity for the borrowing of money, the amount of money
necessary to be raised, the purposes thereof, and the amount and type or character of bonds to
be issued. Such resolution shall also fix the date of an election, to be held at the primary
election, for the purpose of testing the sense of the voters of the district on the question of
incurring such indebtedness and issue bonds in evidence thereof.
2. Such resolution may submit at such election a proposal to issue general obligation
bonds or special obligation bonds, or both, but in no event shall the board of directors have
authority to issue bonds unless at such election the constitutionally required percentage of the
qualified voters of the district voting on any general obligation bonds shall assent thereto and
a simple majority of the qualified voters of the district voting on any special obligation bonds
shall assent thereto.
3. Districts organized under the provisions of sections 247.010 to 247.220 may issue
either general obligation bonds or special obligation bonds, as herein defined; provided,
however, that the type or character of bonds to be issued shall be determined by the board of
directors in advance of calling the bond election and shall be stated in the notice of election as
herein provided.
4. General obligation bonds, within the meaning of said sections, shall be bonds
issued within the limitation of indebtedness prescribed under Section 26 of Article VI of the
Constitution of Missouri, for the payment of which, both principal and interest, a direct tax
may be levied upon all taxable property within the district. Before or at the time of issuing
general obligation bonds, the board of directors shall provide for the collection of an annual
tax, to be levied upon all taxable property within the district sufficient to pay the interest on
such bonds as it falls due, and also to constitute a sinking fund for the payment of the
principal thereof within twenty years from the date of such bonds; provided, however, that the
net income and revenue arising from the operation of the waterworks system of such district,
after providing for costs of operation, maintenance, depreciation and necessary extensions
and enlargements, shall be transferred to and become a part of the interest and sinking fund
applicable to such general obligation bonds, unless or until such net revenues are pledged to
the payment of special obligation bonds as herein provided.
5. Special obligation bonds, within the meaning of sections 247.010 to 247.220, shall
be bonds payable, both as to principal and interest, wholly and only out of the net income and
revenues arising from the operation of the waterworks system of any such district, after

HB 3013 207
providing for costs of operation, maintenance, depreciation and necessary extensions and
enlargements, and such bonds shall not be deemed to be indebtedness of any such district
within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation upon the incurring of
indebtedness. Before or at the time of issuing any such special obligation bonds, the board of
directors shall pledge such net income and revenues to the payment of such bonds, both
principal and interest, and shall covenant to fix, maintain and collect rates for water and water
service supplied by such district so as to assure that such net income and revenues will be
sufficient for the purposes herein required.
6. All bonds issued under the provisions of sections 247.010 to 247.220 shall be
payable serially, beginning not more than five years after the date they bear; the last
installment of any general obligation bonds so issued shall be payable not more than twenty
years after such date, and the last installment of any special obligation bonds so issued shall
be payable not more than thirty-five years after such date. Such bonds shall bear such rate of
interest, not exceeding six percent per annum, payable annually or semiannually, shall be
payable at such place or places, within or without the state of Missouri, shall be executed by
the president of the board of directors, attested by the clerk of said board, under the seal of the
district, and shall be of such denomination and be payable in such medium of payment, all as
the board of directors may determine; provided, further, that should any bond issue fail to
carry at an election held for that purpose, the board of directors shall have no power to call
another election on the question of the issuance of bonds for a period of four months
thereafter.
247.170. 1. Whenever any city owning a waterworks or water supply system extends
its corporate limits to include any part of the area in a public water supply district, and the city
and the board of directors of the district are unable to agree upon a service, lease or sale
agreement, or are unable to proceed under section 247.160, then upon the expiration of ninety
days after the effective date of the extension of the city limits, that part of the area of the
district included within the corporate limits of the city may be detached and excluded from
the district in the following manner:
(1) A petition to detach and exclude that part of the public water supply district lying
within the corporate limits of the city as such limits have been extended, signed by not less
than five percent of the registered voters who are patrons of the water supply district, or
twenty registered voters that are patrons of each subdistrict, whichever is less, shall be filed in
the circuit court of the county in which the district was originally organized.
(2) The court, being satisfied as to the sufficiency of the petition, shall call [a special]
an election of the voters of the district for the next primary election day at which election
the proposal to detach and exclude the part of the district lying within the corporate limits of

HB 3013 208
the city shall be submitted to the voters in the entire district for a vote thereon. The election
shall be conducted within the district by the election authority.
(3) The ballot shall briefly state the question to be voted on.
(4) In order to approve the detachment and exclusion of any part of the area in a
public water supply district, the proposal shall require the approval of not less than a majority
of the voters voting thereon.
(5) The election authorities shall thereafter promptly certify the result to the circuit
court. The court, acting as a court of equity, shall thereupon without delay enter a decree
detaching and excluding the area in question located within the corporate limits of the city
from the public water supply district; except that before the decree detaching and excluding
the area becomes final or effective, the city shall show to the court that it has assumed and
agreed to pay in lump sum or in installments not less than that proportion of the sum of all
existing liquidated general obligations and of all unpaid revenue bonds and interest thereon to
date of the water supply district as the assessed valuation of the real and tangible personal
property within the area sought to be detached and excluded bears to the assessed valuation of
all of the real and tangible personal property within the entire area of the district, according to
the official county assessment of property as of December thirty-first of the calendar year
next preceding the date of the election, and in addition thereto that the city has assumed and
agreed to assume or pay in a lump sum all contractual obligations of the water district that are
greater than twenty-five thousand dollars for debt that pertains to infrastructure, fixed assets
or obligations for the purchase of water, and to pay the court costs.
(6) The decree shall thereupon vest in the city the absolute title, free and clear of all
liens or encumbrances of every kind and character, to all tangible real and personal property
of the public water supply district located within the part of the district situated within the
corporate limits of the city with full power in the city to use and dispose of the tangible real
and personal property as it deems best in the public interest.
(7) If the proposal fails to receive the approval of the voters the question may be
again presented by another petition and again voted on, but not sooner than six months.
(8) Any and all sums paid out by the city under this section, other than the costs of the
election, shall be administered by the circuit court for the benefit of the holders of the then
existing and outstanding bonds of the district, and the remainder of such sums, if any, shall be
delivered to the district to be expended in the operation, maintenance and improvement of its
water distribution system.
2. Upon the effective date of any final order detaching and excluding any part of the
area of any public water supply district, or leasing, selling or conveying any of the water
mains, plant or equipment therein, the circuit court may, in the public interest, change the
boundaries of the public water supply district and again divide or redivide the district into

HB 3013 209
subdistricts for the election of directors in conformity with the provisions of section 247.040,
without further petition being filed with the court so to do.
247.180. 1. Regular elections and elections held for the purposes of section 247.130
shall be called [annually by the board of directors on the first Tuesday after the first Monday
in April] and take place on the primary election day. Such elections shall be conducted by
the appropriate election authority pursuant to chapter 115.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if there is only one candidate for the
post of director of any given subdistrict, then no election shall be held, and the candidate or
candidates shall assume the responsibilities of their offices at the same time and in the same
manner as if elected. If there is no candidate for the post of any given subdistrict, then no
election shall be held for that post and it shall be considered vacant, to be filled pursuant to
the provisions of section 247.060.
247.217. 1. Any two or more contiguous public water supply districts organized
under the provisions of sections 247.010 to 247.220 may be consolidated into a single district
by a decree of the circuit court in which the district with the largest acreage was originally
incorporated and organized.
2. Proceedings for consolidation of such districts shall be substantially as follows:
The board of directors of each of the districts to be consolidated shall authorize, by resolution
passed at a regular meeting or a special meeting called for such purpose, its president, on
behalf of the district, to petition the circuit court having jurisdiction for consolidation with
any one or more other contiguous public water supply districts.
3. Such petition shall be filed in the circuit court having jurisdiction and the court
shall set a date for a hearing thereon and the clerk shall give notice thereof in some newspaper
of general circulation in each county in which each of the districts proposed to be
consolidated is located.
4. Such notice shall be substantially as follows:
IN THE CIRCUIT COURT OF ______ COUNTY, MISSOURI
NOTICE OF THE FILING OF A PETITION
FOR CONSOLIDATION OF
PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY DISTRICT NO. ______,
OF ______ COUNTY, MISSOURI, AND
PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY DISTRICT NO. ______,
OF ______ COUNTY, MISSOURI
(Additional districts may be named as required.)
To all voters, landowners, and interested persons within the boundaries
of the above-described public water supply districts:
You are hereby notified:

HB 3013 210
1. That a petition has been filed in this court for the consolidation of
the above-named public water supply districts into one public
water supply district, as provided by law.
2. That a hearing on said petition will be held before this court on
the ______ day of ______, 20______, at ______, ______.m.
3. Exceptions or objections to the consolidation of said districts
may be made by any voters or landowners of any of such districts
proposed to be consolidated, provided such exceptions or
objections are filed in writing not less than five days prior to the
date set for the hearing on the petition.
4. The names and addresses of the attorneys for the petitioner are:
_______________
Clerk of the Circuit Court of
______ County, Missouri
5. The notice shall be published in three consecutive issues of a weekly newspaper in
each county in which any portion of any district proposed to be consolidated lies, or in lieu
thereof, in twenty consecutive issues of a daily newspaper in each county in which any
portion of any district proposed to be consolidated lies; the last insertion of such notice to be
made not less than seven nor more than twenty-one days before the hearing.
6. The court, for good cause shown, may continue the case or the hearing thereon
from time to time until final disposition thereof.
7. Exceptions or objections to the consolidation of such districts may be made by any
voter or landowner within the boundaries of the proposed district. The exceptions or
objections shall be in writing and shall specify the grounds upon which the same are made
and shall be filed not later than five days before the date set for hearing the petition. If any
such exceptions or objections are filed, the court shall take them into consideration in passing
upon the petition for consolidation and shall also consider the evidence in support of the
petition. If the court finds that the consolidation will provide for the rendering of necessary
water service in the districts, and is in the best interest of the voters and the landowners of the
district, it shall, by its decree, approve such consolidation. The decree of consolidation shall
set an effective date for the consolidation of the districts and shall provide that the proposed
consolidated district shall be divided into five subdistricts and shall fix boundary lines of each
subdistrict, all of which subdistricts shall have approximately the same area and shall be
numbered.
8. The decree of consolidation shall not become final and conclusive until it has been
submitted to voters in each of the districts proposed to be included in the consolidated district.

HB 3013 211
9. If, upon canvass and declaration of the results, it is found and determined that the
question has been assented to by a majority of the voters of each district voting on the
question, the court shall issue its order declaring the results of the elections, declaring its
previous decree of consolidation to be final and conclusive, and in addition, the decree shall
provide for an election of a director from each of the subdistricts set forth in the decree of the
court as specified in subsection 7 of this section. The terms of office for the directors elected
at such election shall be as follows: The director elected from the subdistrict designated by
the circuit court as number one shall serve until the next regular election, or until his
successor has been elected and qualified; those directors elected from the subdistricts
designated by the circuit court as numbers two and three shall serve until the regular election
following the next regular election or until their successors have been elected and qualified;
those directors elected from the subdistricts designated by the circuit court as numbers four
and five shall serve until the annual regular election following the next two regular elections,
or until their successors have been elected and qualified. Thereafter all directors shall be
elected at the primary election and as provided by sections 247.010 to 247.220. The
election shall be held at least thirty days before the effective date of the consolidation. The
returns shall be certified by the judges and clerks of election to the circuit court having
jurisdiction and the court shall thereupon enter its order naming the directors from each
subdistrict.
10. The eligibility and requirements for a director for a consolidated district shall be
identical with those set forth in section 247.060 and no two members of the board shall reside
in the same subdistrict. Any candidate shall have his name imprinted upon the ballot,
provided he shall file a declaration of intention to become such a candidate with the clerk of
the circuit court.
11. In its final decree, the court shall designate a name for the consolidated district
which shall be as follows: Consolidated Public Water Supply District No. ______, of ______
County, Missouri.
12. On the effective date of the consolidation of the districts, the newly elected
directors shall organize in the same manner as is provided in sections 247.010 to 247.220, and
all of such provisions shall apply to consolidated public water supply districts in the same
manner as to other public water supply districts.
13. At the time of the effective date of the consolidation, all the property of the
original districts shall be combined and administered as one unit, which shall be subject to the
liens, liabilities and obligations of the original districts, provided that if any district included
in the consolidated district has issued general obligation bonds which are outstanding at the
time of the consolidation, any taxes to be levied to pay the bonds and interest thereon shall be
levied only upon the property within the original district issuing the bonds as it existed on the

HB 3013 212
date of such issuance. All special obligation or revenue bonds issued by any district included
100 in the consolidated district shall be paid in accordance with the terms thereof, without
101 preference, from the revenue received by the consolidated district.
102 14. A certified copy of the decrees of the court shall be filed in the office of the
103 recorder and in the office of the county clerk in each county in which any part of the
104 consolidated district is located, and in the office of the secretary of state. Such copies shall be
105 filed by the clerk of the circuit court and the filing fees shall be taxed as costs.
247.220. 1. Proceedings for the dissolution of a public water supply district shall be
substantially the same as proceedings for the formation of such a district, as follows: A
petition describing the boundaries of the district sought to be dissolved shall be filed with the
clerk of the circuit court of the county wherein the subject district is situate, or with the clerk
of the circuit court of the county having the largest acreage within the boundaries of the
subject district, in the event that the subject district embraces lands in more than one county.
Such petition, in addition to such boundary description, shall allege that further operation of
the subject district is inimicable to the best interests of the inhabitants of the district, that the
district should, in the interest of the public welfare and safety, be dissolved, that an alternative
water supplier is available and better able to supply water to the inhabitants of the district, and
such other information as may be useful to the court in determining whether the petition
should be granted and a decree of dissolution entered. Such petition shall also include a
detailed plan for payment of all debt and obligations of the district at the time of dissolution.
Such petition shall be accompanied by a cash deposit of fifty dollars as an advancement of the
costs of the proceeding and the petition shall be signed by not less than one-fifth of the
registered voters from each subdistrict, or fifty registered voters from each subdistrict,
whichever is less, within the subject district. The petition shall be verified by at least one of
the signers thereof and shall be served upon the board of directors of the district as provided
by law. The district shall be a party, and if the board of directors in its discretion determines
that such dissolution is not in the public interest, the district shall oppose such petition and
pay all cost and expense thereof.
2. Upon the filing of the petition, the same shall be presented to the circuit court, and
such court shall fix a date for a hearing on such petition, as provided in this section.
Thereupon, the clerk of the court shall give notice of the filing of the petition in some
newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the proceedings are pending, and if
the district extends into any other county or counties, such notice shall also be published in
some newspaper of general circulation in such other county or counties. The notice shall
contain a description of the subject boundary lines of the district and the general purposes of
the petition, and shall set forth the date fixed for the hearing on the petition, which shall not
be less than seven nor more than twenty-one days after the date of the last publication of the

HB 3013 213
notice and shall be on some regular judicial day of the court wherein the petition is pending.
Such notice shall be signed by the clerk of the circuit court and shall be published in three
successive issues of a weekly newspaper or in twenty successive issues of a daily newspaper.
3. The court, for good cause shown, may continue the case or the hearing thereon
from time to time until final disposition thereof.
4. Exceptions to the dissolution of a district may be made by any voter or landowner
of the district, and by the district as herein provided; such exceptions shall be filed not less
than five days prior to the date set for the hearing on the petition. Such exceptions shall
specify the grounds upon which the exceptions are filed and the court shall take them into
consideration in passing upon the petition and shall also consider the evidence in support of
the petition and in support of the exceptions made. Unless petitioners prove that all debts and
financial obligations of the district can be paid in full upon dissolution, the petition shall be
dismissed at the cost of the petitioners.
5. Should the court find that it would not be to the public interest to dissolve a district,
the petition shall be dismissed at the costs of the petitioners. If, however, the court should
find in favor of the petitioners, the court shall enter its interlocutory decree of dissolution
which decree shall provide for the submission of the question to the voters of the district in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ Public Water Supply District be dissolved?
6. The decree of dissolution shall not become final and conclusive until it shall have
been submitted to the voters residing within the boundaries described in such decree and until
it shall have been assented to by a majority of two-thirds of the voters of the district voting on
the proposition at the primary election. The decree shall provide for the submission of the
question and shall fix the date thereof. The returns shall be certified by the election authority
to the circuit court having jurisdiction in the case and the court shall thereupon enter its order
canvassing the returns and declaring the result of such election.
7. If, upon canvass and declaration, it is found and determined that the question shall
have been assented to by a majority of two-thirds of the voters of the district voting on such
proposition then the court shall, in such order declaring the result of the election, enter a
further order declaring the decree of dissolution to be final and conclusive. In the event,
however, that the court should find that the question had not been assented to by the majority
required, the court shall enter a further order declaring such decree of dissolution to be void
and of no effect. No appeal shall lie from any of the aforesaid orders. In the event that the
court declares the decree of dissolution to be final, as provided in this section, the clerk of the
circuit court shall file certified copies of such decree of dissolution and of such final order
with the secretary of state of the state of Missouri, and with the recorder of deeds of the

HB 3013 214
county or counties in which the district is situate and with the clerk of the county commission
of the county or counties in which the district is situate.
8. Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, no district shall be
dissolved until after all of its debts shall have been paid, and the court, in its decree of
dissolution, shall provide for the disposition of the property of the district.
247.350. 1. The decree of incorporation shall not become final and conclusive until it
shall have been submitted to voters of the proposed district and until it shall have been
assented to by a majority vote of the voters of the district voting on the question.
2. The decree shall provide for the submission of the question of incorporating such
districts and to vote on the maximum rate of levy for general operating purposes if such
maximum rate shall exceed fifteen cents on the one hundred dollar valuation of the district,
shall fix the date for holding such election as the primary election date.
3. The question of incorporating the district shall be submitted in substantially the
following form:
Shall there be incorporated a ______ metropolitan water supply district?
4. Any question to determine the maximum rate of levy for general operation
purposes in excess of fifteen cents on the one hundred dollars valuation shall be submitted in
substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ metropolitan water supply district be authorized to levy a tax not
exceeding ______ cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation for general operating
purposes?
5. The return shall be certified to the circuit court having jurisdiction in the cause, and
said court shall thereupon enter its order canvassing said returns and declaring the result of
such election. If upon such canvass and declaration it is found and determined that a majority
of the voters of the district voting on the question shall have voted in favor of the question, the
court shall enter its further order declaring the decree of incorporation to be final and
conclusive. In the event, however, that the court shall find the majority shall not have voted
in favor of the question the court shall enter its further order declaring said decree of
incorporation to be void and of no effect.
6. If the court enters an order declaring the decree of incorporation to be final and
conclusive, it shall at the same time designate the first board of directors of said district from
among the names of the voters who have been named in one or more petitions filed in said
cause. The court shall designate and the decree shall contain the appointment of two of such
directors to serve for a term ending three years after the next succeeding second Tuesday in
April, two of such directors to serve for a term ending three years after the next succeeding
second Tuesday in April, two of such directors to serve for a term ending two years after the
next succeeding second Tuesday in April, and one of such directors to serve for a term ending

HB 3013 215
one year after the next succeeding second Tuesday in April. The directors thus appointed by
the court shall serve for the terms thus designated and until their successors shall have been
appointed or elected as provided in section 247.430.
7. The court shall at the same time enter an order of record declaring the result of the
submission of the question to determine the maximum rate of levy of the district, and shall set
forth the amount beyond which the board shall not thereafter have power to order a levy
except as otherwise provided in section 247.460 and which levy in no event shall exceed the
sum of twenty-five cents on the one hundred dollar assessed valuation.
247.470. 1. On or before the first day of May of each year, the board shall certify to
the county commission of the county within which the district is located a rate of levy so
fixed by the board as provided by law, with directions that at the time and in the manner
required by law for levy of taxes for county purposes such county commission shall levy a tax
at the rate so fixed and determined upon the assessed valuation of all the taxable tangible
property within the district, in addition to such other taxes as may be levied by such county
commission.
2. If the board thereafter in any year fixes and determines by resolution of the board a
rate of levy in excess of fifteen cents per one hundred dollars valuation or of the rate approved
by a vote of the majority of the voters of the district voting thereon, as provided herein for
general purposes, then the board shall order the submission of the question of levying a tax
rate in such increased amount to the voters of the district in the same manner so far as
practicable as is provided for the submission of the question to create a bonded indebtedness.
Such resolution of the board shall also fix the date upon which the election is to be held at the
next primary election date.
3. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ metropolitan water supply district be authorized to levy an annual
rate of taxation not exceeding ______ cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation for
general operating purposes?
247.550. 1. Any district organized hereunder shall have power to borrow money for
any of the purposes provided for in sections 247.230 to 247.670, and to issue bonds therefor.
In such event the board of directors shall proceed substantially as follows:
(1) The board shall adopt a resolution reciting the necessity for the borrowing of
money, the amount of money necessary to be raised, the purposes thereof, the amount and
type or character of bonds to be issued.
(2) Such resolution shall also fix the date of an election to be held for the purpose of
testing the sense of the voters of the district on the question to borrow money and issue bonds
in evidence thereof at the next primary election date.

HB 3013 216
(3) Such resolution may submit at such election a proposal to issue general obligation
bonds or special revenue obligation bonds, or both. Districts organized under the provisions
of sections 247.230 to 247.670 may issue either general obligation bonds or special revenue
obligation bonds provided that the type or character of bonds to be issued shall be determined
by the board of directors in advance of calling the bond election and shall be stated in the
notice of election as herein provided.
2. If the question is to issue general obligation bonds, it must be assented to by two-
thirds of the voters of the district voting on the question; if the question is to issue special
revenue obligation bonds, it must be assented to by four-sevenths of the voters on the
question.
249.070. 1. After the incorporation of the district aforesaid it shall be the duty of the
court to order the election authority to call and hold an election at the next primary election;
said election to be called and held in the manner herein provided, at which election the voters
residing within the sewer district may vote for three persons who shall form the board of
trustees for said district as herein provided.
2. In the order of such election the court shall also provide for submitting at such
election a proposition to incur indebtedness by the district in an amount not greater than the
estimate of the cost of constructing a system of sewers as provided in the report of the
engineer.
3. The notice shall state the purpose of the election and the amount of indebtedness to
be incurred.
249.150. On the first Tuesday in April after the expiration of two years from the date
of the election of the first board of trustees for respective terms of two, four and six years
each, an election shall be called and held by the board of trustees and every two years
thereafter shall be so called and held for the purpose of electing a trustee who shall serve for a
term of six years and until his successor shall have been elected and qualified to fill the office
of the trustee whose term may then expire and any vacancy then existing in the membership
of said board shall be filled at such election. Beginning on August 28, 2026, such elections
shall be held on the primary election date.
249.1150. 1. There is hereby created within any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than thirty-four thousand but less than
thirty-four thousand one hundred inhabitants, any county of the second classification without
a township form of government and with more than fifty-four thousand two hundred but less
than fifty-four thousand three hundred inhabitants, any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than thirteen thousand seventy-five
but less than thirteen thousand one hundred seventy-five inhabitants, any county of the first
classification with more than two hundred forty thousand three hundred but less than two

HB 3013 217
hundred forty thousand four hundred inhabitants, any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than nine thousand four hundred fifty
but less than nine thousand five hundred fifty inhabitants, any county of the third
classification without a township form of government and with more than twenty-eight
thousand six hundred but less than twenty-eight thousand seven hundred inhabitants, any
county of the first classification with more than thirty-nine thousand seven hundred but less
than thirty-nine thousand eight hundred inhabitants, any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than thirty-one thousand but less than
thirty-one thousand one hundred inhabitants, and any county of the third classification
without a township form of government and with more than seventeen thousand nine hundred
but less than eighteen thousand inhabitants, the "Upper White River Basin Watershed
Improvement District". The watershed improvement district is authorized to own, install,
operate, and maintain decentralized or individual on-site wastewater treatment plants. The
watershed improvement district created under this section shall be a body corporate and a
political subdivision of the state of Missouri, shall be capable of suing and being sued in
contract in its corporate name, and shall be capable of holding such real and personal property
necessary for corporate purposes. The district shall implement procedures to regulate the area
within the district and to educate property owners within the district about the requirements
imposed by the district.
2. Any county included in the Upper White River Basin watershed improvement
district, as established in subsection 1 of this section, may choose to opt out of the district in
one of two ways:
(1) Upon the filing of a petition signed by at least twenty percent of the property
owners residing within the county, a proposal is submitted to the qualified voters within the
district boundaries. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the county of ______ opt out of the Upper White River Basin
Watershed Improvement District?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county favors the proposal to opt out of the
district, then the county shall no longer be included in the Upper White River Basin
watershed improvement district, and shall cease all imposition, collection, and assessment of
any taxes associated with that district, beginning on the first day of the first month following
the election. If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county opposes the proposal to opt

HB 3013 218
out of the district, then the county shall remain a part of the Upper White River Basin
watershed improvement district. However, if a proposal to opt out of the district is not
approved, the governing body of the county shall not resubmit a proposal to the voters under
this section sooner than twelve months from the date of the last proposal submitted under this
section; or
(2) Upon the issuance of an order by the county commission, a proposal is submitted
to the qualified voters within the district boundaries to opt out of the Upper White River
Basin watershed improvement district. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the
following form:
Shall the county of ______ opt out of the Upper White River Basin
Watershed Improvement District?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county favors the proposal to opt out of the Upper
White River Basin watershed improvement district, then the county shall no longer be
included in the Upper White River Basin watershed improvement district, and shall cease all
imposition, collection, and assessment of any taxes associated with that district, beginning on
the first day of the first month following the election. If a simple majority of the votes cast in
the county opposes the proposal to opt out of the Upper White River Basin watershed
improvement district, then the county shall remain a part of the Upper White River Basin
watershed improvement district. However, if a proposal to opt out of the Upper White River
Basin watershed improvement district is not approved, the governing body of the county shall
not resubmit a proposal to the voters under this section sooner than twelve months from the
date of the last proposal submitted under this section.
3. Any county who has successfully chosen to opt out of the Upper White River Basin
watershed improvement district under the provisions of subsection 2 of this section shall be
allowed to rejoin the district at any time, provided the county submits the proposal to rejoin
the district in one of two ways:
(1) Upon the filing of a petition signed by at least twenty percent of the property
owners residing within the county, a proposal is submitted to the qualified voters within the
county. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the following form:
Shall the county of ______ rejoin the Upper White River Basin
Watershed Improvement District?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

HB 3013 219
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county favors the proposal to rejoin the Upper
White River Basin watershed improvement district, then the county shall rejoin the district. If
a simple majority of the votes cast in the county opposes the proposal to rejoin the district,
then the county shall remain outside the Upper White River Basin watershed improvement
district. However, if a proposal to rejoin the Upper White River Basin watershed
improvement district is not approved, the governing body of the county shall not resubmit a
proposal to the voters under this section sooner than twelve months from the date of the last
proposal submitted under this section; or
(2) Upon the issuance of an order by the county commission, a proposal is submitted
to the qualified voters within the district boundaries to rejoin the Upper White River Basin
watershed improvement district. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the
following form:
Shall the county of ______ rejoin the Upper White River Basin
100 Watershed Improvement District?
101 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
102 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
103 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
104 opposite "NO".
105
106 If a simple majority of the votes cast in the county favors the proposal to rejoin the Upper
107 White River Basin watershed improvement district, then the county shall rejoin the Upper
108 White River Basin watershed improvement district. If a simple majority of the votes cast in
109 the county opposes the proposal to rejoin the Upper White River Basin watershed
110 improvement district, then the county shall remain outside the Upper White River Basin
111 watershed improvement district. However, if a proposal to rejoin the Upper White River
112 Basin watershed improvement district is not approved, the governing body of the county shall
113 not resubmit a proposal to the voters under this section sooner than twelve months from the
114 date of the last proposal submitted under this section.
115 4. The watershed improvement district created under this section shall have the power
116 to borrow money and incur indebtedness and evidence the same by certificates, notes, or
117 debentures, to issue bonds and use any one or more lawful funding methods the district may
118 obtain for its purposes at such rates of interest as the district may determine. Any bonds,

HB 3013 220
119 notes, and other obligations issued or delivered by the district may be secured by mortgage,
120 pledge, or deed of trust of any or all of the property within the district. Every issue of such
121 bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be payable out of property and revenues of the district
122 and may be further secured by other property within the district, which may be pledged,
123 assigned, mortgaged, or a security interest granted for such payment, without preference or
124 priority of the first bonds issued, subject to any agreement with the holders of any other bonds
125 pledging any specified property or revenues. Such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be
126 authorized by resolution of the district board, and shall bear such date or dates, and shall
127 mature at such time or times, but not in excess of thirty years, as the resolution shall specify.
128 Such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be in such denomination, bear interest at such
129 rate or rates, be in such form, either coupon or registered, be issued as current interest bonds,
130 compound interest bonds, variable rate bonds, convertible bonds, or zero coupon bonds, be
131 issued in such manner, be payable in such place or places, and be subject to redemption as
132 such resolution may provide, notwithstanding section 108.170. The bonds, notes, or other
133 obligations may be sold at either public or private sale, at such interest rates, and at such price
134 or prices as the district shall determine.
135 5. The county commission of any county located within the watershed improvement
136 district may authorize individual properties to be served by the district by adoption of a
137 resolution or upon the filing of a petition signed by at least twenty percent of the property
138 owners of the proposed area. The resolution or petition shall describe generally the size and
139 location of the proposed area.
140 6. In the event that any property within the watershed improvement district proposed
141 under this section lies within or is serviced by any existing sewer district formed under this
142 chapter, chapter 204, or chapter 250, the property shall not become part of the watershed
143 improvement district formed under this section unless the existing sewer district agrees to
144 refrain from providing service or to discontinue service to the property. No property shall
145 become part of the watershed district until the owner of that property has paid in full all
146 outstanding costs owed to an existing sewer district formed under this chapter, chapter 204, or
147 chapter 250.
148 7. Upon the creation of the watershed improvement district as authorized by this
149 section, a board of trustees for the district consisting of nine members shall be appointed. The
150 governing body of each county shall appoint one member to serve on the board. No trustee
151 shall reside in the same county as another trustee. Of the initial trustees appointed, five shall
152 serve terms of one year, and four shall serve terms of two years, as determined by lot. After
153 the initial appointments of the trustees, the successor trustees shall reside in the same county
154 as the prior trustee and be elected by the resident property owners of their county within the
155 district. Each trustee may be elected to no more than five consecutive two-year terms.

HB 3013 221
156 Vacancies shall be filled by the board. Each trustee shall serve until a successor is elected and
157 sworn. The trustees shall not receive compensation for their services, but may be reimbursed
158 for their actual and necessary expenses. The board shall elect a chair and other officers
159 necessary for its membership. The board shall enter into contracts with any person or entity
160 for the maintenance, administrative, or support work required to administer the district. The
161 board may charge reasonable fees and submit proposals to levy and impose property taxes to
162 fund the operation of the district to the qualified voters in the district, but such proposals shall
163 not become effective unless a majority of the qualified voters in the district voting on the
164 proposals approve the proposed levy and rate of tax. The board may adopt resolutions
165 necessary to the operation of the district.
166 8. No service shall be initiated to any property lying within the watershed
167 improvement district created under this section unless the property owner elects to have the
168 service provided by the district.
169 9. Any on-site wastewater treatment system installed on any property that participates
170 in the watershed improvement district formed under this section shall meet all applicable
171 standards for such on-site wastewater treatment systems under sections 701.025 to 701.059
172 and as required by rules or regulations promulgated by the board of trustees and the
173 appropriate state agencies.
174 10. Property owners participating in the watershed improvement district formed
175 under this section shall be required as a condition of continued participation to have a
176 maintenance plan approved by the watershed improvement district for the on-site wastewater
177 treatment systems on their properties. Such property owners shall also execute a utilities
178 easement to allow the district access to the system for maintenance purposes and inspections.
179 The property owner shall provide satisfactory proof that periodic maintenance is performed
180 on the sewage system. At a minimum the system shall be installed and maintained according
181 to the manufacturer's recommendations. The level of satisfactory proof required and the
182 frequency of periodic proof shall be determined by the board of trustees.
183 11. A district established under this section may, at a [general or] primary election,
184 submit to the qualified voters within the district boundaries a real property tax that shall not
185 exceed five cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation to fund the operation of the
186 district. The ballot of submission shall be in substantially the following form:
187 Shall the ______ (name of district) impose a real property tax within
188 the district at a rate of not more than ______ (insert amount) dollars per
189 hundred dollars of assessed valuation to fund the operation of the
190 district?
191 (cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

HB 3013 222
192 If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
193 "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
194 opposite "NO".
195
196 If a majority of the votes cast in each county that is part of the district favor the proposal, then
197 the real property tax shall become effective in the district on the first day of the year following
198 the year of the election. If a majority of the votes cast in each county that is a part of the
199 district oppose the proposal, then that county shall not impose the real property tax authorized
200 in this section until after the county governing body has submitted another such real property
201 tax proposal and the proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
202 However, if a real property tax proposal is not approved, the governing body of the county
203 shall not resubmit a proposal to the voters under this section sooner than twelve months from
204 the date of the last proposal submitted under this section.
205 12. The real property tax authorized by this section is in addition to all other real
206 property taxes allowed by law.
207 13. Once the real property tax authorized by this section is abolished or terminated by
208 any means, all funds remaining in the trust fund shall be used solely for the purposes
209 approved in the ballot question authorizing the tax. The tax shall not be abolished or
210 terminated while the district has any financing or other obligations outstanding. Any funds in
211 the trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the district in
212 the securities described in subdivisions (1) to (12) of subsection 1 of section 30.270 or
213 repurchase agreements secured by such securities.
214 14. The governing body of any county included in the Upper White River Basin
215 watershed improvement district established in this section may designate groundwater
216 depletion areas within specific areas of the county and may require well volume monitoring.
217 However, any county included in this district may choose not to require well volume
218 monitoring.
251.615. 1. Any city or county that has agreed to form a regional economic
development district created under the regional economic development district law which
consists of all of one or more entire counties, all of one or more entire cities, or all of one or
more entire counties and one or more entire cities which are totally outside the boundaries of
those counties may impose, by resolution of the governing body of the city or county, a sales
tax on all retail sales made in the city or county which are subject to sales tax under chapter
144 for the benefit of the regional economic development district. The sales tax may be
imposed at a rate of one-eighth of one percent, one-fourth of one percent, three-eighths of one
percent or one-half of one percent on the receipts from the sale at retail of all tangible

HB 3013 223
personal property or taxable services at retail within any such city or county adopting such
tax, if such property and services are subject to taxation by the state of Missouri under the
provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525. The resolution imposing the tax shall not become
effective unless the governing body of the city or county submits to the voters of the city or
county at any [citywide, county, or state general,] primary[, or special] election a proposal to
authorize the city or county to impose a tax under this section. The tax authorized in this
section shall be in addition to all other sales taxes imposed by law and shall be stated
separately from all other charges and taxes.
2. The ballot of submission for the tax authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall the city or county of ______ (insert city or county name) impose
a sales tax at the rate of ______ (insert amount) for economic
development purposes?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the resolution and any amendments thereto shall be in effect. If a
majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the
governing body of the city or county shall have no power to impose the sales tax authorized
by this section unless and until the proposal is resubmitted under this section and such
proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
3. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue under this section on behalf of
any city or county for the benefit of a regional economic development district, less one
percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund after
payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in a
special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be known as the "Regional Economic
Development District Sales Tax Trust Fund".
4. The moneys in the regional economic development district sales tax trust fund shall
not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state. The
director of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount of money in the trust fund
which was collected in each city or county imposing a sales tax under this section, and the
records shall be open to the inspection of the board of the district, the governing body of the
city or county, and the public.

HB 3013 224
5. Not later than the tenth day of each month, the director of revenue shall distribute
all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the city or county which
levied the tax. Such funds shall be distributed to the treasurer of the governing body of the
city or county which shall deposit all such funds for the benefit of the district. All
expenditures of funds arising from the regional economic development district sales tax trust
fund shall be in accordance with the regional economic development district law.
6. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from the
amounts in the trust fund and credited to any city or county for erroneous payments and
overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such city or county.
7. If any city or county abolishes the tax, the governing body of the city or county
shall notify the director of revenue of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date
of the repeal, and the director of revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of
one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible
refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to
the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of
the tax in such district, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the city
or county and close the account of that city or county. The director of revenue shall notify
each city or county of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from
receipts due the city or county.
8. Except as modified in and by this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and
32.087 shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
9. All revenue generated by the tax shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall
be used solely for the designated purposes. If the tax is repealed, all funds remaining in the
special trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes. Any funds in
the special trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures may be invested by the
city or county in accordance with applicable laws relating to the investment of other city or
county funds.
10. The board shall consider regional economic development plans, regional
economic development projects, or designations of a regional economic development district
and shall hold public hearings and provide notice of any such hearings. The board shall vote
on all proposed regional economic development plans, regional economic development
projects, or designations of a regional economic development district, and amendments
thereto, within thirty days following completion of the hearing on any such plan, project, or
designation, and shall make the final determination on use and expenditure of any funds
received from the tax imposed under this section.

HB 3013 225
11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the regional economic
development district sales tax imposed under this section when imposed within a special
taxing district, including but not limited to a tax increment financing district, neighborhood
improvement district, or community improvement district, shall be excluded from the
calculation of revenues available to such districts, and no revenues from any sales tax
imposed under this section shall be used for the purposes of any such district unless approved
by the regional economic development district board established under the regional economic
development district law and the governing body of the city or county imposing the tax.
12. The board of the district shall make a report at least annually on the use of the
funds provided under this section and on the progress of any plan, project, or area designation
adopted under this section and shall make such report available to the public and the
governing body of the city or county imposing the tax.
13. (1) No city or county imposing a sales tax under this section may repeal or amend
such sales tax unless such repeal or amendment will not impair the district's ability to repay
any liabilities which it has incurred, money which it has borrowed, or revenue bonds, notes,
or other obligations which it has issued to finance any project or projects.
(2) Whenever the governing body of any city or county in which a regional economic
development district sales tax has been imposed in the manner provided by this section
100 receives a petition, signed by ten percent of the qualified voters of such city or county calling
101 for an election to repeal such regional economic development district sales tax, the governing
102 body shall, if such repeal will not impair the district's ability to repay any liabilities which it
103 has incurred, money which it has borrowed, or revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations
104 which it has issued to finance any project or projects, submit to the voters of such city or
105 county a proposal to repeal the regional economic development district sales tax imposed
106 under this section at the next primary election. If a majority of the votes cast on the
107 proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the proposal to repeal the
108 regional economic development district sales tax, then the resolution imposing the regional
109 economic development district sales tax, along with any amendments thereto, is repealed. If a
110 majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the proposal to
111 repeal the regional economic development district sales tax, then the resolution imposing the
112 regional economic development district sales tax, along with any amendments thereto, shall
113 remain in effect.
114 14. If any provision of the regional economic development district law or the
115 application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect
116 other provisions or application of the regional economic development district law which can
117 be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of
118 the regional economic development district law are declared severable.

HB 3013 226
256.445. 1. Any political subdivision which contains a sponsor which has submitted
a plan which has been approved by the director pursuant to sections 256.435 to 256.445 may
submit to the qualified voters of the political subdivision the following question:
Shall the political subdivision of ______ (name of political
subdivision) incur indebtedness and issue general obligation bonds to
pay for all or part of the costs of establishing and maintaining a water
resource project with the political subdivision, the cost of all
indebtedness so incurred to be assessed by the governing body of ____
__ (name of political subdivision) on property within the political
subdivision?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
2. If it appears that the required percentage of the voters of such political subdivision
voting on the proposition of incurring indebtedness submitted at the election were in favor of
incurring such indebtedness, the election authority shall make an order reciting the holding of
such election and the results thereof, both for and against the proposition, and if the result of
the election as certified shall be in favor of incurring the indebtedness and issuing the bonds,
then the governing body of the political subdivision shall direct the issuance thereof to the
amount of the debt authorized to be incurred, or any portion thereof, and shall either before or
at the time of doing so provide for the collection of an annual ad valorem tax upon all of the
taxable property within the political subdivision, which tax shall be sufficient to pay the
interest on such indebtedness as it falls due and also to create a sinking fund for the payment
of the principal thereof within twenty years from the date of contracting the same, such tax to
be levied and collected as provided for in chapter 137.
3. The governing body of the political subdivision shall have no power to levy or
collect any taxes for the payment of any indebtedness incurred by the political subdivision
pursuant to this section unless and until the voters of the political subdivision shall have
authorized the incurring of indebtedness at [an] the primary election, but all such expenses
and indebtedness incurred by the political subdivision may be paid out of funds which may be
received by the political subdivision from the sale of bonds authorized by the voters at any
such election.
4. Such bonds shall be issued in denominations of one hundred dollars or some
multiple thereof; shall be payable to bearer, not later than twenty years from their date; shall
bear interest from their date at a rate not exceeding six percent per annum, payable annually
or semiannually; such interest payments to be evidenced by annexed coupons, and such bonds
shall not be sold for less than ninety-five percent of the face value thereof and together with
existing indebtedness of the political subdivision, if any, shall not exceed in the aggregate five
percent of the value of all of the taxable property in the political subdivision to be ascertained

HB 3013 227
by the assessment next before the last assessment for state and county purposes previous to
the incurring of such indebtedness.
5. Such bonds shall be signed by the presiding officer of the governing body of the
political subdivision attested by the signature of the secretary of the governing body with the
seal of the political subdivision affixed thereto. The bonds may be sold under the same
conditions as are provided for the sale of county road bonds.
6. All bonds issued under this section shall be registered in the office of the state
auditor as provided by law for the registration of bonds of cities and in the office of the
governing body of the political subdivision in a book kept for that purpose for registry, shall
show the number, date, amount, date of sale, name of the purchaser and the amount for which
the bond was sold.
7. The governing body of the political subdivision wherein such project is situate
shall certify the amount of money that will be required during the next succeeding year to pay
interest falling due on bonds issued and the principal of bonds maturing in such year, and the
amount necessary to cover the estimated expenses of maintaining such project in good
condition. The governing body shall, at the time it makes the levy for other taxes, by order
made, levy such a rate of taxes upon all the taxable property in the political subdivision as
will produce a sum of money sufficient for the purposes of the water resource project;
provided, that the governing body shall have no authority to levy such tax until the voters of
the political subdivision shall have voted to incur an indebtedness under the provisions of this
section.
8. On such order being made it shall be the duty of the governing body to cause such
rate of taxation to be extended upon the tax books against all the taxable property in the
political subdivision and the same shall be collected and remitted to the governing board of
the water project by the collector of the revenue of the political subdivision at the time, in the
manner, and by the same means as state, county, school and other taxes are collected and
remitted. All of the laws, rights and remedies provided by the laws of this state for the
collection of state, county, school and other taxes shall be applicable to the collection of taxes
herein authorized to be collected.
9. All taxes levied pursuant to this section shall be based upon the assessed valuation
of lands and other property in the political subdivision in accordance with the current record
of the assessed valuations of all taxable property within the political subdivision as may be
determined by the records in the assessor's office of the political subdivision and such tax
shall be prorated and an equal amount levied upon each one hundred dollars assessed
valuation.
321.210. On the first Tuesday in April after the expiration of at least two full calendar
years from the date of the election of the first board of directors, and on the first Tuesday in

HB 3013 228
April every two years thereafter, an election for members of the board of directors shall be
held in the district. Nominations shall be filed at the headquarters of the fire protection
district in which a majority of the district is located by paying a filing fee equal to the amount
of a candidate for county office as set forth under section 115.357 and filing a statement under
oath that the candidate possesses the required qualifications. The candidate receiving the
most votes shall be elected. Any new member of the board shall qualify in the same manner
as the members of the first board qualify. Beginning August 28, 2026, such election shall
be held at the primary election.
321.225. 1. A fire protection district may, in addition to its other powers and duties,
provide emergency ambulance service within its district if a majority of the voters voting
thereon approve a proposition to furnish such service and to levy a tax not to exceed thirty
cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation to be used exclusively to supply funds for
the operation of an emergency ambulance service. The district shall exercise the same powers
and duties in operating an emergency ambulance service as it does in operating its fire
protection service.
2. The proposition to furnish emergency ambulance service may be submitted by the
board of directors at any [municipal general,] primary [or general] election [or at any election
of the members of the board].
3. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire Protection District be
authorized to provide emergency ambulance service within the
district and be authorized to levy a tax not to exceed thirty cents
on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide funds
for such services?
4. If a majority of the voters casting votes thereon be in favor of emergency
ambulance service and the levy, the district shall forthwith commence such service.
5. As used in this section "emergency" means a situation resulting from a sudden or
unforeseen situation or occurrence that requires immediate action to save life or prevent
suffering or disability.
6. In addition to all other taxes authorized on or before September 1, 1990, the board
of directors of any fire protection district may, if a majority of the voters of the district voting
thereon approve, levy an additional tax of not more than forty cents per one hundred dollars
of assessed valuation to be used for the support of the ambulance service or partial or
complete support of a paramedic first responder program. The proposition to levy the tax
authorized by this subsection may be submitted by the board of directors at the next [annual
election of the members of the board or at any regular municipal or school election conducted
by the county clerk or board of election commissioners in such district or at a special election

HB 3013 229
called for the purpose, or upon petition of five hundred registered voters of the district]
primary election. A separate ballot containing the question shall read as follows:
Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire Protection District
be authorized to levy an additional tax of not more than forty
cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide funds
for the support of an ambulance service or partial or complete
support of a paramedic first responder program?
(cid:0) FOR THE PROPOSITION
(cid:0) AGAINST THE PROPOSITION
(Place an X in the square opposite the one for which you wish to
vote.)

If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon be in favor of the question, the board
of directors shall accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of this subsection,
but if a majority of voters casting votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by
this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain in effect.
321.242. 1. The governing body of any fire protection district which operates within
and has boundaries identical to a city with a population of at least thirty thousand but not
more than thirty-five thousand inhabitants which is located in a county of the first
classification, excluding a county of the first classification having a population in excess of
nine hundred thousand, or the governing body of any municipality having a municipal fire
department may impose a sales tax in an amount of up to one-half of one percent on all retail
sales made in such fire protection district or municipality which are subject to taxation
pursuant to the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525. The tax authorized by this section
shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no sales tax
imposed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be effective unless the governing body
of the fire protection district or municipality submits to the voters of such fire protection
district or municipality, at a [county or state general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal
to authorize the governing body of the fire protection district or municipality to impose a tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall _________ (insert name of district or municipality) impose
a sales tax of _________ (insert rate of tax) for the purpose of
providing revenues for the operation of the _________ (insert fire
protection district or municipal fire department)?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO


HB 3013 230
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the sales tax authorized in this section shall be in effect. If a
majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the
governing body of the fire protection district or municipality shall not impose the sales tax
authorized in this section unless and until the governing body of such fire protection district
or municipality resubmits a proposal to authorize the governing body of the fire protection
district or municipality to impose the sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
3. All revenue received by a fire protection district or municipality from the tax
authorized pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be deposited in a special trust fund
and shall be used solely for the operation of the fire protection district or the municipal fire
department.
4. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue pursuant to this section or
section 321.246 on behalf of any fire protection district or municipality, less one percent for
cost of collection which shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment of
premiums for surety bonds as provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust
fund, which is hereby created, to be known as the "Fire Protection Sales Tax Trust Fund".
Any moneys in the fire protection district sales tax trust fund created prior to August 28,
1999, shall be transferred to the fire protection sales tax trust fund. The moneys in the fire
protection sales tax trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be
commingled with any funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate records
of the amount of money in the trust fund and of the amounts which were collected in each fire
protection district or municipality imposing a sales tax pursuant to this section, and the
records shall be open to the inspection of officers of the fire protection district or municipality
and the public. Not later than the tenth day of each month, the director of revenue shall
distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the fire
protection district or municipality which levied the tax. Such funds shall be deposited with
the treasurer of each such fire protection district or municipality, and all expenditures of funds
arising from the fire protection sales tax trust fund shall be for the operation of the fire
protection district or the municipal fire department and for no other purpose.
5. The director of revenue may make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund and
credited to any fire protection district or municipality for erroneous payments and
overpayments made and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit
of such fire protection districts or municipalities. If any fire protection district or
municipality abolishes the tax, the fire protection district or municipality shall notify the
director of revenue of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal
and the director of revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of

HB 3013 231
two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or
overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in
such fire protection district or municipality, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in
the account to the fire protection district or municipality and close the account of that fire
protection district or municipality. The director of revenue shall notify each fire protection
district or municipality of each instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from
receipts due the fire protection district or municipality. In the event a tax within a fire
protection district is approved pursuant to this section, and such fire protection district is
dissolved, if the boundaries of the fire protection district are identical to that of the city, the
tax shall continue and proceeds shall be distributed to the governing body of the city formerly
containing the fire protection district and the proceeds of the tax shall be used for fire
protection services within such city.
6. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
321.244. 1. Any fire protection district which has revised or reduced any levy which
it has been authorized to impose under the provisions of section 321.225, 321.240, 321.241,
321.243, 321.246, 321.610, or 321.620, under any provision of the constitution or laws of this
state, may increase each such revised or reduced levy up to, but not in excess of, the
maximum limits allowed under the section authorizing the rate of levy sought to be increased
by submitting the following proposition to the voters of the district at any primary[, general or
special] election:
Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire Protection District be
authorized to increase the rate of levy for ______ (insert purpose of
which tax is levied) from ______ cents to ______ cents on each one
hundred dollars of assessed valuation?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
2. If any of the propositions submitted under subsection 1 of this section is approved
by a majority of the voters of the district voting thereon, the board of directors may increase
the levy which was the subject of such proposition to the amount authorized by such
proposition.
321.246. 1. The governing body of any fire protection district which operates within
both a county with a charter form of government and with a population greater than six
hundred thousand but less than nine hundred thousand and a county of the fourth
classification with a population greater than thirty thousand but less than thirty-five thousand
and that adjoins a county with a charter form of government, the governing body of any fire
protection district which contains a city of the fourth classification having a population

HB 3013 232
greater than two thousand four hundred when the city is located in a county with a charter
form of government having a population greater than one hundred fifty thousand and the
county contains a portion of a city with a population greater than three hundred fifty
thousand, or the governing body of any fire protection district that operates in a county of the
third classification with a population greater than fourteen thousand but less than fifteen
thousand may impose a sales tax in an amount of up to one-half of one percent on all retail
sales made in such fire protection district which are subject to taxation pursuant to the
provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525. The tax authorized by this section shall be in
addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no sales tax imposed
pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be effective unless the governing body of the
fire protection district submits to the voters of the fire protection district, at a [county or state
general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the fire
protection district to impose a tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the fire protection district of ______ (district's name)
impose a district-wide sales tax of ______ for the purpose of
providing revenues for the operation of the fire protection
district?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the sales tax authorized in this section shall be in effect. If a
majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the
governing body of the fire protection district shall not impose the sales tax authorized in this
section unless and until the governing body of the fire protection district resubmits a proposal
to authorize the governing body of the fire protection district to impose the sales tax
authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting thereon.
3. All revenue received by a fire protection district from the tax authorized pursuant
to the provisions of this section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used
solely for the operation of the fire protection district.
4. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue pursuant to this section on
behalf of any fire protection district, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be
deposited in the state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as
provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in the fire protection sales tax trust fund
established pursuant to section 321.242. The moneys in the fire protection sales tax trust fund

HB 3013 233
shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled with any funds of the state.
The director of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount of money in the trust and
which was collected in each fire protection district imposing a sales tax pursuant to this
section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of the fire protection district
and the public. Not later than the tenth day of each month, the director of revenue shall
distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the fire
protection district which levied the tax. Such funds shall be deposited with the treasurer of
each such fire protection district, and all expenditures of funds arising from the fire protection
sales tax trust fund shall be for the operation of the fire protection district and for no other
purpose.
5. The director of revenue may make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund and
credited to any fire protection district for erroneous payments and overpayments made and
may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such fire protection
districts. If any fire protection district abolishes the tax, the fire protection district shall notify
the director of revenue of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the
repeal and the director of revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one
year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible
refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to
the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of
the tax in such fire protection district, the director of revenue shall remit the balance in the
account to the fire protection district and close the account of that fire protection district. The
director of revenue shall notify each fire protection district of each instance of any amount
refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the fire protection district. In the event a
tax within a fire protection district is approved under this section, and such fire protection
district is dissolved, the tax shall lapse on the date that the fire protection district is dissolved
and the proceeds from the last collection of such tax shall be distributed to the governing
bodies of the counties formerly containing the fire protection district and the proceeds of the
tax shall be used for fire protection services within such counties.
6. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
321.460. 1. Two or more fire protection districts may consolidate with each other in
the manner hereinafter provided, and only if the districts have one or more common
boundaries, in whole or in part, or are located within the same county, in whole or in part, as
to any respective two of the districts which are so consolidating.
2. By a majority vote of each board of directors of each fire protection district
included within the proposed consolidation, a consolidation plan may be adopted. The
consolidation plan shall include the name of the proposed consolidated district, the legal

HB 3013 234
description of the boundaries of each district to be consolidated, and a legal description of the
boundaries of the consolidated district, the amount of outstanding bonds, if any, of each
district proposed to be consolidated, a listing of the firehouses within each district, and the
names of the districts to be consolidated.
3. Each board of the districts approving the plan for proposed consolidation shall duly
certify and file in the office of the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the district
is located a copy of the plan of consolidation, bearing the signatures of those directors who
vote in favor thereof, together with a petition for consolidation. The petition may be made
jointly by all of the districts within the respective plan of consolidation. A filing fee of fifty
dollars shall be deposited with the clerk, on the filing of the petition, against the costs of
court.
4. The circuit court sitting in and for any county to which the petition is presented is
hereby vested with jurisdiction, power and authority to hear the same, and to approve the
consolidation and order such districts consolidated, after holding an election, as hereinafter
provided.
5. If the circuit court finds the plan for consolidation to have been duly approved by
the respective boards of directors of the fire protection districts proposed to be consolidated,
then the circuit court shall enter its order of record, directing the submission of the question.
6. The order shall direct publication of notice of election, and shall fix the date thereof
for the next primary election. The order shall direct that the elections shall be held to vote
on the proposition of consolidating the districts and to elect three persons, having the
qualifications declared in section 321.130 and being among the then directors of the districts
proposed to be consolidated, to become directors of the consolidated district.
7. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the ______ Fire Protection Districts and the ______ Fire Protection District be
consolidated into one fire protection district to be known as the ______ Fire Protection
District, with tax levies not in excess of the following amounts: maintenance fund ______
cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation; ambulance service ______ cents per one
hundred dollars assessed valuation; pension fund ______ cents per one hundred dollars
assessed valuation; and dispatching fund ______ cents per one hundred dollars assessed
valuation?
8. If, upon the canvass and declaration, it is found and determined that a majority of
the voters of the districts voting on the proposition or propositions have voted in favor of the
proposition to incorporate the consolidated district, then the court shall then further, in its
order, designate the first board of directors of the consolidated district, who have been elected
by the voters voting thereon, the one receiving the third highest number of votes to hold office
until the first Tuesday in April which is more than one year after the date of election, the one

HB 3013 235
receiving the second highest number of votes to hold office until two years after the first
Tuesday aforesaid, and the one receiving the highest number of votes until four years after the
first Tuesday in April as aforesaid. If any other propositions are also submitted at the
election, the court, in its order, shall also declare the results of the votes thereon. If the court
shall find and determine, upon the canvass and declaration, that a majority of the voters of the
consolidated district have not voted in favor of the proposition to incorporate the consolidated
district, then the court shall enter its order declaring the proceedings void and of no effect, and
shall dismiss the same at the cost of petitioners.
321.552. 1. The governing body of any ambulance or fire protection district may
impose a sales tax in an amount up to one percent on all retail sales made in such ambulance
or fire protection district which are subject to taxation pursuant to the provisions of sections
144.010 to 144.525 provided that such sales tax shall be accompanied by a reduction in the
district's tax rate as defined in section 137.073. The tax authorized by this section shall be in
addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no sales tax imposed
pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be effective unless the governing body of the
ambulance or fire protection district submits to the voters of such ambulance or fire protection
district, at a [municipal or state general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to authorize
the governing body of the ambulance or fire protection district to impose a tax pursuant to this
section.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall ______ (insert name of ambulance or fire protection
district) impose a sales tax of ______ (insert amount up to one
percent) for the purpose of providing revenues for the operation
of the ______ (insert name of ambulance or fire protection
district) and the total property tax levy on properties in the _____
_ (insert name of the ambulance or fire protection district) shall
be reduced annually by an amount which reduces property tax
revenues by an amount equal to fifty percent of the previous
year's revenue collected from this sales tax?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "NO".
3. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon
are in favor of the proposal, then the sales tax authorized in this section shall be in effect and
the governing body of the ambulance or fire protection district shall lower the level of its tax

HB 3013 236
rate by an amount which reduces property tax revenues by an amount equal to fifty percent of
the amount of sales tax collected in the preceding year. If a majority of the votes cast by the
qualified voters voting are opposed to the proposal, then the governing body of the ambulance
or fire protection district shall not impose the sales tax authorized in this section unless and
until the governing body of such ambulance or fire protection district resubmits a proposal to
authorize the governing body of the ambulance or fire protection district to impose the sales
tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified
voters voting thereon.
4. All revenue received by a district from the tax authorized pursuant to this section
shall be deposited in a special trust fund, and be used solely for the purposes specified in the
proposal submitted pursuant to this section for so long as the tax shall remain in effect.
5. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue pursuant to this section, less one
percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited in the state's general revenue fund after
payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in section 32.087, shall be deposited in a
special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be known as the "Ambulance or Fire Protection
District Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the ambulance or fire protection district sales
tax trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be commingled with any
funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate records of the amount of
money in the trust and the amount collected in each district imposing a sales tax pursuant to
this section, and the records shall be open to inspection by officers of the county and to the
public. Not later than the tenth day of each month the director of revenue shall distribute all
moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the governing body of the
district which levied the tax; such funds shall be deposited with the board treasurer of each
such district.
6. The director of revenue may make refunds from the amounts in the trust fund and
credit any district for erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem
dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such district. If any district abolishes
the tax, the district shall notify the director of revenue of the action at least ninety days prior
to the effective date of the repeal and the director of revenue may order retention in the trust
fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such
notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks
and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the
effective date of abolition of the tax in such district, the director of revenue shall remit the
balance in the account to the district and close the account of that district. The director of
revenue shall notify each district of each instance of any amount refunded or any check
redeemed from receipts due the district.

HB 3013 237
7. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
321.610. 1. In addition to all other limits set forth in this chapter, the board in
counties of the first classification shall in each year determine the amount of money necessary
to be raised by taxation, and shall fix a rate of levy which, when levied upon every dollar of
the taxable tangible property within the district as shown by the last completed assessment,
and with other revenues, will raise the amount required by the district annually to supply
funds for paying the expenses of organization and operation and the costs of acquiring,
supplying and maintaining the property, works and equipment of the district, and maintain the
necessary personnel, which rate of levy shall not exceed forty cents on the one hundred
dollars valuation. The board in any county of the first classification having a population in
excess of nine hundred thousand may fix an additional rate not to exceed twenty-five cents on
the hundred dollars valuation and the board in all other first classification counties may fix an
additional rate, not to exceed fifteen cents on the hundred dollars valuation, the revenues from
which shall be deposited in a special fund and used only for the pension program of the
district, by submitting the following question to the voters at the [municipalgeneral,] primary
[or general] election in such district or at any election at which a member of the board of
directors is to be elected:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire Protection District be authorized to levy an
annual tax rate of ______ cents per one hundred dollars valuation, the revenues from which
shall be deposited in a special fund and used only for the pension program of the district?
2. Any district approving a tax levy rate pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section shall transfer all revenue collected plus interest monthly for deposit in the district
retirement fund. The board of directors for the fire protection district shall comply with the
prudent investor standard for investment fiduciaries as provided in section 105.688 when
investing the assets of the pension program.
3. Any district may impose a tax not to exceed ten cents on the one hundred dollars
valuation, in addition to the rate which the board may levy pursuant to this section, by
submitting the following question to the voters at any election in such district held [on the
first Tuesday in April of any year] at the primary election:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire District be authorized to increase the
annual tax rate from ______ cents to ______ cents on the hundred dollars assessed valuation?

and in addition thereto, to fix a rate of levy which will enable it to promptly pay in full when
due all interest on and principal of bonds and other obligations of the district, and to pay any
indebtedness authorized by a vote of the people as provided by sections 321.010 to 321.450;

HB 3013 238
and in the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies in the bonded or contractual
indebtedness, an additional levy may be made as provided in section 321.260.
321.620. 1. Fire protection districts in first class counties may, in addition to their
other powers and duties, provide ambulance service within their district if a majority of the
voters voting thereon approve a proposition to furnish such service and to levy a tax not to
exceed thirty cents on the one hundred dollars assessed valuation to be used exclusively to
supply funds for the operation of an emergency ambulance service. The district shall exercise
the same powers and duties in operating an ambulance service as it does in operating its fire
protection service. As used in this section "emergency" means a situation resulting from a
sudden or unforeseen situation or occurrence that requires immediate action to save life or
prevent suffering or disability.
2. The proposition to furnish ambulance service may be submitted by the board of
directors at any [municipal general,] primary [or general] election [or at any election of the
members of the board or upon petition by five hundred voters of such district].
3. The question shall be submitted in substantially the following form:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire Protection District be
authorized to provide ambulance service within the district and
be authorized to levy a tax not to exceed thirty cents on the one
hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide funds for such
services?
4. If a majority of the voters casting votes thereon be in favor of ambulance service
and the levy, the district shall forthwith commence such service.
5. In addition to all other taxes authorized on or before September 1, 1990, the board
of directors of any fire protection district may, if a majority of the voters of the district voting
thereon approve, levy an additional tax of not more than forty cents per one hundred dollars
of assessed valuation to be used for the support of the ambulance service, or partial or
complete support of a paramedic first responder program. The proposition to levy the tax
authorized by this subsection may be submitted by the board of directors at the next [annual
election of the members of the board or at any regular municipal or school election conducted
by the county clerk or board of election commissioners in such district or at a special election
called for the purpose, or upon petition of five hundred registered voters of the district]
primary election. A separate ballot containing the question shall read as follows:
Shall the board of directors of the ______ Fire Protection District
be authorized to levy an additional tax of not more than forty
cents per one hundred dollars assessed valuation to provide funds
for the support of an ambulance service or partial or complete
support of a paramedic first responder program?

HB 3013 239
(cid:0) FOR THE PROPOSITION
(cid:0) AGAINST THE PROPOSITION
(Place an X in the square opposite the one for which you wish to
vote).

If a majority of the qualified voters casting votes thereon be in favor of the question, the board
of directors shall accordingly levy a tax in accordance with the provisions of this subsection,
but if a majority of voters casting votes thereon do not vote in favor of the levy authorized by
this subsection, any levy previously authorized shall remain in effect.
321.688. 1. The board of directors of any fire protection districts located wholly
within any county of the first classification may consolidate with each other upon the passage
of a joint resolution by each board desiring to consolidate. The joint resolution shall not
become effective unless each board submits to the voters residing within the fire protection
districts at a [state general,] primary[, or special] election a proposal to authorize the
consolidation under this section.
2. The ballot of submission for the consolidation authorized in this section shall be in
substantially the following form:
Shall ______ (insert the name of the fire protection districts) be
consolidated into one fire protection district, to be known as the _____
_ (insert name of proposed consolidated fire protection district)?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon in each
existing fire protection district are in favor of the question, then the consolidation shall
become effective on January first of the year immediately following the approval of the
consolidation, unless the consolidation is approved at a November election, in which case the
consolidation shall become effective on January first of the second year following the
approval of the consolidation.
3. The board of directors of any consolidated fire protection district created under this
section shall consist of the existing board members of the fire protection districts that were
consolidated. Upon the occurrence of a vacancy in the membership of the board, the number
of members on the board may be reduced upon approval by a majority of the remaining board
members, but the number of seats shall not be reduced to fewer than five. The terms of office

HB 3013 240
for board members shall be identical to the terms of office the board members were originally
elected to serve before the consolidation.
4. Upon the approval of consolidation under this section, the consolidated district
shall be a political subdivision of this state and a body corporate, with all the powers of like or
similar corporations, and with all the powers, privileges, and duties of fire protection districts
under this chapter. All properties, rights, assets, and liabilities of the fire protection districts
which are consolidated, including outstanding bonds thereof if any, shall become the
properties, rights, assets, and liabilities of the consolidated fire protection district.
5. The consolidated fire protection district shall levy the same taxes as levied in the
fire protection district with the lowest tax levy before the consolidation unless a tax levy is
specifically set forth in the ballot language approved by the voters of the consolidating
districts, except that the tax levy of the consolidated district shall not exceed the highest tax
levy of the consolidating districts.
573.505. 1. In order to defray the costs of background checks conducted pursuant to
section 573.503, any city not within a county and any county may, by ordinance or order,
impose a sales tax on all retail sales which are subject to taxation under the provisions of
sections 144.010 to 144.510 made in such city or county by any adult cabaret. The tax
authorized by this section shall not be levied at a rate which would amount to a sum greater
than ten percent of the gross receipts of any such business. The tax authorized by this section
shall be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no order or
ordinance imposing a sales tax under the provisions of this section shall be effective unless
the governing body of the city or county submits to the voters of the city or county, at a [city,
county or state general,] primary[, or special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing
body of the city or county to impose a tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the city or county of ______ (city's or county's name) impose a
sales tax upon adult cabarets of ______ (insert amount) for a period not
to exceed ______ (insert number) years for the purpose of investigating
the background of the employees of such businesses and for the general
law enforcement use of the sheriff's office with existing revenues to be
used for either purpose?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".


HB 3013 241
If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall become
effective on the first day of the second calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives
notice of adoption of the tax. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are
opposed to the proposal, then the governing body of the city or county shall have no power to
impose the sales tax authorized by this section unless and until the governing body of the city
or county shall again have submitted another proposal to authorize the governing body of the
city or county to impose the sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved
by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon.
3. All revenue received by a city or county from the tax authorized under the
provisions of this section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used by the
city or county for the investigation of the backgrounds of persons employed at any adult
cabaret in such city or county and for the general law enforcement use of the sheriff's office.
Any funds in such special trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures may be
invested by the governing body in accordance with applicable laws relating to the investment
of other city or county funds.
4. The tax authorized by this section shall terminate four years from the date on which
such tax was initially imposed by the city or county, unless sooner abolished by the governing
body of the city or county.
5. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue under this section on behalf of
any city or county, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited in the
state's general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in
section 32.087, shall be deposited with the state treasurer in a special trust fund, which is
hereby created, to be known as the "City and County Background Check Tax Trust Fund".
The moneys in the trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be
commingled with any funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate records
of the amount of money in the trust fund which was collected in each city or county imposing
a sales tax under this section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of the
city or county and the public. Not later than the tenth day of each month, the director of
revenue shall distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to
the city or county which levied the tax. Such funds shall be deposited with the city or county
treasurer of each such city or county, and all expenditures of funds arising from the trust fund
shall be by an appropriation act to be enacted by the governing body of each such city or
county.
6. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from the
amounts in the trust fund and credited to any city or county for erroneous payments and
overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of

HB 3013 242
such cities or counties. If any city or county abolishes the tax, the city or county shall notify
the director of revenue of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the
repeal and the director of revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one
year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible
refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to
the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of
the tax in such city or county, the director of revenue shall authorize the state treasurer to
remit the balance in the account to the city or county and close the account of that city or
county. The director of revenue shall notify each city or county of each instance of any
amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the city or county.
7. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
8. As used in this section, the term "city" means any city not within a county.
644.032. 1. The governing body of any municipality or county may impose, by
ordinance or order, a sales tax in an amount not to exceed one-half of one percent on all retail
sales made in such municipality or county which are subject to taxation under the provisions
of sections 144.010 to 144.525. The tax authorized by this section and section 644.033 shall
be in addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law, except that no ordinance or
order imposing a sales tax under the provisions of this section and section 644.033 shall be
effective unless the governing body of the municipality or county submits to the voters of the
municipality or county, at a [municipal, county or state general,] primary [or special] election,
a proposal to authorize the governing body of the municipality or county to impose a tax,
provided, that the tax authorized by this section shall not be imposed on the sales of food, as
defined in section 144.014, when imposed by any county with a charter form of government
and with more than one million inhabitants.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
Shall the municipality (county) of ______ impose a sales tax of ______
(insert amount) for the purpose of providing funding for ______ (insert
either storm water control, or local parks, or storm water control and
local parks) for the municipality (county)?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in
effect on the first day of the second quarter after the director of revenue receives notice of
adoption of the tax. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed

HB 3013 243
to the proposal, then the governing body of the municipality or county shall not impose the
sales tax authorized in this section and section 644.033 until the governing body of the
municipality or county resubmits another proposal to authorize the governing body of the
municipality or county to impose the sales tax authorized by this section and section 644.033
and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon; however,
in no event shall a proposal pursuant to this section and section 644.033 be submitted to the
voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the last proposal pursuant to this section
and section 644.033.
3. All revenue received by a municipality or county from the tax authorized under the
provisions of this section and section 644.033 shall be deposited in a special trust fund and
shall be used to provide funding for storm water control or for local parks, or both, within
such municipality or county, provided that such revenue may be used for local parks outside
such municipality or county if the municipality or county is engaged in a cooperative
agreement pursuant to section 70.220.
4. Any funds in such special trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures
may be invested by the governing body in accordance with applicable laws relating to the
investment of other municipal or county funds.
644.034. 1. To promote tourism by maintaining the quality of the waters of the state,
the governing body of any county containing part of a Corp of Engineers lake, any county of
the third classification without a township form of government with at least thirty-two
thousand but not more than thirty-five thousand inhabitants or any county of the first
classification without a charter form of government with a population of at least two hundred
thousand inhabitants may impose, by ordinance or order, a sales tax in the amount of up to
one-fourth of one percent on all retail sales made in such county which are subject to taxation
pursuant to the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525, for the purpose of providing
improved treatment of wastewater and water pollution abatement, including establishment of
new wastewater treatment facilities or expansion or other improvements to existing
wastewater treatment facilities, and the governing body of any county, in conjunction with
the imposition of any sales tax pursuant to this subsection, may have the option to issue bonds
to preliminarily fund the provision of improved treatment of wastewater and water pollution
abatement as specified in this subsection. The tax authorized by this section shall be in
addition to any and all other sales taxes allowed by law; except that, no ordinance or order
imposing a sales tax pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be effective unless the
governing body of the county submits to the voters of the county, at a [county or state
general,] primary [or special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the
county to impose a tax. In addition, a county shall only be authorized to issue bonds in
conjunction with any sales tax imposed pursuant to this section after the governing body of

HB 3013 244
the county submits to the voters of the county, at a [county or state general,] primary [or
special] election, a proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to issue bonds.
Any sales tax imposed pursuant to this section shall not be authorized for a period of more
than five years; provided that, if sales tax is imposed pursuant to this section in conjunction
with the issuance of bonds, the sales tax shall expire upon full repayment of all bonds issued.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to, the following
language:
(1) If the proposal submitted involves only authorization to impose the tax authorized
by this section the ballot shall contain substantially the following:
Shall the county of ______ (county's name) impose a countywide sales
tax of ______ (insert amount) for the purpose of providing improved
treatment of wastewater and water pollution abatement, including
establishment of new wastewater treatment facilities or expansion or
other improvements to existing wastewater treatment facilities in the
county?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO"
; or
(2) If the proposal submitted involves authorization to impose the tax authorized by
this section, authorization to issue bonds to preliminarily fund the provision of improved
treatment of wastewater and water pollution abatement as specified in subsection 1 of this
section, obligates the county to repay all bonds issued from the proceeds of the tax authorized
by this section and requires the expiration of the tax upon the repayment of all such bonds, the
ballot shall contain substantially the following:
Shall the county of ______ (county's name) impose a countywide sales
tax of ______ (insert amount) for the purpose of providing improved
treatment of wastewater and water pollution abatement, including
establishment of new wastewater treatment facilities or expansion or
other improvements to existing wastewater treatment facilities in the
county, issue bonds to preliminarily fund the provision of improved
treatment of wastewater and water pollution abatement, repay all bonds
issued from the proceeds of the tax imposed and terminate such tax
upon the repayment of all such bonds?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO

HB 3013 245
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box opposite
"YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "NO".

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal submitted pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, then the
ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in effect on the first day of the
second quarter immediately following the election approving the proposal. If the
constitutionally required percentage of the voters voting thereon are in favor of the
proposal submitted pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection, then the ordinance or order
and any amendments thereto shall be in effect on the first day of the second quarter
immediately following the election approving the proposal. If a proposal receives less than
the required majority, then the governing body of the county shall have no power to impose
the sales tax herein authorized unless and until the governing body of the county shall again
have submitted another proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose the
sales tax authorized by this section and such proposal is approved by the required majority of
the qualified voters voting thereon. However, in no event shall a proposal pursuant to this
section be submitted to the voters sooner than twelve months from the date of the last
proposal pursuant to this section.
3. All revenue received by a county from the tax authorized pursuant to the provisions
of this section shall be deposited in a special trust fund and shall be used solely for the
purposes specified in the proposal submitted pursuant to subsection 2 of this section within
such county for so long as the tax shall remain in effect.
4. Once the tax authorized by this section is abolished or is terminated by any means,
all funds remaining in the special trust fund shall be used solely for the purposes specified in
the proposal submitted pursuant to subsection 2 of this section within such county. Any funds
in such special trust fund which are not needed for current expenditures may be invested by
the governing body in accordance with applicable laws relating to the investment of other
county funds.
5. All sales taxes collected by the director of revenue under this section on behalf of
any county, less one percent for cost of collection which shall be deposited in the state's
general revenue fund after payment of premiums for surety bonds as provided in section
32.087, shall be deposited in a special trust fund, which is hereby created, to be known as the
"Local Wastewater Treatment Sales Tax Trust Fund". The moneys in the local wastewater
treatment sales tax trust fund shall not be deemed to be state funds and shall not be
commingled with any funds of the state. The director of revenue shall keep accurate records

HB 3013 246
of the amount of money in the trust and which was collected in each county imposing a sales
tax pursuant to this section, and the records shall be open to the inspection of officers of the
county and the public. Not later than the tenth day of each month the director of revenue shall
distribute all moneys deposited in the trust fund during the preceding month to the county
which levied the tax; such funds shall be deposited with the county treasurer of each such
county, and all expenditures of funds arising from the local wastewater treatment sales tax
trust fund shall be by an appropriation act to be enacted by the governing body of each such
100 county. Expenditures may be made from the fund for any purposes authorized pursuant to
101 subsection 2 of this section in the ordinance or order adopted by the governing body
102 submitting the local wastewater treatment tax to the voters.
103 6. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from the
104 amounts in the trust fund and credited to any county for erroneous payments and
105 overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
106 such counties. If any county abolishes the tax, the county shall notify the director of revenue
107 of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal and the director of
108 revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the
109 amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the
110 tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts.
111 After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in such county, the
112 director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the county and close the account
113 of that county. The director of revenue shall notify each county of each instance of any
114 amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
115 7. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
116 shall apply to the tax imposed pursuant to this section.
117 8. All provisions of chapter 108 shall apply to any bonds issued pursuant to this
118 section.
119 9. For purposes of this section, the term "wastewater treatment and water pollution
120 abatement" is limited to the following:
121 (1) Establishment of new wastewater treatment facilities or expansion or other
122 improvement to existing wastewater treatment facilities;
123 (2) Elimination or reduction of the release of water pollutants affecting waters of the
124 state located in the county; and
125 (3) Use of funds as matching funds for grants or loans from the clean water
126 commission pursuant to this chapter.
650.399. 1. The board of commissioners may, by a majority vote of its members,
request that the governing body of the county submit to the qualified voters of such county at
a [general,] primary [or special] election either of the questions contained in subsection 2 of

HB 3013 247
this section. The governing body may approve or deny such request. The governing body
may also vote to submit such question without a request of the board of commissioners. The
county election official shall give legal notice of the election pursuant to chapter 115.
2. The questions shall be put in substantially the following form:
(1) Shall (name of county) establish an emergency communications
system fund to establish (and/or) maintain an emergency
communications system, and for which the county shall levy a tax of
(insert exact amount, not to exceed six cents) per each one hundred
dollars assessed valuation therefor, to be paid into the fund for that
purpose?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
; or
(2) Shall (name of county) establish an emergency communications
system fund to establish (and/or) maintain an emergency
communications system, and for which the county shall levy a sales tax
of (insert exact amount, not to exceed one-tenth of one percent), to be
paid into the fund for that purpose?
(cid:0) YES (cid:0) NO
3. The election shall be conducted and vote canvassed in the same manner as other
county elections. If the majority of the qualified voters voting thereon vote in favor of such
tax, then the county shall levy such tax in the specified amount, beginning in the tax year
immediately following its approval. The tax so levied shall be collected along with other
county taxes in the manner provided by law. If the majority of the qualified voters voting
thereon vote against such tax, then such tax shall not be imposed unless such tax is
resubmitted to the voters and a majority of the qualified voters voting thereon approve such
tax.
4. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting thereon
are in favor of the question authorizing a sales tax, then the tax shall become effective on the
first day of the second calendar quarter after the director of revenue receives notification of
adoption of the local sales tax. Any sales tax levied under this section shall apply to all retail
sales made within the county which are subject to sales tax under chapter 144, except sales of
food as defined in section 144.014. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the
qualified voters voting thereon are opposed to the question authorizing the sales tax, then the
tax shall not become effective unless and until the question is resubmitted under this section
to the qualified voters and such question is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting on the question, but no question shall be resubmitted under this section sooner than

HB 3013 248
twelve months from the date of the last question submitted to and opposed by the voters under
this section.
5. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.
6. All revenue collected under this section by the director of the department of
revenue on behalf of any county, except for one percent for the cost of collection which shall
be deposited in the state's general revenue fund, shall be deposited in a special trust fund,
which is hereby created and shall be known as the "County Emergency Communications
Sales Tax Fund", and shall be used solely for the designated purposes. Moneys in the fund
shall not be deemed to be state funds, and shall not be commingled with any funds of the
state. The director may make refunds from the amounts in the fund and credited to the county
for erroneous payments and overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and
drafts deposited to the credit of such county. Any funds in the special fund which are not
needed for current expenditures shall be invested in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
Not later than the tenth day of each month, the director of revenue shall distribute all moneys
deposited in the fund during the preceding month by distributing the sum due the county as
certified by the director of revenue to the county treasurer, or such other officer as may be
designated by the county ordinance or order, of each county imposing the tax authorized by
this section.
7. If the tax is repealed or terminated by any means, all funds remaining in the special
trust fund shall continue to be used solely for the designated purposes, and the county shall
notify the director of the department of revenue of the action at least ninety days before the
effective date of the repeal and the director may order retention in the trust fund, for a period
of one year, of two percent of the amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover
possible refunds or overpayment of the tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts
deposited to the credit of such accounts. After one year has elapsed after the effective date of
abolition of the tax in such county, the director shall remit the balance in the account to the
county and close the account of that county. The director shall notify each county of each
instance of any amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
[78.100. Any person desiring to become a candidate for mayor or
councilman shall file with the city clerk a statement of such candidacy in
substantially the following form:
State of Missouri, County of ______ ss.
I, ______, herewith state and declare that I reside at number ______
street, city of ______, county of therein; that I am a candidate for
nomination to the office of (mayor or councilman) to be voted upon at
the primary election to be held on the ______ Tuesday of ______, 20__

HB 3013 249
____, and I hereby request that my name be printed upon the official
primary ballot for nomination by such primary election for such office.
(Signed) ______
]
[78.120. Upon the said ballot the names of the candidates for mayor,
arranged in the order of filing shall first be placed, with a square at the left of
each name, and immediately below, the words, "vote for one". Following
these names, likewise arranged in the order of filing, shall appear the names of
the candidates for councilmen, with a square at the left of each name, and
below the names of such candidates shall appear the words, "vote for four", or
"vote for three", or "vote for two", as the case may be. The ballot shall be in
substantially the following form:
CANDIDATES FOR NOMINATION FOR
MAYOR AND COUNCILMEN OF ______ CITY
AT THE PRIMARY ELECTION, ______ FOR MAYOR
(Names of candidates)
(Vote for one)
FOR COUNCILMEN
(Names of candidates)
(Vote for four)
or
(Vote for three)
or
(Vote for two)
As the case may be.
Official ballot, attest:
]
[78.470. Except as provided in section 78.530, candidates to be voted
for at all general and special municipal elections at which the officers are to be
elected under the provisions of sections 78.430 to 78.640 shall be nominated
by a primary election, and no other names shall be placed upon the general
ballot except those nominated as herein prescribed. The primary for such
nominations shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in
February preceding the election, and the judges of the election appointed for
general or special election shall be the judges of the primary election, so far as
possible.]
[78.480. 1. Except as provided in section 78.530, any person desiring
to become a candidate for councilman shall file with the city clerk a statement
of such candidacy in substantially the following form:
State of Missouri, )

HB 3013 250
) ss.
County of ______ )
I, ______, being first duly sworn, say that I reside at ______ street, city
of ______, county of ______, state of Missouri; that I am a qualified
voter therein; that I am a candidate for nomination to the office of
councilman to be voted upon at the primary election to be held on ____
__ Tuesday of ______, 20______, and am eligible therefor, and I
hereby request that my name be printed upon the official primary ballot
for nomination by primary election for such office, and that I will serve
as such officer, if elected.
____________________________
(Signed) __
Subscribed and sworn to (or affirmed) before me on this ______ day of
______, 20______
____________________________
(Signed) __
2. The ballots shall be in substantially the following form:
Warning: Voting for more than the total number of candidates to be
chosen for any one office will invalidate this ballot.
OFFICIAL PRIMARY BALLOT
Candidates for nomination for councilmen of ______ at primary
election.
FOR COUNCILMEN
Vote for (number to be elected)
(cid:0)______(Name of candidate)______
(cid:0)______(Name of candidate)______
(cid:0)______(Name of candidate)______
3. The names of candidates receiving the highest number of votes for
councilmen, equal to twice the number to be elected, if there be so many
running, shall be placed upon the official ballot for councilmen at the
municipal election.]
[78.510. The primary election as provided for by sections 78.470 to
78.500 shall not be required if upon the expiration of the time for filing of
statements with the city clerk of persons desiring to become a candidate for
councilman, as provided for by sections 78.470 to 78.500, the number of such
persons shall not exceed a number equal to twice the number to be elected at
the general or special election. Within forty-eight hours after the expiration of
the time for filing of such statements with the city clerk the council shall
canvass the statements filed to determine from the number of statements filed
whether this section shall be applicable. In the event that it is determined that
the provisions shall be applicable the council shall, by ordinance, provide that
a primary election under the provisions of sections 78.470 to 78.500 shall not

HB 3013 251
be held and that the names of the persons filing statements shall be printed on
the municipal election ballots as the nominees for councilman as provided for
by sections 78.520 to 78.540; provided, however, that the names of such
persons appearing on such ballot shall appear thereon in the order that they
were filed with the city clerk.]
[78.520. 1. Except as provided in section 78.530, the city clerk shall
thereupon cause the official ballots to be printed, and upon the ballots the
names of the candidates shall be arranged in the order of their vote received at
the primary election, and above the names of the candidates shall appear the
words "Vote for (number to be elected)".
2. The ballots shall be in substantially the following form:
Warning: Voting for more than the total number of candidates to be
elected to any office will invalidate this ballot.
OFFICIAL BALLOT
Candidates for councilmen of ______ at general election.
FOR COUNCILMEN
Vote for (number to be elected)
(cid:0)______(Name of candidate)______
(cid:0)______(Name of candidate)______
(cid:0)______(Name of candidate)______
]
✔